Authors
Matt Williams
Number of Reviews
222

Title
Review for Election (1999)
It is with a queasy mind that I entered the theater to see Election.
This year has already had a glut of high school movies, most of which
have been of dubious quality.  Does the world need another one?  If that
movie is Election, the answer is "yes".  A smart and funny satire of
high school, and life in general, Election shows how to do the high
school genre right.
Tracy Flick (Reese Witherspoon) is an overachieving student at Carver
High School, in Omaha.  She is the type of girl who will stop at
absolutely nothing to reach her goal.  Her latest challenge is to become
Student Body President, which shouldn't be too hard (since she's the
only one running).
Enter Jim McAllister (Matthew Broderick), history teacher.  He secretly
despises Tracy, and decides to give her a challenge.  He urges Paul
Metzler (Chris Klein), a naive but popular jock, to enter the race.
But things don't stop there, as Paul's lesbian sister, Tammy (Jessica
Campbell) decides to join the race as well.  An outcast at school, she
initially seems to have no chance of winning.  Yet, her nihilistic
attitudes strike a chord with the student body, and soon she becomes a
serious contender as well.
Based on Tom Perrotta's novel, Election is clever and whimsical.  Not
only does it aptly capture the nuances of high school and pointless
student body elections, but it reveals truths about politics and life as
a whole.
Matthew Broderick is an unusual choice to play Mr. McAllister.  At
times, he still seems a bit too boyish for the role, even though makeup
has added a bit of grey at his temples.  Still, Broderick is able to
bring a good dose of humor to the role, which serves as a compliment to
his Ferris Bueller days.  McAllister is a man who obsesses about the
difference between ethics and morals, meanwhile ignoring both.
The students are all a treat.  Reese Witherspoon is riveting as the
driven Tracy Flick, creating a memorable character that is familiar yet
unique.  Chris Klein seems to be channeling Keanu Reeves at points, but
he achieves the desired ambiance, that of a good intentioned airhead.
The film gets a bit distracted when it diverts attention away from the
election to focus on the marital problems of McAllister, his wife, Diane
(Molly Hagan), and their best friends, the  Novotnys (Mark Harelik and
Delaney Driscoll).  But, even when dwelling on this subplot, the film
retains its cruel comic edge.
Director Alexander Payne has created a very enjoyable satire in
Election.  Not the typical high school comedy, Election proves itself to
be much more.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Lost in Space (1998)
Leave it to Hollywood to remake Lost in Space, a television show that
was itself a science fiction retelling of the Swiss Family Robinson.
The Lost in Space TV show had devolved into camp after its first season,
but though the movie remake takes itself a bit more seriously, it
doesn't give us much of a reason to.
Sixty years in the future, the Earth is running out of natural
resources. To save the population, one scientist, John Robinson (William
Hurt) has a plan. He has invented a hyperdrive, which can instantly link
two areas in space, provided each area has a jumpgate (a cosmic buoy in
space).  He has located the nearest habitable planet, Alpha Prime, and,
with the support of the world's united space organization, plans to
journey there to build a companion jumpgate to the one being constructed
in Earth's orbit.  Until both gates are complete, travel between Earth
and Alpha Prime is a time-consuming venture:  the travelers must spend
ten years in suspended animation.
As a condition of the trip, John Robinson's crew will be composed of his
family. His wife, Maureen (Mimi Rogers) is the ship's resident
biologist.  His eldest daughter, Judy (Heather Graham), is the ship's
doctor.  His two youngest kids, Penny (Lacey Chabert) and Will (Jack
Johnson) are given token assignments as well.  The only other person
accompanying the family on their trip is Major Don West (Matt LeBlanc),
who will pilot the Jupiter 2.
However, there is opposition to the plan back on Earth.  A radical
terrorist group, known as the Global Seditionists, have enlisted the aid
of Dr. Smith (Gary Oldman) to sabotage the mission.  He proceeds with
the sabotage, but things don't turn out as he expects.  Dr. Smith finds
himself an unwilling stowaway on their cosmic voyage, and the sabotaged
ship ends up lost in space.
The plot of the movie Lost in Space makes more sense than most of the
television episodes, but only slightly.  If you start to think about the
details too much, the entire plot collapses.  So, to cure that:  don't
think about the plot. Just sit back and enjoy the ride.
There are several annoying things about Lost in Space, and the most
irritating is Blarp, the Space Monkey.  He serves no purpose whatsoever
in the story except possibly as a merchandising tie-in.  He's evidently
supposed to be cute, since he has saucer eyes and he burps after eating,
but he doesn't blend with the tone of the rest of the movie.  And for
that matter, he doesn't blend much at all (despite his chameleonic
coloring)...he's obviously a special effect. He's about as seamlessly
integrated into the film as an animated cereal mascot. Coming from the
rigid world of stop motion, special effects creature animators have
terribly overcompensated in the world of CGI.  No realistic creature
constantly moves every point of his body at every second.  Someday
animators will find a happy medium, and the effects shots of Lost in
Space will look as dated as King Kong.
The characterizations in Lost in Space are adequate, although the
characters themselves are, for the most part, bland.  In an effort to
spice things up and bring the Robinson family into the '90s (or the
2050s, as the case may be), the whole family has been
dysfunctionalized.  John Robinson has become a distant workaholic father
who alienates his whole family.  Penny is now a helium-voiced rebel, and
Will is a misunderstood genius who only wants acknowledgment from his
dad.  Of all the cliched relationships aboard the wayward spaceship, the
developing romance between Don West and Judy Robinson, while still not
uncovering new ground, at least provides a humorous diversion.
Though not quite as sniveling as in the television series, the character
of Dr. Zachary Smith is still the most interesting.  Gary Oldman does a
good job, but hardly seems to be stretching his range here.  However,
the film does come up with an interesting solution to the conflicting
interests of killing off the villain and keeping him around for
potential sequels.
With its stock characters and a complex plot about as flimsy as a
spiderweb, this new Lost in Space is certainly not going to become a
classic.  It's sole asset is its eye candy.  If you just turn off your
brain and relax, it will help to pass the time.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Blues Brothers 2000 (1998)
The Blues Brothers was a wonderful film, a hilarious comedy packed with
good music.  It cried out for a sequel, but John Belushi's untimely
death seemed to eliminate the idea.  However, eighteen years have
passed, and the long dormant sequel has finally emerged.  Unfortunately,
it's a sequel not worthy of the original.
The film starts exactly eighteen years after the first one ended.
Elwood Blues (Dan Aykroyd) is just getting out of jail, his brother Jake
having recently died.  As in the first film, he first visits Mother Mary
Stigmata (Kathleen Freeman) and then sets about getting the band back
together.
John Belushi's absence leaves a terrible hole in the film, and although
three new characters are created to fill the void, it is still very
noticeable.  First, there's Cabel (Joe Morton) the illegitimate son of
Elwood's stepfather (played by Cab Calloway in the first movie).  Cabel
is reluctant to join his destiny, and spends most of the movie as an
Illinois sheriff, chasing the Blues Brothers Band.  Next, there's Mighty
Mack (John Goodman), a bartender who becomes the new lead singer of the
band.  Finally, there's Buster (J. Evan Bonifant), a ten year old orphan
who tags along with Elwood and eventually joins the band.
The plotting of the film is hardly original...it seems to be almost a
clone of the original.  Elwood has to go to reluctantly retrieve each
member of the band, they then travel, while being pursued by the police,
and perform at several odd stops until they finally reach the big
concert finale.  The first film had Neo-Nazis as the random element,
this time around, the Russian Mafia and a militia group fill their role.
In fact, the duplication of the plot is so ridiculously complete that
certain scenes are practically identical to the original. Remember the
classic performance at Country Bob's (where they like both types of
music: Country AND Western) from the first movie? Well, this movie has a
performance at a country fair, where the band is expected to play
bluegrass music.  There's the massive police car pileup, although this
time the gag falls completely flat. There's even an exact replica of the
conversion scene in the church of Reverend Cleophus (James Brown).
There are plenty of recurring characters too.  In addition to Mother
Stigmata and Reverend Cleophus, Aretha Franklin reprises her role as
Mrs. Murphy.  Frank Oz, a prison guard in the first film, makes an
appearance here as the prison warden.
As the stars, the new Blues Brothers don't live up to their legacy.
Aykroyd is more loquacious, yet much flatter as Elwood.  John Goodman
barely has a character as Mighty Mack.  Joe Morton has the deepest
character, but not a terribly interesting one, as Cab.  And what's the
deal with the orphan?  It plays like a desperate gimmick that doesn't
mesh at all with the rest of the film.  At least Bonifant isn't as
precocious as he could have been in the role.
But the true star, and the only saving grace, of the film is the music.
And the film is packed with it (even during and after the ending
credits). Although there are no brilliant mergers of comedy and song as
in the original's Rawhide/Stand By Your Man medley, the music is very
much enjoyable.  To top it off, the film is packed to the gills with
cameo musician appearances.  B.B. King, Blues Traveler, Eric Clapton,
Travis Tritt, Wilson Pickett, Erykah Badu, Bo Diddley and Steve Winwood
are just a sampling of the multitude of stars that make an appearance
here and there.
Unfortunately, the music pauses here and there to allow in the familiar
plot.  If simply copying the original Blues Brothers wasn't bad enough,
writers Aykroyd and John Landis dumb it down, removing any memorable
characters, and replacing them with flashy, but unbelievable, magical
gimmicks.  It's a shame.  Buy the soundtrack and avoid the film. Better
yet, rewatch the original...you'll have a much better time.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
The X-Files joins the ranks of television shows moving to the big
screen, but (in a rare occurence) it is doing so in the midst of its
popular television run.  Though this might serve to boost its audience,
it only has a detrimental effect on the film, which ranks as an adequate
episode of the series...nothing really worth the trouble of a feature
adaptation.
For those of you unfamiliar with the series, The X-Files are a division
of the F.B.I. which investigates unusual cases (particularly those that
are of a paranormal nature).  The two agents who have been assigned to
the X-Files are Fox Mulder (David Duchovny), the smart-alecky true
believer, and Dana Scully (Gillian Anderson), the level-headed skeptic.
The pair had begun to uncover a government conspiracy involving aliens.
However, they came too close, and their office was burned and the
At the opening of the X-Files movie, Mulder and Scully have been
reassigned to an anti-terrorist detail.  But that pesky alien conspiracy
just won't leave them alone.  Even when assigned to a routine detail,
such as evacuating a Dallas federal building after a bomb threat, can
turn mysterious when these two are involved.  And sooner than you can
say "extraterrestrial biological entity", they're hip deep in the
paranormal again.
Most of the standard X-Files supporting players are here.  On the good
guy's side, there's Mulder and Scully's semi-supportive boss, Director
Skinner (Mitch Pileggi), and Mulder's three conspiracy obsessed pals,
The Lone Gunmen (Tom Braidwood, Bruce Harwood, and Dean Haglund).  In
the Syndicate, the evil secret government organization behind the
conspiracy, there's Well-Manicured Man (John Neville) and the ol'
favorite Cigarette-Smoking Man (William B. Davis).  And of course, no
around, Martin Landau plays Kurtzweil, a man who passes some critical
information Mulder's way.
The strengths of The X-Files movie are the same as the series. Duchovny
and Anderson are very engaging leads, displaying the same great
chemistry here as they do on the tv show.  Plus, the picture has a
wonderfully paranoid atmosphere, which so enthralls the audience that
they'll willingly follow along even the most ludicrous plot.
However, the film is also hamstrung by the series.  Since the series
will continue next season, there can be no ultimate conclusion to the
film.  Everything must continue status quo for the series to resume.  As
a result, the movie feels more like a two-part episode of the series
rather than a big screen spectacle.
>From a purely narrative point of view, The X-Files movie falls apart.
The entire plot is driven by an unlikely set of coincidences.  Both
sides, the good guys and the bad guys, cast their fates into the wind
and let pure luck decide their outcomes.  The underlying conspiracy is
hopelessly convoluted, with even more loose ends than plot twists. Even
in comparison to the overall series plot, the movie fails  (actually
altering a major component of the series "mythology" to conform with
more cinematic tastes).
For novices to the X-Files, the movie would be very confusing to follow.
The movie assumes a base familiarity with the key characters, and  even
with some of the details of the overall conspiracy (which are
summarized, but too briefly for newcomers).  Devoted fans of the series
will find that they are being treated with utter contempt.  Not only
does the movie fail to answer any relevant questions, but the movie's
bungled mishandling of the Mulder-Scully romantic angle is sure to
displease both 'shippers and anti-'shippers alike.
The X-Files movie might have worked well as a television episode. As a
movie, it generates a good atmosphere and has a pair of good
performances from the leads...and that's about it.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Dancer, Texas Pop. 81 (1998)
Written and directed by small town native Tim McCanlies, Dancer, Texas
Pop. 81 is a film that shares many of the same qualities of a small
town.  It's small, unassuming, easygoing and has a certain kind of charm
that will resonate well with audiences anxious for a change of pace from
the hustle and bustle of big budgeted Hollywood extravaganzas.
Dancer is a very small town in West Texas, composed mostly of ranchers,
oilmen and their families.  Dancer's largest senior class (5) is about
to graduate, and a moment of truth is coming for four of the boys.  As
children, the four best friends made a solemn vow to leave Dancer for
Los Angeles on the Monday following graduation.  However, now that day
is fast approaching, and the four young adults are now having second
thoughts about leaving behind everything they have known.
The leader of the foursome, Keller (Breckin Meyer), has meticulously
researched and plotted every facet of the trip...but he never counted on
a mutiny.  The first one to voice doubts is Terrell Lee (Peter
Facinelli), whose overbearing parents (Patricia Wettig and Michael
O'Neill) want him to continue the family oil business.  But also
experiencing second thoughts are the rancher John (Eddie Mills), who
wonders about the place of a cowboy in L.A., and the oddball Squirrel
(Ethan Embry), who starts thinking of his alcoholic father (Keith
Szarabajka).
As the four teens deliberate their future and reflect upon their past,
we are treated to a knowing glimpse at the charms and pains of small
town life. The pace of the movie is as slow and relaxed as a warm summer
day, but, since it fits the mood of the movie, it is not distracting in
the slightest.
The four leads are engaging (though Embry overacts a bit as the most
comical of the four).  But the whole of the film works much better on
the ensemble level...there's not anyone who particularly stands out from
the cast, but the combined whole manage to create a realistically
pleasant small town atmosphere.
Though the question of whether or not the four friends will actually
leave has set the town of Dancer abuzz, it's not as much of a mystery to
a knowing audience. If you're familiar with typical movie conventions,
it's not that big of a challenge to accurately predict who will stay and
who will go.  At least, enjoyment of the movie is not contingent on the
suspense.
Those expecting an explosion around every corner might be disappointed
by Dancer, Texas Pop. 81.  But, for those looking for entertainment with
a change of pace, the movie delivers an enjoyable break from the
razzle-dazzle of big budget fare.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Six Days Seven Nights (1998)
It's a traditional setup:  put a man and a woman who seemingly hate each
other into isolation together and love will bloom.  That's the
tried-and-true setup of the new romantic adventure film Six Days, Seven
Nights, which gets the setup right... but doesn't know what to do from
there.
Robin Monroe (Anne Heche) is the busy New York editor at an upscale
fashion magazine. She has little time for romance, but when her
boyfriend Frank (David Schwimmer) invites her to a six-day, seven night
stay at a South Pacific resort, she accepts...just as she does to his
proposal for marriage.
When an emergency photo shoot in Tahiti beckons, Robin finds herself
hiring the services of Quinn Harris (Harrison Ford), the only pilot on
the island.  However, a tropical storm forces their plane to crash, and
Robin and Quinn find themselves stranded on a remote island with little
hope of rescue.
Of course, the island is full of adventure.  From wild animals to
dangerous terrain to modern-day pirates, Robin and Quinn face danger at
every turn.  Will these dangers make them turn to one another?
Harrison Ford and Anne Heche actually make a convincing romantic
couple.  The actors do a good enough job to allow you to get lost in the
characterization, and forget about the actors' personal lives.  Neither
character is written very deep, but both Ford and Heche play their roles
with the appropriate combination of charm and likability.
On the supporting side, David Schwimmer is his traditional whiner...a
role which is easier to take in these small doses.  There to comfort him
is Angelica (Jacqueline Obradors), island entertainer and Quinn's
sometimes girlfriend. She doesn't have much to do beyond the bimbo role,
which she fills nicely.
It seems as if director Ivan Reitman is shooting for a Romancing The
Stone, or The African Queen sort of feel for the film.  But, though the
leads are  appealing, he doesn't have the story to back it up.
Aside from the romance, there's actually very little for the characters
to do.  The film tries to address that by throwing nearly every
shipwrecked-on-a-deserted-isle trick in the book at them (come on,
pirates?), but every obstacle seems overly artificial.
In the end, Six Days, Seven Nights is enjoyable...though more for its
romantic comedy elements than its sense of adventure.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Mask of Zorro, The (1998)
After quite an extended absence from the screen, Zorro has returned in
the brand new adventure.  The Mask of Zorro typifies what a good summer
popcorn movie can be:  an action-packed adventure with an actual plot
and interesting characters!
The film opens in the final days of the Mexican revolution.  The Spanish
governor of California, Don Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson), has done his
best to oppress the people and support the aristocracy.  The people's
only hope comes from the masked swashbuckler, Zorro (Anthony Hopkins).
Don Rafael vows to destroy Zorro with one final plan, before he is
forced to leave his governorship.
Flash forward twenty years.  Don Rafael has returned to California, now
under Mexican rule, with a new scheme that will enable him to rule once
again.  Twenty years older, Zorro is in no shape to oppose him... so
Zorro sets about finding a replacement.
He finds Alejandro Murieta (Antonio Banderas), a common thief in whom he
spies the seeds of talent.  But can Alejandro learn the talents of Zorro
in time to defeat Montero's evil schemes?  And can he place the needs of
the people before his own personal quest for vengeance?
Both Anthony Hopkins and Antonio Banderas are impressive as the
respective Zorros.  Both men embody a certain air of adventure
appropriate for the role. Hopkins gives the elder Zorro wisdom, whereas
Banderas is given a much broader range, from comedy to romance.
Cast as the younger Zorro's love interest, Catherine Zeta-Jones is able
to keep apace with the fiery Banderas, whether on the dance floor or in
a seductive swordfight.  The weakest links would have to be the
villains, Stuart Wilson as Don Rafael, and his crony Capt. Harrison Love
(Matt Letsher). They are not poor adversaries, but neither can hold a
candle to Zorro.
Director Martin Campbell, who directed Goldeneye, approaches The Mask of
Zorro with much the same style.  The end result feels much like a
period-set Bond film, starring a suave superhuman hero, and filled with
outlandish stunts.  This approach actually works refreshingly well, and
puts to rest the notion that any modern Zorro film would have to seem
dated.
The stuntwork throughout The Mask of Zorro is superb, with the high
point being the film's numerous swashbuckling sequences.  Sure, at times
things tend to get a little unbelievable, but you are too swept up in
the film's atmosphere to notice.
In a mostly disappointing summer (so far), The Mask of Zorro is finally
a summer movie that lives up to its promise.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Living Out Loud (1998)
Living Out Loud is a rather unconventional romantic comedy, as if you
couldn't tell that by its unlikely leads: Holly Hunter and Danny DeVito.
However, with strong characters and an unusual storytelling style, it
slowly manages to win us over.
Holly Hunter stars as Judith Nelson, the recently divorced wife of a New
York City doctor (Martin Donovan).  After her husband leaves her for
another woman, Judith is left alone in her high-rent apartment.
She unexpectedly strikes up a friendship with her building's elevator
operator, Pat Francato (Danny DeVito).  Drawn together by a shared sense
of loss, the two discover sense of mutual respect.  Pat has dreams of
his own:  he wants to start an imported olive oil business, but he is
saddled with gambling debts and low self esteem. The attentions of a
beautiful woman like Judith spark dreams he thought long dead...but her
intentions are completely elsewhere.
A third character who enters into their lives is Liz Bailey (Queen
Latifah), a blues singer who becomes an unexpected friend and confidante
to Judith, and later, Pat.
The movie unfolds in an unconventional way, allowing us to listen in on
rambling thoughts, cluttered memories and imagined dreams.  The film
keeps the audience off guard with sequences that seem to be real, but
are shown to be dreams, and sequences that seem to be dreams, but are
shown to be real.  There's a moment, early on, when the style threatens
to overpower the film with its confusion...but it is fleeting.  In the
long run, the unpredictability of the structure adds to the film's
charms.
The biggest strength of Living Out Loud is its characters.  Judith, Pat
and Liz are all wonderful creations.  They bristle with life and
realism.  You get the feeling that these are real people...not just flat
characters quickly jotted down on a page.
However, even amid the vivid characters and quirky storytelling, there's
something that's not quite satisfying about Living Out Loud. Yes, the
storyline seems to flow naturally, and the characters all act as they
reasonably should.  However, many scenes are quickly hurried in and out,
leaving you wanting more.  In a way, the film seems like an
all-too-brief affair.
Living Out Loud does have plenty of good moments, and overall it is an
enjoyable film to watch.  A film that leaves you wanting more is
certainly better than the opposite.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Cousin Bette (1998)
With the preponderance of period pieces at the movies during recent
years, it doesn't seem too farfetched that someone would adapt Balzac's
novel Cousin Bette. However, this farcical tale of revenge falters right
out of the starting gate and never recovers.
Jessica Lange stars as Cousin Bette.  As a child, her cousin Adeline
(Geraldine Chaplin) was favored and pampered by her family.  Adeline
even stole Bette's true love, Baron Hector Hulot (Hugh Laurie).  But
Bette just swallowed her pride and let it fester inside her.
The movie opens with Adeline on her deathbed.  Bette promises to look
after Adeline's children (but not the way Adeline intends).  However,
once she is unintentionally scorned once again by Hector, she begins to
plot the Hulot downfall.
She enlists the help of a young sculptor, Wenceslas (Aden Young), and a
burlesque star, Jenny Cadine (Elisabeth Shue) to further her plans.  But
her evil is all consuming, and even her allies are in danger of becoming
victims of her schemes.
Intended as a farce, Cousin Bette never quite works.  Though quite
frequently ridiculous, the film doesn't commit itself wholeheartedly to
the concept.
Lange is easily the best thing in the movie, though her character is
rather slow to develop.  In the opening scenes, we get the sense that
she is already plotting her evil revenge, but then she has a sudden
relapse into niceness.  It's not until much later that her true
character has a chance to come out.  Whether it is a conscious ploy for
audience sympathy or not, it gives an inconsistent tone to her
character.
Elisabeth Shue peppers the film with several truly horrid musical
numbers. They're intentionally bad, and here's one area where the
filmmakers succeed grandly.  They're so bad that they are actually
painful to watch.
If not for Lange's performance, the film would be a complete loss...and
it almost is anyhow.  Those seeking seduction and betrayal in period
dress should probably rewatch Dangerous Liasons, and ignore Cousin
Bette.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Meet Joe Black (1998)
Meet Joe Black is your classic boy-meets-girl, boy-likes-girl,
boy-gets-killed-in-horrible-accident,
supernatural-entity-takes-over-boy's-body,
supernatural-entity-falls-in-love-with-girl story. Based on the 1934
film Death Takes a Holiday, Meet Joe Black is a well acted romantic
drama which explores the meanings of life and love.
William Parrish (Anthony Hopkins) is a billionaire businessman on the
brink of his 65th birthday.  He has built a huge media empire, and
raised two beautiful daughters, Allison (Marcia Gay Harden) and Susan
(Claire Forlani).  William has been able to negotiate his way out of
many tough spots...but he has suddenly begun fearing his own mortality,
the one situation he won't be able to talk his way out of.
And he has good reason to fear, for Death himself is stalking him.
However, Death has a deal to make.  Death has taken possession of a man
who has recently died (Brad Pitt), and wants William to be his guide in
a holiday among the living.  In return, William gets to live a few extra
days.  Of course, he agrees.
Death, under the human name of "Joe Black", gets to experience life as a
complete innocent.  He never before has experienced the simple pleasures
of a springy matters or peanut butter.  And he's not quite compared for
the more complex pleasures when he and Susan fall in love. But, is their
affair doomed to an early demise?
At nearly three hours in length, Meet Joe Black is a little bit on the
leisurely side, though it never gets boringly lengthy.  Instead, the
film gets a chance to develop some nicely textured characters and
situations. You get to soak in and enjoy the atmosphere, rather than
being hurriedly rushed through it.
The romantic angle works well, though, surprisingly, the interactions
between Joe Black and William Parrish are more interesting than those
with his daughter.  This is most likely due to Anthony Hopkins, who once
again displays his superb acting skills.  William is a desperate man who
has had a seemingly ideal life, and doesn't want to let it go. By
contrast, Claire Forlani is merely the romantic interest.  She gets to
show Joe the ropes of love, but is hardly as interesting a character.
As Joe Black, Brad Pitt seems a bit stilted.  Granted, he's supposed to
be out-of-place, but the overly formal technique used by Pitt begins to
distract from the role.  Still, he is able to hold his own, and over the
course of the three hours, his character begins to grow on you.
The main character who seems out of place here is Drew (Jake Weber), an
ambitious executive in Williams' company who is Joe Black's main rival
for Susan's affections.  Weber plays the character with a hammy relish
reminiscent of Snidley Whiplash.  This cartoonish foil an aberration in
a film filled many more dimensional characters.
The supernatural elements of the film are handled murkily, but never
distractingly so.  We never learn what is the exact nature of Death, or
why he's never done something like this before.  It actually gets a bit
creepy when Death talks to the dying in their own voices/accents.  (His
initial conversations with Hopkins sound shockingly like Hannibal
Lecter...) And the ultimate resolution to one of the film's supernatural
problems seems, well, somewhat superficial.
Still, even with the film's length, it was a pleasant time at the
movies, something you wouldn't necessarily expect from a film about
Death...but one which Meet Joe Black delivers anyhow.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Madeline (1998)
This adaptation of Ludwig Bemelmans' classic children's book, Madeline,
is mostly faithful to the original.  Unfortunately, the alterations are
the film's weakest link.
Hatty Jones stars as the title character, an orphaned girl adopted by
the church, and attending a girl's school in Paris.  The headmistress is
the kindly Miss Clavel (Frances McDormand), who has a sixth sense when
something isn't quite right.
And something often isn't right, whether the independent-minded Madeline
is getting into some sort of trouble, or the school's chief benefactor
(Stephanie Audran) is on her deathbed and her cruel husband, Lord
Covington (Nigel Hawthorne) plots to sell the house.
At times, the film threatens to devolve into Home Alonesque nonsense.
But, luckily, the film stays above that level and comes up with more
creative ways to solve its dilemmas.
Nearly all the familiar scenes from the book are stuffed in the movie at
one point or another.  For only being 90 minutes long, the filmmakers
did a good job of putting everything in, without the end result feeling
overstuffed.
Performances throughout are pleasant, but no one really stands out from
the work.  Hatty Jones is neither annoying nor endearing in the title
role.
Those expecting a thrill ride of a movie are apt to be disappointed by
this comparatavely bland film.  Still, Madeline offers a nice
alternative to the standard summer fare.
Fans of the book will be adequately pleased by this interpretation.
However, besides being a nice movie, the film has little to offer those
toward the book series.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for American History X (1998)
American History X is a powerful examination of the destructive allure
of racism and hatred.  Bolstered by some impressive performances, paints
a vivid picture of how mindless hatred can tear society, and an
individual family, apart.
Derek Vinyard (Edward Norton) is the perfect skinhead poster boy: he's
handsome, charismatic, athletic, smart, and full of hatred.  As a youth,
he teamed up with a local white supremacist, Cameron Alexander (Stacy
Keach), and organized a powerful skinhead gang in Venice Beach.
However, after committing murder in an ideologically racist zeal, Derek
is sent to prison.  While there, he reevaluates his life, and years
later, returns home a changed man.
What he finds there frightens him.  His young brother, Danny (Edward
Furlong), idolizes him, and has followed in his footsteps.  Danny has
become a virulent skinhead, even turning in a school book report on Mein
Kampf.  Derek's must struggle to reclaim his brother from the same
depths of hatred which ruined his own life.
The heart of this movie is Edward Norton, and he delivers a powerful
performance.  It's a gutsy move to make his initially racist character
so compelling to begin with.  There's even a point where the movie gets
seductively close to endorsing the "white power" platform.  However,
soon the bottom drops off into a well of self-destructive hatred.
Norton is able to show the full evolution of his character, from the
innocent, to the hate-filled youth, to the regretful adult...all with a
believable intensity.
Many of the actors in the supporting cast are excellent as well. Avery
Brooks portrays a passionate high school principal who's not willing to
give up on his misguided students.  Edward Furlong gives a layered
performance as Danny, much better than his one-note sappiness in
Pecker... perhaps there's a good actor in there after all.
Director Tony Kaye (who wanted his name taken off this film due to
editorial differences) also served as the film's cinematographer, and
there his talents truly shined.  From the film's effective use of black
and white flashback sequences, to a well-handled slow-motion water
motif, the film is always visually stimulating.
The overall message of the film might smack a bit of self-importance
(particularly when considering the film's conclusion).  However,
although a few excesses are made, the film does have a deserving
message, which it effectively delivers.
American History X is a moving and involving film, tackling the tough
subject of racism in America, displaying its causes and allures, as well
as its ultimate senselessness.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Wild Things (1998)
Wild Things is a movie that prides itself on its deviations, both from
sexual norms as well as a plot as we know it.  This thriller is
overflowing with sex, violence, twisting relationships, and
double-crosses to the point that it becomes a mere parody of itself and
loses any lasting impact.
Sam Lombardo (Matt Dillon) is the guidance counselor at the high school
in the rich Florida yachting town of Blue Bay.  He is beloved by most of
the students, until one of them, rich girl Kelly Van Ryan (Denise
Richards) accuses him of rape.
Two cops, Ray Duquette (Kevin Bacon) and Gloria Perez (Daphne
Rubin-Vega) are assigned the case.  Kelly's mother, Sandra (Theresa
Russell), who has had her own relationship with Sam in the past, is out
for blood, bringing in lawyer Tom Baxter (Robert Wagner) to ruin Sam's
life and career.  She also uses her considerable influence to pressure
Ray and Gloria to find Sam guilty.
Ray, however, seeks for the truth in an unlikely place.  A white trash
girl, Suzie Toller (Neve Campbell), with whom Ray has tangled in the
past, may hold the key to Sam's guilt or innocence.  But are her motives
pure?
There are so many twists, turns, and double-crosses in Wild Things that
the movie becomes unintentionally hilarious.  It reminded me of the
cartoon in which predator and prey keep unzipping their costumes,
reversing the situation ad infinitum.  The audience can only take so
much of this before abandoning the suspension of disbelief and any sense
of seriousness about the film. Then again, any movie which stages a
crucial courtroom showdown with Bill Murray as one of the attorneys
doesn't take itself all that seriously.
The film is chock full of predators (a fact which the film hammers in
with repeated gator sightings in the Florida swamps).  Each character,
though, is a predator, and (like in the aforementioned cartoon) it is up
to the audience to determine who is the prey.  This gives nearly every
main character a chance to play both the good guy and the bad guy, so,
while the audience may get lost, the actors sure look like they're
having a good time.
Still, the film would have been better if it declared its intentions
(without necessarily untangling its twists) as to whether it's trying to
be serious or not.  The film straddles the fence on this issue, and as
it stands, it is either a mistimed comedy or a poorly staged drama.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Almost Heroes (1998)
It's sad...Chris Farley's last film is also his worst.  It's a bad
epitaph, and a worse movie.
Matthew Perry stars as Leslie Edwards, an explorer whose goal is to beat
Lewis and Clark to the Pacific Ocean.  To achieve this goal, he hires
the second best tracker in early America, Bartholomew Hunt (Chris
Farley), a drunken buffoon who has blundered his way into his
reputation.
And that's about all there is which passes for plot in this film. Their
party contains some purportedly colorful characters such as jealous
Frenchman Guy Fontenot (Eugene Levy), and encounters some purportedly
colorful characters, such as the vain Spaniard Hidalgo (Kevin Dunn), but
someone, somewhere forgot the humor.
There are only two sequences in the entire film which are barely
chuckle-worthy (Farley's eagle trials, and the group of elderly
warriors). But they in no way can justify anyone in their right mind
suffering through the rest of this atrocious film.
Die-hard fans of Farley will undoubtedly visit this travesty even though
they would be better served by reviewing his best work: his skits on
SNL. Farley was never able to locate a worthy movie for his talents.
(Tommy Boy was the closest, but a messy and cluttered attempt that was
more miss than hit.)  Perhaps the problem was his reliance on the
"fat-guy-falls-down" brand of humor that worked well in sketch comedy,
but seemed labored when stretched out to fill a full movie. He never was
able to either transcend the juvenile level of humor, or to make a movie
filled with juvenile humor actually entertaining.
But, if Farley did a bad job here, at least he had company. Matthew
Perry does a horrifically bad job.  He actually manages to outshine
Farley in the overacting category - an impressive feat, mind you, but
not one conducive to a pleasant viewing experience.  The rest of the
cast are for the most part forgettable (a fact which I'm sure many of
them will appreciate).
Director Christopher Guest takes a major wrong turn after his appealing
Waiting for Guffman. Almost Heroes wallows in stupidity...not
stupid-funny...just plain stupid. I got the feeling that some of the
material might have played better had the movie allowed itself to stray
from the rigidity of its plot.  For example, the subplot involving an
injury prone explorer could have actually been humorous if the movie
allowed its tone to resemble that of say, Monty Python and the Holy
Grail, or even South Park.  But, no, the movie never strays far from
reality, and as a result, the humor stays grounded.
Why were Edwards and Hunt left out of the history books? Anyone who sees
this movie will have a good idea: it's definitely not something you want
to remember.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Waterboy, The (1998)
After his attempt to broaden his appeal with The Wedding Singer, Adam
Sandler returns back to familiar ground in The Waterboy.  It may not be
terribly innovative, but Sandler's in peak form, and he delivers a
humorous (if predictable) comedy.
This time, Sandler stars as Bobby Boucher, a dimwitted Cajun man who
makes his living as the waterboy for a local college football team.
Water is his life, and though socially inept, he makes water-serving an
exquisite art form.  However, it's not one appreciated by the team,
which torments and picks on Bobby incessantly...until one day Coach Red
Beaulieu (Jerry Reed) finally fires him.
Not to fear, however, for Bobby soon finds work down at South Central
Louisiana State University, where the country's worst collegiate
football team plays.  Coach Klein (Henry Winkler), a bit of a loser in
his own right, gives Bobby a chance as waterboy.  However, when one day
Bobby loses his temper on the field, a hidden talent for sacking
emerges. Coach Klein immediately recruits Bobby to play linebacker...but
there's one problem:  Bobby's mama (Kathy Bates).
You see, Bobby still lives with Mama, and she's the disapproving sort.
She doesn't want Bobby to get hurt, either playing football, or even
mingling with girls (such as the white trash Vicki Vallencourt (Fairuza
Balk)).  After 31 years, will Bobby get the backbone to stand up to his
mama? (Or at least sneak around behind her back?) Hmmm...would there be
a movie otherwise?
To those who have followed Sandler's career, the character of Bobby
Boucher is a familiar one.  The character seems like an amalgam of
Canteen Boy, Cajun Man and Happy Gilmore.  Yet, this is obviously
Sandler in his element.  He's played this character so many times before
that he does play it well.
The Waterboy is extremely formulaic...but it's also funny.  If you've
seen one sports movie, you know exactly where The Waterboy is going. But
The Waterboy isn't about plot...it's about setting up the quick laugh,
and delivering it home.
At times, watching The Waterboy is like watching one of those NFL
sacking videos (you know, like The NFL's Greatest
Career-Ending-Injuries). It's a little painful, but disturbingly
humorous.
There are no epic moments that will go down in comedy history here. But
there's enough funny stuff to keep you amused throughout the movie, and
for a little while thereafter.  What more do you want from an Adam
Sandler film?
The Waterboy is the epitome of the "Adam Sandler" movie, and as that
it's very unlikely to win any converts.  If you love Adam Sandler,
chances are you'll love this movie.  If you can't stand him, this film
won't change your mind...you'd best check the other theaters in your
local megaplex.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Spanish Prisoner, The (1997)
Don't look for a Spanish prisoner in David Mamet's new film, The Spanish
Prisoner. There isn't one...but, that's the point.  In this intricate
thriller, nothing is quite as it seems...or is it?
Joe Ross (Campbell Scott) thinks he's on the verge of hitting the big
time.  He's just invented a complex financial formula called The
Process, which could mean huge profits for his company.  His boss, Mr.
Klein (Ben Gazzara), has promised him due compensation at the next
stockholder's meeting, but his friend George Lang (Ricky Jay), a company
lawyer, advises him he should get something in writing, or he might get
screwed.
Thus do Joe, George, Mr. Klein, and Susan Ricci (Rebecca Pidgeon), a
company secretary who has a crush on Joe, travel to a Caribbean resort
island St. Estephe to sell The Process. While there, Joe meets a
mysterious businessman, Jimmy Dell (Steve Martin), who befriends him and
begins to give him worldly advice.
But then, things begin to fall apart, and the overly-trusting Joe begins
to have doubts.  Is anyone really who they seem?  Is Joe being played
for a sucker?  If so, who is out to get him, and who can he trust?
David Mamet's complex plot is well constructed, and full of myriad
twists and turns.  The whole film is pleasantly reminiscent of
Hitchcock. However, under strict analysis, the film doesn't quite hold
up that well (there are too many convenient coincidences).  But it's
still leagues ahead of most thrillers.
Campbell Scott does an excellent job of pulling in the audience.  His
overly nice character could have been off-putting in a cynical world, or
even been seen as a weakness.  However, he manages to imbue Joe Ross
with a strong everyman quality which makes him likable despite his
flaws.
Steve Martin is the film's most welcome surprise.  In a mostly dramatic
role, he delivers a delightful performance, with just the right amount
of edge to be slightly unnerving.
Of the cast, the biggest disappointment has to be Rebecca Pidgeon. Her
stiff delivery is the film's most significant detraction.  Whether it
was either a conscious character quirk, or a result of
over-memorization, her flat and precise delivery lets you know there's
an actor at work... shattering the veil of disbelief.
Thankfully, she has a wonderful script (written by her husband, director
Mamet, no less) to build it up again.  There may be flaws here and
there, but for the most part, they work within the context of the film,
and only truly make themselves known during reminiscence.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for 200 Cigarettes (1999)
>From the title of 200 Cigarettes, one might assume that it is either a
propaganda film from the tobacco lobby, or a comical entry for the
Guinness Book of World Records.  However, in actuality, the film turns
out to be a threadbare ensemble comedy, struggling to be an 80s
nostalgia film, and failing.  In fact, the 200 of the title could be a
reference to the number of minute subplots in the film, each of which
holds about as much substance as a wisp of cigarette smoke.
The film is set on New Year's Eve, 1981.  Monica (Martha Plimpton) is
hosting a party, and the film cuts back and forth between many of her
invited guests as they meander their way across New York City, slowly
making their way to her apartment.
There's not really a main plotline, but the subplot with the most
prominence is that of Lucy (Courtney Love) and Kevin (Paul Rudd). Kevin
has just painfully broken up with his girlfriend, Ellie (Janeane
Garofalo), and Lucy wants to cheer him up by taking him to the party.
However, as the night progresses, it is obvious that a romance is
budding between the two.  But, can Paul recover from his break-up in
time to notice Lucy?  Or is this match not meant to be?
The search for love is common throughout most of 200 Cigarettes' myriad
subplots.  For example, a clumsy, but earnest girl (Katie Holmes), can't
help falling in love with a love-phobic lout (Jay Mohr).  Or, two lost
Long Island girls (Christina Ricci and Gaby Hoffman) discover love in
the most unlikeliest of places.  The emcee for the evening is a
disco-friendly cab driver (Dave Chappelle) who manages to meet just
about everyone that night.
The main problem with 200 Cigarettes is a common one to the ensemble
comedy.  Very few of the film's subplots actually work, and the film
spends far too little time with them.  Instead, we are constantly
reunited with barely recognizable characters we care little about in
situations both tedious and contrived.
The actors in 200 Cigarettes aren't able to help matters much. Christina
Ricci is buried beneath her screech of a New Yawk accent. Ben Affleck
wanders aimlessly through his scenes as a highly desirable bartender.
Jay Mohr's character inexplicably takes a 180 degree turn halfway
through the film.  Katie Holmes is lost amid some uninspired bits of
slapstick.  Paul Rudd and Courtney Love are nearly the only appealing
ones in the film, but there is far too little of them to be spread
around.
The film is set in 1981, but that seems to be more of a marketing ploy
than an actual setting.  There's nary a nostalgic bone to be found in
this body. Sure, barely a moment goes by without an early 80s song
floating by... but, if you're wise, you'll buy the soundtrack, and skip
the movie.
200 Cigarettes is not an absolute disaster.  It's more like a crowded
party in which there are only one or two interesting people.  Awkward,
overcrowded and mostly boring...it's not a party to remember.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Cruel Intentions (1999)
Coderelos De Laclos' novel Les Liasons Dangereuses has been adapted
several times before, and into better movies than Cruel Intentions.
However, this latest adaptation is perhaps the most inventive, and
certainly holds its own against the current glut of teen-centric films.
Rich teens are apparently jaded at an early age.  Just take a look at
the step-siblings, Kathryn Merteuil (Sarah Michelle Gellar) and
Sebastian Valmont (Ryan Phillippe). Though still in high school, both
are manipulative sexual predators, each taking a different tack.
Sebastian wears his roguish cruelty like a badge of honor, taking
delight in causing misery to those foolish enough to fall in love with
him.  Kathryn, on the other hand, while equally devoted to causing
misery, hides her schemes behind the veil of being the perfect student
at her ultra-rich private academy.
Sebastian has his sights set on his greatest conquest yet:  to deflower
the new headmaster's daughter, Annette Hargrove (Reese Witherspoon), a
teen with morals (gasp!), who has actually proclaimed her celibacy in a
feature in Seventeen magazine.  Sebastian is so confident that he can
bed her that he engages a wager with his sister:  if he loses, she gets
his classic car...but if he wins, the two siblings get to engage in a
session of wild sex.
Kathryn, however, spends her summer seeking revenge.  Her ex-boyfriend
dumped her for a naive twit, Cecile Caldwell (Selma Blair).  Kathryn
decides to seek her revenge by poisoning the mind of Cecile.  It's an
intricate plot involving both Sebastian, and Cecile's overly-friendly
cello teacher, Ronald Clifford (Sean Patrick Thomas).
Though it is never able to surpass its cinematic precursors, Dangerous
Liasons and Valmont, Cruel Intentions survives the transition from a
romantic costume drama to a teen sex film surprisingly intact. Where
else but in the world of teen politics could you find a realm to rival
the cruelties of the French aristocracy?
However, the shadow of the earlier films haunts Cruel Intentions
mercilessly.  Ryan Phillippe, for example, seems to be doing his best to
channel John Malkovich for his role.  It may be a performance worth
emulating, but it hardly wins Phillippe any points for originality. At
least Sarah Michelle Gellar doesn't try to emulate Glenn Close. However,
her character is saddled with such over-the-top idiosyncrasies, such as
a coke spoon hidden in a crucifix, that it is difficult to see her as
much more than a comical villain.
Selma Blair seems pathetically out of place as the innocent Cecile, a
fact not helped by her incessant overacting.  She's nearly matched by
the odd histrionics of Sean Patrick Thomas.  However, at least his
forced indignation can be mostly attributed to a faltering script.
But, those imperfections aside, Cruel Intentions has a head start on the
run-of-the-mill teen sex romp:  a good story.  There's actually a plot
at work here!  Sure, at times the complex machinations seem to be far
above the capacities of the teens in the cast, but, if you're willing to
give it a chance, there's a good bet you'll be entertained.
The film stumbles a bit at its conclusion, modified (only a slight bit)
from the book, but in a way that seems jarringly false.  Still, you
could certainly do worse than Cruel Intentions, which, though clumsy at
times, at least is not brain-suckingly vapid.  However, after watching
Cruel Intentions, rent Dangerous Liasons, to see how the story should
really be done.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Negotiator, The (1998)
Like a successful hostage negotiation, hostage negotiation dramas tend
to follow a set pattern.  As such, most hostage films fall into one of
two camps:  those where you sympathize with the hostage takers (see Dog
Day Afternoon, or Cadillac Man), or those in which you're diametrically
opposed to them (such as Die Hard, or any of its clones).  The
Negotiator tries to have it both ways, with strong actors on either side
of the line, and surprisingly is able to pull it off.
Danny Roman (Samuel L. Jackson) is one of Chicago's finest hostage
negotiators.  Not only does he have an encyclopedic knowledge of the
"rules" of negotiation, but he has a quick wit and firm resolve.
However, someone inside the police department is pulling a dangerous
scam, and Danny seems like the perfect fall guy.  Before he knows it,
Danny finds himself charged with a serious crime.  To prove his
innocence, the negotiator takes his own hostages.
At Danny's insistence, Chris Sabian (Kevin Spacey), an unknown
negotiator from across town, is brought in to help resolve the
situation.  But can Danny truly trust this stranger...or will the
conspirators continue to weave their deadly web?
Hostage negotiation dramas have lost their luster in recent years. Even
the twist of having a hostage-taker who knows the rules is less than
fresh.  Way back in 1988, Hans Gruber was already using negotiation
tactics against the negotiators in Die Hard.  However, what works in The
Negotiator is not the methods used, but the sheer clash of wills between
Jackson and Spacey.
The casting in the central roles couldn't have been better. Samuel L.
Jackson can channel a thinking man's desperate anger with a single
furrow of his brow.  Kevin Spacey, on the other hand, displays his icy
intensity with cool, calculated precision.  Watching the battle of wits
between these two men is definitely the high point of the movie.
Ample comic relief is provided by the omnipresent, yet underacknowledged
Paul Giamatti.  He plays a weaselly con artist/computer hacker who,
through no fault of his own, gets taken hostage by Roman.  His comic
jibes lighten up a few of the film's more tedious moments.
Several times, the film falls back on a tired crutch wherein control is
wrested from the negotiator by an outside force (be they renegade cops,
or sinister FBI agents).  Despite having been done to death, this
meaningless plot device interrupts the best parts of the film, when
Jackson and Spacey go mano a mano.
Despite this, The Negotiator still emerges as an exciting thriller,
showcasing two very good actors at the top of their form.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Psycho (1998)
I'll admit it up front.  I've never considered the original Psycho to be
one of Hitchcock's best films.  Although a good film, it should be
celebrated more for its groundbreaking elements than for its quality.
That leads us to what has to be 1998's most unusual filmmaking attempt:
director Gus Van Sant's effort to create an exact shot-for-shot remake
of the original Psycho, but in color, and using an all new cast.
For those cave-dwelling hermits who are somehow unfamiliar with the
original film, here's a brief rundown.  Marion Crane (Anne Heche) is a
secretary at a small Phoenix real estate office.  One day, she's
presented with an opportunity too great to pass up.  She steals $400,000
in cash, and begins a desperate drive to meet her boyfriend, Sam Loomis
(Viggo Mortensen), who works outside of San Francisco.
However, she makes a wrong turn off the highway, and ends up at the
Bates Motel, run by the insecure Norman Bates (Vince Vaughn), and his
domineering invalid mother.
Meanwhile, the search is on for the missing Marion.   Her sister
(Julianne Moore) wants to make sure she's all right, and a private
investigator (William H. Macy) is out to recover the stolen money.  How
will it all end? Well, if you don't already know, I'm not going to spoil
it here.
This remake is not an exact shot-for-shot remake of the original.  A few
of the shots (such as the opening pan) have been made seamless, using
technology that wasn't around in 1960.  An additional shot which
Hitchcock originally wanted for the shower scene (but was forced to
abandon due to the censors) has been included.  Most of the other
additions are semi-subliminal.  There are occasional flashes of
unrelated imagery, as well as echoes and other "subliminal" sounds
placed on the soundtrack.  Unfortunately, the additions don't work. For
the most part, they're distracting...and certainly not an improvement.
But, on the whole, the film remains extremely similar to the original.
The sexuality and violence in the film has been peripherally heightened
(something which neither adds nor detracts from the film), and a few
lines of dialogue have been updated.  However, the film still seems to
be mired in the past.  Little things, like speech patterns or one
particular use of a telephone, which seemed appropriate in the original
now seem wildly dated.
But the good stuff has translated as well.  Many of the shocks and
surprises of the original are still shocking and surprising, provided
that you haven't been let in on the secrets. And that is perhaps the
film's biggest problem.  Knowing the secrets tremendously diminishes the
impact of the original Psycho, and the same certainly holds true here.
The quality of acting varies widely in the remake.  Some of the actors
(such as Rance Howard and Anne Heche) seem confined by the film's rigid
structure.  Others (such as Vince Vaughn and Julianne Moore) manage to
deliver different interpretations of the familiar characters, even
without additional dialogue or scenes.
On the whole, the remake is just about, but not quite as good as the
original Psycho.  However, with the original still out there, it is very
difficult to recommend seeing the remake instead.  In fact, it is
difficult to recommend the remake to anyone but perhaps a film student
or a devoted fan of all things Psycho.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for What Dreams May Come (1998)
What Dreams May Come is a visually rich film without a well-thought-out
story to give it depth.  This tale of the afterlife makes for some good
eye candy, but little else.
Robin Williams stars as Chris Nielsen, a successful pediatrician with a
beautiful wife, Annie (Annabella Sciorra), two great kids (Jessica
Brooks Grant and Josh Paddock), and a wonderful life... until about five
minutes in, that is. You see, Chris faces an untimely death, and most of
the film is concerned with his adventures in the afterlife.
Giving him a helping hand in Heaven is his old mentor, Albert (Cuba
Gooding Jr.).  Everyone creates their own Heaven, from their
subconscious thoughts and dreams.  Chris' personal afterlife is based
upon his beloved wife's paintings...literally a world beautifully
created from paint.
It seems that Chris and Annie are soulmates.  Even though he is in a
world where he can have nearly everything he wants...Chris wants to
reunite with Annie.  With the help of a tracker (Max Von Sydow), Chris
begins a quest...to reunite with his wife.
The imagery throughout What Dreams May Come is simply breathtaking. The
afterlife is rendered with a captivatingly original vision.  However, it
is so well done, that the Earthly scenes can't compete.  Chris' Earthly
life seems moribund and uninteresting...a crucial flaw, since the entire
plot involves Chris' struggle to reconcile that life.
The film struggles for deep meaning, but can't escape its simplicity.
Chris' entire life is distilled into only four total friends and family
members. Wasn't there anyone else to whom he was close?  Relatives?
Friends? Childhood pets?  Apparently not.  Even in his past lives (a
subject which the film brings up on several occasions...but never truly
explores).
In fact, "unexplored" is a good word to sum up many of the faults of
What Dreams May Come.  The film brings up plenty of potentially
interesting ideas...then proceeds to ignore them.  For example, we are
treated to one example of a soul in heaven playing a prank on another
soul.  Can conflict exist in the afterlife?  Assuming that the souls are
immortal and can suffer no jeopardy...what is to prevent it?
Even in its Earthly details, the film's oversimplification is damaging.
Chris' dilemmas seem to spring out of nothingness, since we know very
little about his life.  For example, there's a scene where Chris
encounters a man who may be his father.  But since we never knew his
father before...what kind of man he was, or his relationship with
Chris...the scene is completely robbed from its impact.
The film might have been better served by a stricter chronological
order.  Telling its tale in flashbacks does give the film the
opportunity to gradually uncover its story, but leaves the film without
any foundation to build upon.  As it stands, the opening of the film
feels hopelessly rushed, and all of Chris' latter problems seem utterly
contrived.
Robin Williams falls back upon his "warm-and-fuzzy" style of dramatic
acting here.  It suffices to get the movie from Point A to Point B, but
fails to draw the audience deeply into his character...we never get to
see Chris Nielsen as a real person.
What Dreams May Come may masquerade as a philosophical journey through
Heaven and Hell, but in reality, it's a colorful film in search of
substance.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Meet the Deedles (1998)
Part buddy comedy, part fish-out-of-water story, part nature tale, Meet
the Deedles is not nearly as interesting as any of those archetypes. In
fact, it is an invitation you ought to disregard.
Phil and Stew Deedle (Paul Walker and Steve Van Wormer) are the twin
sons of the famous millionaire, Elton Deedle (Eric Braeden), founder of
Deedle Enterprises.  Elton wants his sons to be the perfect heirs to his
fortune...instead the two are careless Hawaiian surf bums.  To set them
straight, he enrolls them into a strict Wyoming boot camp, to which the
pair inevitably go.
After several misadventures in Wyoming, where the duo is stunned to
discover there's no surf, the brothers Deedle stumble upon a routine
mistaken identity plot.  They arrive at Yellowstone National Park, where
they are believed to be two new park ranger recruits.  Rather than
slinking back home and disappointing their dad, the Deedles play along.
Phil, actually, has other motives:  the beautiful park ranger Jesse (A.
J. Langer), who unfortunately happens to be the beloved stepdaughter of
the overprotective Park Ranger Captain Douglas Pine (John Ashton).
Yellowstone has a problem.  It's only a week before the famous geyser
Old Faithful celebrates its one billionth birthday, and the park is
being overrun with prairie dogs.  Not just one or two...thousands of
them. The Deedles are assigned to eliminate the P.Dog menace, not
knowing that it all is part of a fiendish plan by disgraced former Head
Ranger Frank Slater (Dennis Hopper).
The Brothers Deedle aren't supposed to be out-and-out stupid, like the
team from Dumb and Dumber, or Bill and Ted.  Instead, their brains just
operate in a different, simpler, realm.  A more accurate comparison
would be  with Carrot Top in Chairman of the Board, a film which,
unfortunately, this one resembles in several hideous ways.
The central problem with Meet the Deedles is that it simply just isn't
funny.  There's a moment when Phil utters the line, "Insert Laugh Here",
which nearly sums up the entire Meet the Deedles experience.
The result isn't bad in a run-shrieking-from-the-theater type of way.
Instead, it's merely bad in an excruciatingly boring sort of way. The
cast seems decent, but they're never asked to do anything remotely
interesting.  Instead, the film inundates the audience with countless
shots of people and/or cars rolling downhill in the forest, and with
constant annoying references to other Disney films.
You'll have much better luck finding a good spot to surf in Wyoming than
finding entertainment in Meet the Deedles.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Last Days of Disco, The (1998)
It was inevitable that films would take a look back at the disco era.
Whit Stillman's comedy-drama The Last Days of Disco is in the first
nostalgic volley, with more to come later.  However, filled with good
characters, and sharp dialogue, The Last Days of Disco holds promise
that these films may be more enduring than the era itself.
The film centers around a group of yuppies who have latched onto the
tail end of the disco era (in the very early 1980s).  Alice (Chlo
Sevigny) and Charlotte (Kate Beckinsale) work in a publishing house and
have recently become roommates.  Alice is the shyer of the two, and has
latched onto the brash Charlotte as an inappropriate role model.
The men in their lives aren't terribly inspiring. Des (Chris Eigeman) is
the womanizing club manager, who's willing to overlook anything (from
criminal activity to the duties of friendship). Jimmy (Mackenzie Astin)
is a struggling junior ad exec, who's used merely as a tool to get
clients access to the exclusive clubs.  And there's Josh (Matthew
Keeslar) the assistant D.A. who might be creepier than the rest of them
combined.
The film brews an odd mixture of nostalgia and contempt for the era. The
time is depicted as simple and free, and yet shallow and naive. The
characters are brimming with self importance, as if they're on the dawn
of a new era, when actually they're at its dusk.
Alice is easily the most sympathetic character of the film, but by no
means the most interesting.  That honor goes to Charlotte. Kate
Beckinsale (with a flawless American accent) portrays her with an
intoxicating mix of cruelty and seductiveness.
The dialogue is what makes The Last Days of Disco truly stand out from
the crowd.  With comments ranging from the apt to the vapid, Whit
Stillman's script crackles with wit.
The Last Days of Disco is a fascinating film to watch, whether you were
a supporter of "the disco movement", or one who cheered when it died.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Wide Awake (1998)
Here's a rarity:  a children's film that attempts to tackle a weighty
subject, Is there a God?  Done well, it could have been a gem among the
wasteland of modern children's cinema.  Unfortunately, it isn't.  With
jumbled messages, and an unclear audience, Wide Awake was better left
asleep.
Fifth grader Joshua Beal (Joseph Cross) is in the middle of a moral
crisis. His beloved grandfather (Robert Loggia) has died, and Joshua has
begun a quest. He wants to find God, to discover why bad things happen.
This religious quest is slightly disturbing for his parents (Dana Delany
and Denis Leary), but they do their best to cope with their son as he
explores different religious faiths.  At his Catholic school, his
favorite teacher, Sister Terry (Rosie O'Donnell), tries to give him
guidance, but this is a journey he must make on his own.
Meanwhile, he is having the most momentous year of his life.  He has
several adventures with his daredevil best friend Dave (Timothy
Reifsnyder), he gets his first crush, and begins to wake up to the world
around him while he is on his spiritual journey.
It is somewhat confusing as to what the real audience for Wide Awake is
expected to be.  On its surface, it appears to be a kid's film. However,
it deals with serious issues, and is likely to be boring for today's
instant-gratification kids.  And while it might seem heartening to see
that someone is trying to produce something thoughtful for the kidvid
audience, Wide Awake asks serious questions, but only delivers a cheap
gimmick for an answer.
If there were a bit more meat in the story, adults on a nostalgic bent
might get a kick out of the movie.  The actors who might have created a
great cast (O'Donnell, Leary and Delany) are wasted in roles that amount
to little more than cameos.  The nostalgic elements (best friend,
favorite teacher, first crush, etc.) have been done much better in other
movies, and actually seem more like filler here.
The film's strongest scenes are some touching flashbacks depicting
Joshua's relationship with his grandfather.  They show more depth than
is present anywhere else in the movie.  Maybe the film would have been
better if, instead of playing the relationship through flashbacks, it
were set entirely during Joshua's last year with his grandpa.  It
certainly would have been more entertaining.
Wide Awake can best be described as a failed experiment.  It starts out
with noble aspirations, but never delivers on its promise.  Parents who
do take their children to see this one ought to be prepared to answer
some tough questions...that is if their kids aren't bored to death
first.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Spice World (1997)
Talk about a movie that seemed dated before it even hit the theaters!
Spice World is the feature film debut of the pre-fabricated pop band,
The Spice Girls.  It's intended as a sort of Hard Day's Night, but ends
up simply hard to watch.
When watching the Spice Girls, I'm reminded of an old Saturday Morning
Cartoon trick (such as from The Smurfs, The Snorks, or Teenage Mutant
Ninja Turtles) in which identically animated creatures are
differentiated into characters merely by one personality quirk and a
different name.  The Spice Girls are themselves as interchangable as
Pringles, and about as talented.
There's Ginger (Geri Halliwell), the brainy one, Sporty (Melanie
Chisholm), the athletic one, Baby (Emma Bunton), the childish one, Posh
(Victoria Adams), the fashion-conscious one, and Scary (Melanie Brown),
the one with a tongue pierced back so far you're almost certain the post
sticks out her throat.
The film itself doesn't really have a plot.  It follows the girls as
they travel here and there, culminating at their "first live
performance" at Albert Hall.  The action, however, seems more like a
hodgepodge of mismatched ideas.
The various misfires include: an alien encounter, a fiendish tabloid
editor scheming to wreck The Spice Girls, the shooting of a Spice Girls
documentary, a movie producer (George Wendt) trying to pitch various
ideas for a Spice Girls movie (nearly all of which, though incredibly
far fetched, seem more plausible than the mess with which they ended
up), a meeting with a pregnant friend (whose sole purpose seems to be to
maintain the film maxim that all pregnant characters must give birth
before the movie ends), a boating adventure, a bus race, club-hopping
(wherein apparently no one notices the famous Spice Girls among the
crowd...even when they start to sing), and an assorted number of musical
performances, press conferences, and general all-around celebrity
stuff.  Whew.
For some reason, the film is littered with star cameos.  From Elton John
to Elvis Costello, from Bob Hoskins to Meat Loaf.  Heck, even Roger
Moore shows up, though he can't decide if he's parodying himself as
James Bond, or if he's lobbying to be the reincarnation of Ernst Stavro
Blofeld. Richard E. Grant has the largest secondary part, a thankless
role of the band's manager, Clifford.
The celebrity spotting is partially amusing, and a decent way to pass
the time when confronted with the rest of the film.  Neither amusing or
spontaneous, when the Spice Girls are between songs they are deadly
boring.  Their songs are alright, but they play like lifeless
adaptations of the music videos.
My advice to fans is:  stay home and watch that video collection, or at
least spin that CD a couple of more times...either option will be more
enjoyable than the film.  Non-fans should know to stay well away from
this one.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 500 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Prince of Egypt, The (1998)
When Dreamworks first set up an animation division to rival Disney, it
was a lofty goal.  And their first traditionally animated film, The
Prince of Egypt, makes some bold steps.  Telling the tale of Moses, the
film eschews Disney's traditionally comedic kid-friendly approach to
animation, in favor of a more serious, more adult style of animation.
Their experiment is a success.  While not a perfect film, its rich
visuals join with a strong storyline to create a true animated epic.
Fearing a population explosion, the Egyptian Pharaoh Seti (Patrick
Stewart) orders the murder of all Hebrew babies.  One Hebrew mother
(Ofra Haza) places her baby in a reed basket, and floats him down the
Nile to avoid his fate. Miraculously, the child ends up in the royal
palace, where the queen (Helen Mirren) adopts him and raises the baby
Moses as her own son.
Flash forward several years.  Prince Moses (Val Kilmer) and his elder
brother Prince Ramses (Ralph Fiennes) are a pair of royal
troublecausers.  They're particularly annoying to the royal priests,
Hotep and Huy (Steve Martin and Martin Short). However, Ramses, the
future Pharaoh, is also constantly worried about living up to the high
expectations set by his father.  Moses, on the other hand, is unaware of
his true identity, until a chance encounter with his real brother and
sister (Jeff Goldblum and Sandra Bullock), that is.
The brotherly conflict continues through adulthood, when each prince
takes a different path.  Ramses takes the throne and tries to expand and
surpass his father's empire.  Moses abandons his adopted family, and
instead opts for the life of a simple shepherd, and marriage to the
feisty Tzipporah (Michelle Pfieffer). But God has another destiny in
mind for Moses...one which will put him at odds with his former brother,
but which may finally grant freedom to the suffering Hebrew slaves.
With it's star studded cast, The Prince of Egypt suffers from the same
spot-the-star syndrome of Dreamworks' previous animated film, Antz.
Rather than blending seamlessly into the characters, the celebrity
voices leap to the forefront of your consciousness every time someone
speaks. (It's particularly distracting when The Voice Of God issues
forth, and, rather than being awe-struck, you're thinking, "Hey, isn't
that Val Kilmer...".)
The animation of The Prince of Egypt is nothing short of spectacular.
The special effects are appropriately awe-inspiring, but the film excels
at character detail as well.  If you're an animation enthusiast, the
quality here alone makes this film a must-see.
However, good animation aside, The Prince of Egypt can never quite shake
the mediciney feeling that this is animation which is supposed to be
"good-for-you"...both spiritually and visually. The film flows best when
it simply relaxes and lets the story unfold. However, there is a stiff
formality that hangs over several scenes of the movie.  It feels like
everyone involved tensed up at the same moment when they realized they
were doing something "important", and that translated on screen.
The Prince of Egypt has a big story to tell, and only 100 minutes in
which to tell it.  As a result, the story feels awfully rushed. Some
events are glossed over in montages, others (particularly the events
after the Red Sea) are mostly ignored.
Young children might get confused or frightened during some of the
film's more intense scenes (the plagues, for example).  But, for the
most part, the film is structured simply enough that kids should be able
to follow the story.  And though comic relief isn't stressed nearly as
highly as the standard Disney fare, there are some good humorous bits
here and there.
The flaws of The Prince of Egypt could be summed up by saying Dreamworks
was trying too hard.  The result is thoroughly watchable, and, at times,
technically brilliant, but a little stiff, awkward and rushed in places.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Small Soldiers (1998)
If Toy Story told the story of what would happen if everyone's favorite
childhood toy came to life, then Small Soldiers tells the story of what
would happen if today's violent action figures sprung to life.  The
result is a violence-filled kids movie, which has its moments of creepy
fun.
The mayhem begins when a defense contractor, Globotech, buys up the
Heartland Toy company.  Toy designers Irwin Wayfair (David Cross) and
Larry Benson (Jay Mohr) use the latest military computer chips to design
the ultimate toys:  fully interactive action figures called the Commando
Elite, and their monstrous enemies, the Gorgonites.
However, Globotech never foresaw the consequences.  When the Commando
Elite leader Chip Hazard (voiced by Tommy Lee Jones) activates, he will
stop at nothing to destroy the Gorgonites and anyone allied with them.
That anyone happens to be young Alan Abernathy (Gregory Smith) and his
neighbor Christy (Kirsten Dunst).  Alan's dad owns a small toy shop, and
Alan manages to talk his way into getting the first shipment of Commando
Elite and Gorgonite action figures.  However, soon he has an all out war
on his hands...a war which could turn deadly for his family and friends.
Director Joe Dante, who also directed Gremlins, has applied many of the
same touches to this movie.  The general theme (peaceful suburbia
destroyed by violent little creatures) is the same, and there are
several other little details which add to the same feel.
The animation is simultaneously well done and crude.  The integration of
the action figures into the real world is done superbly.  However, the
action figures themselves (made of rigid plastic) have very few
expressions.  As a result, the characters never truly come alive as in,
say, Toy Story.
The filmmakers did a good job in voice casting.  In addition to Tommy
Lee Jones, Frank Langella is cast as Archer, the lead Gorgonite.
Rounding out the Commando Elite are Ernest Borgnine, George Kennedy,
Bruce Dern, Jim Brown, and Clint Walker.  Spinal Tap's Christopher
Guest, Michael McKean, and Harry Shearer provide additional Gorgonite
voices.
The humans are mostly secondary characters.  Gregory Smith and Kirsten
Dunst are somewhat bland as the leads.  However, Kevin Dunn and Phil
Hartman add some levity as the kids' respective fathers.
But let's not kid around...the center of a film like small soldiers are
the toys and the havoc they wreak.  At times the film is a bit
subversive in its humor, and a little violent for the youngest set, but
mainly it is just plain fun.
The violence is mostly toy violence (hence no blood and guts).  However,
there are a few intense scenes here and there (but all tamer than
Gremlins).
Small Soldiers doesn't pack as much ammo as some of the bigger action
flicks this summer.  However, it has a bigger punch than a few I could
mention.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Slums of Beverly Hills (1998)
The nostalgia wave for the 1970s rolls on, this time in the guise of a
coming of age comedy entitled The Slums of Beverly Hills.
The Slums of Beverly Hills follows the path of a destitute family of
transients who make their way living in one cheap hotel after another on
the outskirts of Beverly Hills during the 70s. Why Beverly Hills, you
might ask?  Why, for the good schools, of course.
The central character of the film is Vivian Abramowitz (Natasha Lyonne),
a teenage girl who is just blossoming into womanhood.  Her father,
Murray (Alan Arkin), doesn't quite know what to do with her.  So, when
his niece Rita (Marisa Tomei) falls into his lap straight out of
rehab...it's a double blessing.  Not only does Vivian gain a sympathetic
female ear, but Rita's rich father (Carl Reiner) begins forking over a
healthy stipend to Murray for keeping Rita safe and out of trouble.
Adding to Vivian's confusion is the appearance of her raffish neighbor,
Eliot (Kevin Corrigan).  She doesn't quite understand why she finds
herself attracted to this Charles Manson-obsessed drug dealer, but she
feels compelled to explore her feelings.
The Slums of Beverly Hills rides mostly on the success of Natasha
Lyonne's sharp comic performance.  She manages to capture the confusion,
embarrassment, insecurity and the discoveries of being a teenager with
plenty of humor and insight.
Alan Arkin gives a strong supporting performance as a desperate man
trying to be a good father to his kids even though he has no ground to
stand on.  Marisa Tomei is a bit one-note as the drug-addled Rita, and
Kevin Corrigan is frankly unappealing as Vivian's love interest.
The script fumbles a bit when it comes to a few subplots.  Vivian's
plastic surgery inquiries never pan out either dramatically or
comically. And hints at a more complex relationship between Murray and
Rita fizzle out before anything happens.
But, still, The Slums of Beverly Hills is entertaining in the long run,
and Natasha Lyonne proves she's a talent worth watching.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Doctor Dolittle (1998)
Given the success of Babe, it's easy to see why Hollywood would be eager
to remake Dr. Dolittle. But, though they remembered the talking animals,
someone forgot to give this movie a sense of humor.
Even as a young boy, John Dolittle had a gift...he could talk to the
animals.  But after learning some inappropriate social customs from the
family dog (voiced by Ellen DeGeneres), he is forced to repress his
ability.  In fact he goes so far that he forgets his gift completely.
All is well until, twenty five years or so later, he receives a
convenient conk on the head.
As a grownup, John (Eddie Murphy) has become a successful doctor, and
has a wife (Kristen Wilson), and two daughters.  His partners (Oliver
Platt and Richard Schiff) and on the verge of selling their practice to
an HMO.  Just when Dr. Dolittle needs a level head, all the animals
around begin speaking to him.
The animal voices are mostly familiar, and it's actually more
entertaining trying to spot all the celebrity voices than it is
listening to what they have to say.  The most vociferous duo are Chris
Rock as the family pet guinea pig, and Norm MacDonald as a stray dog.
But John Leguizamo, Albert Brooks, Gary Shandling, Julie Kavner, Gilbert
Gottfried and others lend their pipes as well.
There are a few, a very few, funny moments with the speaking animals. If
you've seen the commercials for this one, you've seen them all. A
neurosis here, a raunchy reference there...after a while the repetitive
humor gets as stale as a box of three month old animal crackers.
When you're left with the human story in this film, you know you're in
trouble.  Your average TV sitcom has more depth than the characters here
(and at least twice the humor).  As an audience, you couldn't care less
about the whole HMO plot, which is the strongest element the human story
has in it.
As Dr. Dolittle, Eddie Murphy is stuck playing the straight man,
sidekick to the animals strutting their stuff.  However, in his previous
straight man role (that of Sherman Klump in The Nutty Professor), at
least he was a likable and interesting character in his own right.
Here, he's merely bland.
For a movie about animals, you'd expect a few animal tricks here and
there.  That's not the case in Dr. Dolittle. They simply wander about,
with animated lips thrown in later. The special effects are never
groundbreaking, but aren't too bad (except when they resort to that
guinea pig hand puppet).
If this is all animals have to say, we're not missing anything. And by
skipping Dr. Dolittle, neither will you.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for One True Thing (1998)
Director Carl Franklin tackles this small-scale tearjerker, based on
Anna Quindlen's novel One True Thing.  Although good, and appropriately
sad, it never reaches its full potential.
Ellen Gulden (Renee Zellweger) never had a good relationship with her
mother, Kate (Meryl Streep).  Instead, she has always idolized her
father, George (William Hurt), a writer of moderate reknown.  Following
in his footsteps, she is well on her way toward a career as a feature
writer at a New York magazine.
But, everything changes when she learns her mom has cancer.  Someone
needs to stay home and take care of Kate until she feels better, and
Ellen has been drafted for the job. Reluctant at first, she soon learns
how everything her mother does is much more difficult and
underappreciated than she originally thought.
Those duties aren't made any easier by the approach of the holiday
season.  Kate is thoroughly involved in the community, and her women's
group, the Minnies,  administer various holiday activities and functions
as well as decorating the entire town.  And all this falls in Ellen's
lap, who doesn't have a decorative bone in her entire body.
If all this sounds like the ingredients for a sentimental tearjerker,
well, it is. However, although blatantly sentimental, the movie never
gets as downright weepy as similar tales.  This is both a good and a bad
thing.  It's good in that the film doesn't overplay its emotional
hand...but bad in that a movie of this caliber should be able to tap
those depths of emotion without overplaying its hand.
The problem with One True Thing can't be traced to one specific element
of the film. Most everything here is done well and good.  The problem is
that there's little that is great in the film.
Case in point, take the performances.  Streep is good as the ailing mom,
but it's a performance which won't rank high along with her illustrious
career.  Zellweger holds her own in a rather large role in the company
of rather prominent actors. William Hurt seems to drift through his
part, still recovering from his Lost in Space misadventure. (As a side
note, he actually gets to mutter "Danger Will Robinson" at one point in
the film.)
Although a nice little sentimental film, One True Thing never taps its
potential. It is alternately entertaining and sad, but not the
three-hankie tearjerker it strives to be. One True Thing tops out at one
hankie, if that.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Cookie's Fortune (1999)
Director Robert Altman's latest film, Cookie's Fortune, is an easygoing
portrait of a small Southern town and its eccentric inhabitants.  The
film doesn't have a lot to say, and it takes its time in doing it...but
it's a pleasant and relaxing duration.
The main plot of Cookie's Fortune involves an elderly widow named Cookie
Orcutt (Patricia Neal).  She has three surviving relatives in the small
town of Holy Springs, Mississippi. There are her two nieces, the haughty
Camille (Glenn Close), and the simpleminded Cora (Julianne Moore).  And
then there's Cora's flighty daughter, Emma (Liv Tyler), who's just
recently returned to Holy Springs.
But the person who loves Cookie the best would have to be her friend
(and employee) Willis (Charles S. Dutton).  Taken in by Cookie's late
husband, Willis now takes care of the elderly Cookie, running errands
and fixing his famous catfish enchiladas.
The small town has its share of eccentric characters, including Deputy
Jason Brown (Chris O'Donnell), who is smitten with Emma. His rival for
her affection is Manny Hood (Lyle Lovett), the town's primary source of
catfish.  And then there's the scrabble-playing town lawyer (Donald
Moffat), and the fishing-obsessed sheriff, Lester Boyle (Ned Beatty).
Altman is a master of the layered storyline, and Cookie's Fortune is no
exception.  He weaves together all of these characters and then some,
with no one ever seeming to get the short end of the stick. Altman
juggles the multiple subplots with such ease and finesse that it is
never disruptive or confusing.
The thing to watch Cookie's Fortune for is the performance of Charles S.
Dutton.  Willis is the heart of this movie,  and Charles Dutton the role
perfectly.
Glenn Close is the closest this film has to a villain.  However, her
character is not really evil, just a control freak.  But that doesn't
stop Close from giving a shrill performance just two steps removed from
Cruella DeVille.
Still, you can't let one bad catfish enchilada spoil the whole batch.
And, in Cookie's Fortune, there's plenty to go around.  It's a change of
pace from your average film, but the result is mighty tasty.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Mighty Joe Young (1998)
They've remade King Kong, they've remade Godzilla, now Hollywood has set
their sights on another giant animal from years past:  Mighty Joe Young.
But this updated remake is more of an example of modern special effects
technology than of good storytelling.  If you're just going to see the
ape, Mighty Joe Young will suffice...but don't expect more than that.
The Joe of the title is a giant gorilla.  Not quite King Kong sized,
he's still large enough to ignite fear in the hearts of the
superstitious, and greed in the hearts of evil poachers.  But Joe isn't
a monster, he's just a misunderstood animal.  His protector is the
beautiful Jill Young (Charlize Theron), who was orphaned at the same
time as Joe when her mother, renknowned primatologist Dr. Ruth Young
(Linda Purl), ran afoul of the poacher Strasser (Rade Serbedzija).
But, despite her best efforts, Jill can't keep Joe a secret from the
world.  People like Gregg O'Hara (Bill Paxton) keep popping up. Gregg
works at an animal preserve outside of Los Angeles, and has come to the
wilds of Africa in search of a legend:  Joe.  Gregg offers to give the
big monkey a home in L.A..  But what is the best thing for Joe? To stay
home, and be hunted...or to live in a cage (a safe cage, but a cage
nonetheless).
But, wherever Joe goes, there will be danger.  Strasser is still around
(now running an animal preserve of his own, where he secretly butchers
endangered species), and still bears a personal grudge against the giant
ape.  He makes it his mission to find and kill Joe (and, of course, to
sell his remains for a huge profit), wherever he is.
Mighty Joe Young himself is the film's greatest achievement.  As a
special effect, he is truly a marvel.  He is so realistic, in fact, that
he's often more believable than the human actors in the film. That said,
his character is far from perfect...in fact, it is quite variable. At
times, he's merely a brute animal, little more than a monster.  But,
when the screenplay requires it, his IQ shoots up a hundredfold, and he
becomes a hairy Einstein, amused at the foolish antics of the puny
humans around him.
Bill Paxton and Charlize Theron are forced to play second banana to the
great ape, and neither of them show top form here.  They have both shown
much more skill in prior roles.  Here, their characters are flat and
uninteresting, and they don't seem to put much effort into making them
unique.  They're both aware that this is the gorilla's movie, and
they're just along for the ride.
The film, though advertised as the traditional Disney animal flick, is
slightly more violent than one might expect.  The film is, after all,
about a monstrously giant ape.  Still, though a few scenes might be a
bit intense for younger children, older kids should get a kick out of
Joe, and probably won't care that the rest of the film is threadbare.
You can't expect the world from a gorilla movie.  But, usually you can
expect more than just the gorilla.  Luckily, Mighty Joe's special
effects wizardry will be appreciated just as well on the small screen as
the big.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Odd Couple II, The (1998)
Since 1966, Walter Matthau and Jack Lemmon have collaborated eleven
times (remarkably, over half of those films have been in the last seven
years). However, most of their recent work has hearkened back to their
cantankerous relationship in 1968's The Odd Couple.  Grumpy Old Men and
Out to Sea were both sequels in spirit, if not in name, so it doesn't
seem like it has been thirty years since the original Odd Couple graced
the screen.  But now, our old friends Oscar and Felix have returned, a
little more vulgar and a whole lot older than before.
The old roommates have gone their separate ways, and haven't seen (or
thought much about) each other since 1981.  But, time hasn't changed
them.  Oscar Madison (Walter Matthau) is still a human pigsty, and Felix
Ungar (Jack Lemmon) is still compulsively antiseptic.
Both have gone through failed marriages, and the catalyst that brings
them back together is the upcoming marriage between their children:
Felix's daughter Hanah (Lisa Waltz) and Oscar's son Bruce (Jonathan
Silverman). The wedding is going to be held in a town about two hours
north of L.A. The two men plan to meet, rent a car and drive to the
town...but with these two, things aren't going to be that simple.
Oscar Madison and Felix Ungar were never the most complex of characters.
Each was simply a single personality trait taken to the extreme.  What
makes their characters come alive is the vibrant chemistry between
Matthau and Lemmon. The two actors simply work well together.  Whether
they are bickering or expressing their idiosyncrasies, it's a joy to
watch them together.
This time, they're helped out by a good script (by Neil Simon), which,
although it formulaically relies on a road-trip structure, has a few
genuine surprises.  The script's biggest weakness is an unnecessary coda
which seems to exist only to draw allusions to the original Odd Couple.
One problem that arises with The Odd Couple II is the age of the
protagonists. They seem like they're about 10-15 years too old for the
roles. Seeing them flirt around with Christine Baranski and Jean Smart
is like watching the antics of two dirty old men.  And when we meet with
their kids, the men seem more like grandfathers than fathers. While not
outside the realm of possibility, the film does seem to be pushing the
envelope.
Still, it is funny, and when that's true, most other considerations are
secondary. It may not be a classic like the original, but it sure is
enjoyable to revisit these old friends.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
You're not paranoid if they're really after you.  That's the message of
Enemy of the State, the latest techno-thriller from director Tony Scott
who takes an exciting, if exaggerated, look at the lack of privacy in
our increasingly technological society.
Will Smith portrays Robert Clayton Dean, a DC lawyer who unexpectedly
becomes the target of intense scrutiny, when a former acquaintance
(Jason Lee) gives him possession of a tape desperately wanted by the
National Security Agency.
You see, the tape implicates NSA bureaucrat Reynolds (Jon Voight) in a
highly unethical and illegal activity.  So, he is bringing the full
technological power of "big brother government" to track down and
recover the tape, no matter whose civil liberties get violated.
So, when Robert finds himself under constant surveillance, the target of
a smear campaign in the press, in unexpected financial distress, and in
danger of losing his very life, there's only one person he can trust.
Brill (Gene Hackman) is a security expert hired, but never seen, by
Robert in the past.  But the secretive Brill may not want to get
involved.
Enemy of the State is stuffed to the gills with an ample supply of
technology and paranoia.  Sure, it exaggerates here and there, but it
shrewdly grounds all of its hyperbole in technological fact and jargon.
We're introduced to a hidden world...a surveillance state which exists
around us even now, but the average citizen is oblivious to the
countless electronic eyes upon him.
The bad guys in the film aren't completely evil (well...okay, Jon Voight
is evil...but the rest are simple bureaucrats and technogeeks just doing
their job).  In fact, some of the most sympathetic characters in the
film are a few of those technogeeks.  However, the message of the film
is that the sum of all these earnest governmental workers "just doing
their job" add up to a powerful weapon in the hands of an ambitious
bureaucrat (like Voight).
Will Smith once again proves an amiable lead.  Taken by itself, the role
of Robert Clayton Dean is a little bland.  But Smith's charisma shines
through, and makes Dean a character worth rooting for.
Gene Hackman is, as usual, a welcome presence.  The surveillance
atmosphere of Enemy of the State favorably compares to The Conversation
(also featuring Hackman), though the latter is easily a better film.
Hackman's shrewd paranoia enlivens the film just when it begins to drag
in its second half.  So what if his character makes a few
out-of-character mistakes...it's a pleasure just to watch Hackman chew
on this meaty role.
The plot of the film is, unfortunately, coincidence-driven.  If a
certain sequence of events didn't happen in just the right order and
just the right time, there'd be no movie.  Luckily the action sequences
have enough energy that you can ignore the manufactured plot and still
have a good time.  But a truly sharp thriller should be able to combine
both plot and action.
Enemy of the State is a fun film to watch, even though it doesn't have
as much substance as it initially seems.  Still, you might think twice
the next time you spy a surveillance camera glaring your way.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Lethal Weapon 4 (1998)
After an absence of six years, the Lethal Weapon series delivers its
fourth installment.  However, this rushed production shows many signs of
a rushed production and overall wear.
It's been over ten years, and the ready-to-retire Roger Murtaugh (Danny
Glover) still hasn't left the police force.  Martin Riggs (Mel Gibson)
still has psychological issues over his dead wife.  But the majority of
their problems have already been solved in sequels past, and it is
obvious the writers were in a crisis over what to have them do.
So, they turned to several staple television gimmicks.  Lethal Weapon 4
is full of pointless subplots involving pregnancy, marriage, rumors and
deception... The franchise has become a soap opera for the action set!
The film brings back its most popular characters (even though it doesn't
know what to do with them).  Leo Getz (Joe Pesci) returns as an
annoyingly incompetent private eye.  And Lorna Cole (Rene Russo) returns
as Riggs' pregnant girlfriend (a sad turn from her meatier role in the
third installment).
And if coping with existing characters weren't enough, they introduce a
new young cop:  Lee Butters (Chris Rock) who, though he gets to do a
stand up routine or two, never quite fits in.
The plot, if you could call it one, involves illegal Chinese immigrants
used for slave labor.  The heavy this time around is Jet Li, in his
American film debut, and easily the best thing about this fourth entree.
Jet Li's action sequences in the film are simply spellbinding (and
really the only thing worth the price of admission).  Sure, he doesn't
have more than a paper thin character...but when the kicks start flying,
you don't really care.
There are a few other worthy action sequences.  (One highway chase scene
is entertaining...but somehow familiar.)  However, it is obvious this is
a series in decline.  None of those scenes compare with the similar
action sequences in the first two films (though a case could be made
against the third outing).
The characters are getting tired as well.  The Riggs and Murtaugh banter
just isn't quite as fresh as it was ten years ago.  Even Leo Getz has
become more shrill and irritating than humorous.
But for the martial arts, Lethal Weapon 4 would have been completely
pathetic.  Jet Li's moves may be fun to watch...but they can certainly
wait for video.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for How Stella Got Her Groove Back (1998)
In 1995, Terry McMillan's novel Waiting to Exhale opened up a new,
untapped, genre of film, the black women's movie.  Now, she and Exhale
co-writer Ron Bass have teamed up once again to adapt her novel, How
Stella Got Her Groove Back.  And with an excellent performance from
Angela Bassett, and some competent direction by Kevin Rodney Sullivan,
they've managed to create a thoroughly enjoyable romantic drama.
The Stella of the title is Stella Payne (Angela Bassett), a high-powered
wall street deal maker.  We never quite learn how she lost her groove,
except by her employment in the soulless money market.  However, she
begins to take steps toward her recovery when she goes on a Jamaican
holiday with her best friend Delilah (Whoopi Goldberg).
There, she meets Winston Shakespeare (Taye Diggs), a resort employee who
is literally half her age.  Attracted to him at first on a purely
physical basis, and later on, well, a purely physical basis, Stella gets
romantically involved with the kid.
As the relationship continues, Stella must cope with her family (who
disapproves... her son (Michael J. Pagan) is closer to Winston's age
than she is), as well as difficulties at her job.  Will the love of this
pair of starcrossed lovers survive?
At least Stella and Winston make a cute, if slightly unbelievable,
couple. And the delightful performance of Angela Bassett makes you want
to root for anything which will make her happy.
The movie does get a bit excessive with a few unnecessary melodramatic
touches, and runs a bit longer than it should, but for the most part it
is  charming and endearing.
The supporting cast does well, with a strong performance by Whoopi, and
humorous turns from Regina King and Suzzanne Douglas as Stella's wayward
sisters. But the best supporting player has to be the island of Jamaica,
which steals every scene it is in with its stunning vistas.  The tourist
bureau couldn't ask for a better advertisement.
As a light romantic drama, How Stella Got Her Groove Back works
surprisingly well. And, as long as you ignore its attempts at being
deeper than it really is, you'll have a good time.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Still Breathing (1998)
What happens when a confirmed cynic is confronted with the specter of
true love? That's the central dilemma in Still Breathing, James F.
Robinson's  charmingly nice romantic comedy.
The film opens with an eccentric San Antonio street performer, Fletcher
McBracken (Brendan Fraser), attempting to visualize the woman of his
dreams with an amalgam of magazine photos.  You see, the men of the
McBracken family have a gift:  they each have a vision of their true
love.  It happened to Fletcher's father, and his father's father before
him. Now Fletcher is having the visions, and he is trying to capture the
image so he can search the world for the woman of his dreams.
That woman, unknown to Fletcher, is in Los Angeles.  Rosalyn Willoughby
(Joanna Going) is a jaded high stakes con artist who bilks rich men out
of their money with an elaborate art scheme.  She has long since put
aside notions of true love in favor of a much more cynical attitude.
When Fletcher appears in the midst of his quest, Rosalyn mistakenly
confuses him for a rich mark.  But soon his eccentric ways and his
unflinching faith in his vision begin to erode her defenses, and she
finds herself unwillingly falling in love.
Still Breathing treads a thin line.  It manages to be sweet and charming
without ever becoming overly saccharine and sappy.  Its offbeat
sensibilities take a little while to warm up to (at first, Fletcher
could be mistaken for a sociopathic stalker), but given time they grow
on you.
Brendan Fraser does a superb job with his sheepishly charming street
performer.  In his best roles, he mixes confidence with a slight bit of
naoveti, as he does here.  Joanna Going is appropriately headstrong with
just a hint of vulnerability.  The two of them go well together, which
is a necessity for any romantic comedy.
If you're in the mood for a pleasant little romantic comedy, Still
Breathing hits all the right notes.  Cynicism need not apply.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Payback (1999)
Mel Gibson takes on his most unsympathetic role yet in the action
thriller, Payback. Based on Richard Stark's novel, The Hunter,
previously shot in 1967 as the Lee Marvin thriller Point Blank, Payback
tells the tale of a bad guy out for revenge.  The film doesn't aim high,
but it hits where it counts.
Porter (Mel Gibson) is dead...or so everyone thinks.  He was a skilled
thief, who picked the wrong partners, and was double-crossed.  Shot and
left for dead, he beat the odds and recovered.  Now, he's back...and
looking to get even.
But, can Porter trust those who used to be closest to him? How about
Lynn (Deborah Kara Unger), his wife?  Has she betrayed him for her true
love:  heroin?  Porter's other associates are just as questionable. His
best friend, Val (Gregg Henry), is in cahoots with The Outfit. And then,
there's Rosie (Maria Bello), the friendly prostitute who may have been
the cause of Porter's downfall.
Following his near-death experience, Porter distills all of his
emotional fury into following a strict code of honor.  Those who
betrayed him did it for $70,000, and Porter wants it back.  He's willing
to forget everything for that 70 grand...but he's willing to kill anyone
to get what's coming to him...
Porter is very definitely the anti-hero here.  And though the film is
obviously designed to have the audience root for him, it is made
evidently clear that he's not the nicest guy to be around.  You just
don't want to be on his bad side.  Gibson's performance is top notch,
though, proving that he can carry a film without relying on his charm.
(However, does Gibson have a required torture scene written into the
contract for every film he makes?)
Shot primarily in silvery tones, the film seems drained of color.  The
intent may have been to emulate the cool intensity of Porter's
determination. Or, it may have been an effort to give the film a
black-and-white feel, while still adding sparks of color here and
there.  In either case, the look of Payback is certainly distinctive.
The plot, however, is not so distinctive.  It's a bit slow at the setup,
and requires a few leaps to reach its conclusion.  But, then again,
Payback isn't about a distinctive plot.  It's all about the thrills and
satisfaction of watching a bad guy vigilante with a loose code of ethics
beat up the even badder guys.
And on this level of simple thrills, Payback works like a charm.  It's
not a movie for someone looking for the traditional hero-versus-villain
structure, but anyone seeking a little action escapism will find it
here.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Corruptor, The (1999)
The Corruptor promises a mix of Hong Kong style action with a gritty New
York cop drama, and it partially delivers each.  The action sequences
are entertaining, but not electric; the drama is interesting, but hardly
original.
The Corruptor opens as a standard buddy cop flick, with rookie Danny
Wallace (Mark Wahlberg) being assigned to the Asian Crime Unit under the
reluctant tutelage of Nick Chen (Chow Yun-Fat).  Chen is the type of cop
who is willing to cause millions of dollars of damage if it means the
bad guy goes down.  He doesn't particularly appreciate being saddled
with a rookie, especially in these tough times.
Chinatown is under a severe gang war.  The long established Tong mob,
led by the venerable Uncle Benny (Kim Chan), is confronted with the
young and violent Fukinese Dragons.  The cops from the ACU aren't
expected to solve anything.  Rather, their job is to try and keep the
violence to a minimum in order to protect tourism.
It soon becomes clear that Detective Chen is on the Tong payroll... but
is he a bad cop?  That's a question the young Danny must answer, and
quickly too, as he soon finds himself approached by Tong agents. Will
the lure of quick cash amid a hopeless situation corrupt Danny as well?
Fans of Chow Yun-Fat will be happy to know that the Hong Kong action
superstar is much more at ease in his second Hollywood film than his
first, The Replacement Killers.  The bullets fly fast and furious, and,
though director James Foley is no John Woo when it comes to an action
sequence, he is able to make the action tense and somewhat exciting.
But the highly unrealistic action sequences seem out of place in this
gritty crime drama that, apparently, is intended to be steeped in the
truth. Even for those accustomed to taking their cop movies with a grain
of salt, The Corruptor proves hard to swallow.
One of the problems is with Mark Wahlberg's character.  He starts out
believably as a green rookie, stunned motionless at the first gunfight
he encounters.  However, as the film progresses, his character quickly
metamorphoses into a savvy super action hero, complete with an
encyclopedic knowledge of Chinese.  Audience members who leave to fetch
popcorn might think they've returned to the wrong movie.
Ignoring the film's excesses, the plot of The Corruptor is at least
interesting, if a bit routine.  The story of cops on the take has been
analyzed before by countless other films and TV shows.  The Corruptor
does manage to throw in an interesting twist or two, but it wraps things
up a bit too neatly...robbing the characters of the opportunity to make
a tough moral decision.
The action sequences of The Corruptor wouldn't be terribly compromised
if viewed on the small screen...a place where the cop drama elements
would seem right at home.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Varsity Blues (1999)
The high pressure world of high school football is the subject of
Varsity Blues, a comedy with the ambition to be a drama, but without the
necessary substance.
The story takes place in the small town of West Canaan, Texas, where
high school football is the local religion.  No one in town is more
revered than Coach Kilmer (Jon Voight), who has brought home 22 Division
Championships, and 2 State Championships.  This season, he'll stop at
nothing to get his hands on yet another one.
His star this year is Quarterback Lance Harbor (Paul Walker), who just
might collect that championship title singlehandedly. In Lance's shadow
is the academic-minded second-string QB, Jonathan "Mox" Moxon (James Van
Der Beek).  Though equally as talented as Lance, Mox is perfectly
willing to let his friend take all the glory (after all, he's dating
Lance's sister (Amy Smart)).
Mox loves the game, but senses that something just isn't right.  The
parents of the players are more interested in the games than their
children's lives.  Players are encouraged (and even expected) to play
hurt. Even the dangerous exploits of players are laughed off by the
townsfolk and local authorities.  Mox realizes that everyone's
priorities are out of whack, but he's willing to simply coast along and
enjoy the ride.
The tone of Varsity Blues is severely disjointed.  There are several
moments throughout the film that feel realistic, as if we are being
treated to an expose of the dark side of high school athletics.  These
scenes are clumsily mixed with the wildly implausible antics of the
players and townsfolk of West Canaan.
Simultaneously condemning yet celebrating the culture of high school
football, Varsity Blues tries to have it both ways.  In the end, any
statement the film may have been trying to make is lost in its overall
phoniness of the movie.  It is also difficult to merely enjoy the movie
as a comedy, since the film's constant references to the dramatic
elements is like a thorn in the side.
Jon Voight delivers yet another hammy over-the-top villain in the rabid
Coach Kilmer.  He might have been a more interesting antagonist if he
wasn't so one-dimensional.  James Van Der Beek is sympathetic as the kid
who's not only physically talented, but smart and wise to boot. Most of
the other characters (such as Ron Lester's Billy Bob, or Scott Caan's
Tweeder) are played purely for laughs.
Still, though it is flawed, Varsity Blues makes a strong case that a
very good movie could be made about high school football.  Varsity Blues
is just not that movie.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Ever After (1998)
The fairy tale of Cinderella has been retold many times over the years.
However, it isn't often that such a retelling results in a film as
revisionist in Ever After.  Eliminating the fantastical elements
(pumpkins and fairy godmothers), while enhancing the romantic angle,
Ever After strives to recast the fairy tale as a misunderstood episode
in history. The result works surprisingly well.
According to this version, "Cinderella" was just a demeaning nickname
applied to the young Danielle (Drew Barrymore) by her cruel stepsisters.
Danielle's father died shortly after marrying the evil Baronness
Rodmilla (Anjelica Huston).  Rodmilla takes pity on Danielle and raises
her as a pathetic servant girl.
Danielle's stepsisters, Marguerite (Megan Dodds) and Jacqueline (Melanie
Lynsky), are, of course, pampered little snobs.  Rodmilla is grooming
them for a potential match with the eligible Prince Henry (Dougray
Scott).  However, after a chance encounter with Danielle, Henry is
smitten.
Danielle finds herself in the awkward position of playing a charade.
She pretends to be of noble birth and worthy of a prince's affections.
All the while, she struggles to conceal her blossoming relationship from
Rodmilla.
This updated telling of the Cinderella tale actually works much better
than it seems.  Despite its anachronistic class attitudes, Ever After
manages to create a lushly realistic backdrop for its timeless tale.
There is, however, one critical flaw in the story which Ever After never
addresses.  Why does the social climbing Baroness Rodmilla deign to
marry Danielle's low-born father.  It's a crucial question which
underlies the film's themes of class inequality.  However, the film
shies away from ever providing a substantive answer.
Drew Barrymore delivers a fair performance as the lead.  She's
definitely more headstrong than most previous Cinderellas.  But she's
also unconvincing at times, particularly during weepy scenes.
At least, she has a reliable supporting cast to lean on.  Dougray Scott
provides an admirable romantic interest, and Anjelica Huston is
perfectly cast as the wicked stepmother.
Romantics will no doubt enjoy Ever After, easily overlooking its flaws.
Others who attend will find, while not a perfect film, one which is
better than they hoped.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
A study in pretension, The Thin Red Line marks the infamously reclusive
director Terrence Malick's anticlimactic return to the cinema.  On the
surface, the film is a war movie, based on the James Jones novel of the
same name.  But, this film has no real interest in telling a war story
at all. Instead, the film embarks on an artsy philosophical journey to
discover the soul, a journey so long and painful that one might prefer
the war itself.
The closest thing the film has to a central character is one Private
Witt (Jim Caviezel).  At the opening of the film, he and another soldier
have gone AWOL to live in a virtual Eden with some islanders.  However,
Witt is soon captured and sent into the Battle of Guadalcanal.
A few other stories intertwine throughout the film's wanderings. Private
Bell (Ben Chaplin) pines for his wife back home.  Lt. Colonel Tall (Nick
Nolte) is eager for a battle.  Captain Staros (Elias Koteas) doesn't
share his commanding officer's bloodlust, and searches for a better way
to use his men.
But, intermingled with the war (and sometimes overlaid on top of it),
the soldiers (turned poet-philosophers) contemplate eternal questions of
life.  Is mankind apart from nature or a part of it?  Where does evil
come from?  Is war a natural phenomenon?  What is the nature of the
soul?  And other, similarly pretentious, unanswerable questions are
posed with regularity throughout the film.
The Thin Red Line is actually composed of two separate films that try,
but are never able, to merge into a complete whole.  There's the
traditional war story on one hand, delivering the overly familiar scenes
of nervous soldiers heading to battle and plunged into the hellish
thicket of combat.  The other film is a puffed-up philosophical National
Geographic piece.  Lingering shots of wildlife, the local flora and
fauna, and the idyllic lives of the Melanesian islanders intertwine with
portentous philosophical ramblings.  Though the two films are thoroughly
intercut and overlaid, there's never a sense that one relates to the
other.  Would these soldiers be thinking these thoughts?  No...it sounds
much more like the self-important words a screenwriter might dream up
than an epiphany discovered on the field of battle.
As was likely intended, most of the characters in the film blend
together (in an attempt to show the face of the every-soldier). A few
faces are distinctive, but aside from the wildly out of place (and
thankfully brief) cameos by stars such as John Travolta, George Clooney
and Woody Harrelson, only a few are memorable.  And those memorable ones
are poorly used.  Sean Penn's Sergeant Welsh, for example, is played
with intensity, but with no purpose.  Though the characters are
constantly in jeopardy, you don't really care.  In fact, the film is
orchestrated in such a way to distance the audience from even knowing or
caring about them at all.
On the bright side, The Thin Red Line boasts some very gorgeous imagery.
Shots of nature and shots of war are all examine for their inner beauty.
Unfortunately, by the umpteenth time we are shown a shot of the sunlight
filtering down through the trees, you simply wish the film would hurry
up and get over with.
Neither half of The Thin Red Line is overly bad by itself. However, the
convergence of the two creates a nightmare. Too self-important and vague
for war film lovers, and too grounded and mundane for art film devotees,
The Thin Red Line will fail to please nearly everyone.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Suicide Kings (1997)
Kidnapping thrillers seem to be the rage these days, and Suicide Kings
is a film that's so eager to join the trend that it has not just one,
but two!  But more doesn't necessarily equate to better, and the only
thing that holds the film together is a rock solid performance by
Christopher Walken.
Rich student Avery Chasten (Henry Thomas) has a problem that his friends
are trying to help him solve. His sister, Lisa (Laura T. Harris), has
been kidnapped by some goons who are demanding $2 million in ransom.
Avery's dad doesn't have that kind of liquid cash, so Avery's pal Brett
Campbell (Jay Mohr) has come up with this brilliant scheme:  kidnap
mafia don Charlie Barrett (Christopher Walken), aka Carlo Bartolucci,
and force him to pay the ransom.
Assisting Avery and Brett in this crime are Lisa's boyfriend Max Minot
(Sean Patrick Flannery), med student T.K. (Jeremy Sisto), and the
constantly worrying Ira Reder (Johnny Galecki). Meanwhile, Charlie's
hitman/driver Lono (Denis Leary) is on his boss' trail.
The first thing that jumps out at you about Suicide Kings is its
ridiculous premise. What type of brain-dead scheme is this?  I mean, are
we supposed to believe that the characters fully expect Charlie to pay
$2 million and forget about it?  True, this is supposed to be a
last-ditch effort, but the "Suicide" in the title would be a simpler way
out.
But, incredulous premise aside, Suicide Kings hums when Christopher
Walken is onscreen. Even though he spends most of the movie taped to a
chair, he's still the strongest presence in the room.  The mental games
he plays with his five kidnappers are intensely interesting, and nearly
make the movie worthwhile.
Of the five kidnappers, the only one who nearly holds his own against
Walken is, surprisingly, Jay Mohr (if only he launched into his superb
Walken impersonation...). That's not to say that the other four do a bad
job, but they all seem to wither when next to an actor of Walken's
caliber.
Unfortunately, the movie retreats from its main story too often.  Each
character seemingly has one story to tell, and as the movie mechanically
plods along, he tells it (usually in some sort of contrived one-on-one
with Charlie).  But not one of these digressions is either entertaining
or interesting.  Even the usually lively Denis Leary is subdued and
bland in his wandering subplot (which never makes that much sense).
The film's climax does contain a few good twists, but nothing an
observant viewer shouldn't expect.  However, the ultimate resolution of
those twists is disappointing.
"Disappointing" is a word that is apt to describe the whole film as
well.  Walken gives a terrific performance, and it's too bad he's duct
taped to the rest of the film like Charlie to the chair.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for King and I, The (1999)
The King and I at first seems like simply an animated adaptation of the
Broadway musical. But, upon closer inspection, it is a actually only
partially an adaptation, mixing in new "kid-friendly" (and very
familiar) characters and subplots. Unfortunately, the two never quite
mix, and the resulting movie is too adult for kids, and too childlike
for adults.
Those familiar with the Rodgers and Hammerstein musical will recognize
the rough outline of the plot.  A British schoolteacher, Anna (Miranda
Richardson, Christiane Noll singing), travels to Siam to be the tutor to
the children of the King (Martin Vidnovic).
Forbidden love is very much the subject of the film, occurring not once,
but twice.  Anna falls in love with the King, but, more unforgivably,
the King's eldest son falls in love with a servant girl.
The cartoon adds another plot, in an attempt to keep the kiddies
interested. The King's advisor, The Kralahome (Ian Richardson), is
plotting to steal the throne of Siam for himself.  He plans to use his
wizardly powers of illusion to convince the British to move in and
replace the King. To add comic relief, he has a bumbling (and rather
stereotypical) sidekick, Master Little (Darrell Hammond).
It is the addition of this secondary plot that leads to many of the
problems with The King and I.  Children will find the "forbidden love"
plot dull and uninteresting, and adults will find the evil wizard plot
painful and distracting.  Rather than seeming like one film, able to be
enjoyed on multiple levels, The King and I feels like two half-completed
films, neither of which is satisfactory.
This might be forgivable if both plots could stand by themselves.
However, the romantic plot has been gutted to a mere shell of itself.
And the scheming-royal-counselor bit was done much better (and with much
more humor) in Aladdin.
The animation of The King and I is better than your standard
direct-to-television fare, but not by much.  It certainly doesn't hold a
candle to most recent animated feature films.
The film's strongest point is easily its music.  Despite all of the
nonsensical distractions onscreen (whose idea was it to add a fire
breathing dragon to this story?), the tunes still manage to hold their
own.
The end result of The King and I is rather pointless.  Children who are
too young to be entertained by the main plot will find only slight
distractions in the questionable comic relief.  Older kids would
probably enjoy the 1956 musical just as well.  It's certainly hard to
recommend a film that plays better with your eyes closed.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for She's All That (1999)
The teen comedy traditionally comes in two flavors:  cynical or
saccharine. She's All That is a film of the latter variety.  It's
simple, straightforward and ultimately pleasing.
Zack Siler (Freddie Prinze, Jr.) has it made.  He's the class president,
the most popular kid in school, and a shoo-in for Prom King.  Yet, when
his girlfriend, Taylor Vaughan (Jodi Lyn O'Keefe), dumps him for the
obnoxious star of MTV's Real World, Brock Hudson (Matthew Lillard),
Zack's entire world is turned upside down.
However, Zack is confident that he can rebound.  So confident, in fact,
that he accepts a bet from his best friend, Dean (Paul Walker).  He
claims that he could date any girl in school, no matter how unpopular,
and get her crowned Prom Queen.
Enter Laney Boggs (Rachael Leigh Cook), the cold and distant artistic
student who becomes the unknowing object of Zack's bet.  She doesn't
care about proms or popularity, and it shows.  However, will the
intensity of Zack's attention be enough to change her mind?
Anyone familiar with Pygmalion, My Fair Lady, or even Pretty Woman,
knows all the relevant plot points that She's All That will hit.  It's a
simplistic story, and She's All That never strays far from its borders.
However, at least both of the leads are appealing.  Freddie Prinze, Jr.
seems  to fit the "class president" role well, but Rachael Leigh Cook
(though enjoyable onscreen) isn't quite the "unpopular" type.  Even with
severe glasses and a dour disposition, she seems more amiable than the
average teen. But, you can't ask for too much realism in a fantasy like
this one.
The supporting cast deliver mixed pleasures.  Matthew Lillard is
appropriately self-absorbed as the obnoxious MTV celebrity.  Laney's
brother Simon (Kieran Culkin), and Zack's sister Mackenzie (Anna Paquin)
are, at times, more interesting than their respective siblings.
However, the film's foils (O'Keefe and Walker) are painfully flat.
Older viewers, tired of this familiar formula, won't find She's All That
to be all that...but, for its target audience, high school teens, She's
All That hits the right notes.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Out-of-Towners, The (1999)
If it worked once before, why not try it again?  That seems to be the
motto behind the new comedy, The Out-of-Towners.  Not only is it
reuniting Steve Martin and Goldie Hawn (who worked wonderfully in
Housesitter), but the project bringing them back together is a remake as
well.  Unfortunately, in this case, the second time is not the charm.
The Out-of-Towners is a comedy that's not really worth the trip.
The new film borrows the basic premise from Neil Simon's 1970 comedy,
The Out of Towners, in which an Ohio couple, in this case Henry and
Nancy Clark (Martin and Hawn), travel to New York for a job interview.
In the original, Jack Lemmon was the lead, looking for a better job.
The remake is slightly bleaker, with Martin struggling to tread water,
having been fired from his old job in Ohio.
Of course, a trip to the Big Apple isn't as easy as a quick flight. The
Clarks encounter plane mishaps, luggage mishaps, train mishaps, car
mishaps,  money mishaps, and hotel mishaps...and that's just for
starters. Everything that can go wrong will...and does.
There are times when the film recalls Martin's 1987 Planes, Trains and
Automobiles (and even this year's Forces of Nature). Yet, though all
these films utilize Murphy's Law as it applies to travel, The
Out-of-Towners never quite reaches the same level of inspiration.  Yes,
lots of bad things happen, but in The Out-of-Towners they feel
over-scripted and bland. Whereas Planes, Trains and Automobiles elicited
guffaws, The Out-of-Towners merely delivers chuckles.
The entire movie seems oddly restrained.  Where's the wild-and-crazy
Steve Martin when you need him?  Sure, Martin does a little schtick here
and there (most notably after accidentally taking some hallucinogens),
but for most of the movie he is actually boring.  Goldie Hawn fares
little better.  She spends half the movie pouting about one thing or
another, and rarely gets a chance to truly shine.
The best addition to The Out-of-Towners comes in the form of John
Cleese. Playing a stuffy hotel manager (borrowing a page from Fawlty
Towers), Cleese's quick wit and eccentricities deliver a much needed
charge to this otherwise staid comedy.
But, in the end, Cleese is not enough to redeem The Out-of-Towners.  The
minor laughs it possesses aren't worth seeking out.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Knock Off (1998)
Jean Claude Van Damme's recent string of films haven't been too
inspiring, and Knock Off doesn't do anything to change the trend.
Van Damme stars this time as Marcus Ray, of all things, a designer jeans
rep.  Yes, you read that right.  He, and partner Tommy Hendricks (Rob
Schneider), rule the Hong Kong offices of V6 designer jeans...jeans so
strong that an elephant can't tear them apart. That is, unless they're
cheap knock-offs.
And knock-offs also happen to be a specialty of Marcus'.  His adopted
brother has his fingers into nearly all the counterfeiting operations in
Hong Kong.  When the latest shipment of V6 jeans is discovered to be
mostly phonies, that attracts corporate attention, in the person of
Karan Leigh (Lela Rochon).
But the knock-offs are attracting other attention as well.  It seems
that the omni-powerful Russian mafia are using them as part of an
elaborate global terrorism scheme.  This has attracted the attention of
not only the Hong Kong police, represented by Lt. Han (Michael Wong),
but also the C.I.A., with a team led by Harry Johannson (Paul Sorvino).
The best thing Knock Off has going for it is its sense of style.  With
grainy, blurry footage, camera sweeps that pass through objects,
unlikely angles, and various film speeds, director Tsui Hark at least
attempts to give the film a different visual style.  Unfortunately, most
of the time it is merely annoying. Perhaps a subtler approach that
didn't scream, "Look at me!  I'm being innovative!" might have worked
better.
But anything would have worked better than this script.  At first I
wasn't sure if it was horrendous dialogue, or just the expectedly bad
acting from Van Damme and Schneider.  But once other actors started
spouting the same pained delivery, I was getting suspicions.  But by the
time the ludicrous plot started pouring forth, I was sure.  This is one
stinker of a script.
For all it's double-crosses, deceptions and counterdeceptions, Knock Off
can't shake the slightly silly feeling at its core.  You haven't seen
ridiculous until you see the CIA's computer simulation of global
terrorism (involving a very tiny globe, and a sinister, cackling agent
that looks like he stepped off the pages of Spy vs. Spy).
The action scenes, are bearable, though, since they were filmed in
blurr-o-vision, prolonged viewing will likely cause headaches.  Again,
the film does try to be original.  It packs in such elements as an
illegal charity rickshaw race, a giant exploding Buddha, and a cargo
ship with ever-changing terrain.
Still, for all its novelty, Knock Off falls apart as easily as a
counterfeit sneaker.  Keep looking for the real thing, you won't find it
here.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Rush Hour (1998)
Brett Ratner, the director behind Chris Tucker's surprisingly funny
buddy comedy Money Talks, tackles yet another Chris Tucker buddy comedy
with Rush Hour.  Can lightning strike twice? Yes, particularly when
Jackie Chan gets involved.
James Carter (Chris Tucker) is a fast-talking streetwise cop who only
hates one thing more than authority:  the idea of having a partner.
Hmmm...since this is a buddy cop movie, guess what...he's going to get
one.
That partner is Detective Lee (Jackie Chan), Hong Kong's best detective.
Lee is summoned to the United States when his friend, and former boss,
Consul Han (Tzi Ma) has a problem.  His young daughter, Soo Yung (Julia
Hsu), has been kidnapped by a Hong Kong criminal organization seeking
revenge against Han.
The F.B.I. don't want to babysit a foreign cop, so they draft Carter for
the duty.  However, neither Carter nor Lee are content to stay on the
sidelines, and they begin pursuing leads of their own.
In his first fully American movie (at least the first since his American
"discovery"), Jackie Chan might not have the same volume of stunts as
usual, but the quality is just as good.  When watching the film, prepare
to be awestruck several times.
But Rush Hour takes the traditional Jackie Chan actionfest one step
further by adding something usually missing in his films:  good, quality
dialogue. And this is where Chris Tucker really shines.  His
fast-talking wit is nearly as spectacular as Jackie's stunts.
It's a shame that these two dynamic performers, the excellent stuntwork,
and all the humor are put in the service of such a mundane plot.  There
haven't been any fresh developments in the buddy-cop genre since the
mid-1980s, yet it is this old stalwart that we confront yet again.  And
that's not the only hoary cliche which rears its head here.  No, the
film is chock full of them.  (We even meet a demolitions expert, played
by Elizabeth Pena, whose career has entirely been made by making that
50-50 gamble: the red wire or the blue wire.)
But, still, there's more innovation here than in most of Jackie Chan's
recent efforts, and his pairing with the wildly funny Chris Tucker makes
this one worth watching despite the familiar plotting.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
Spielberg has done it again.  He revisits his familiar stomping grounds
of World War II to deliver his latest masterpiece.  This time, he
tackles the war itself, delivering a vivid portrait of modern warfare
from the common soldier's point of view.
Set during the invasion of Normandy, and in the days which follow,
Saving Private Ryan tracks the mission of the 2nd Ranger Battalion of
the 29th Infantry Division. Led by Captain John Miller (Tom Hanks),
seven of his surviving men are given an unusual mission:  to locate a
soldier, missing behind enemy lines, and send him home.
Within days, three brothers of the Ryan family were all killed in
combat, and a fourth, Private James Ryan, has gone missing somewhere
around Normandy.  To ease the suffering of the boys' mother (and to
avoid a public relations fiasco), the top brass want Private Ryan found
and sent home.
In the squad sent to find him, there is trusty Sergeant Horvath (Tom
Sizemore), who lends a needed ear to the captain, and keeps the men in
line.  Pvt. Reiben (Edward Burns) is the chief griper of the group.
Pvt. Caparzo (Vin Diesel) also has doubts. Sharpshooter Pvt. Jackson
(Barry Pepper) places his faith in God and his gun.  Pvt. Mellish (Adam
Goldberg) is a Jewish soldier who has a personal stake in the war.  Wade
(Giovanni Ribisi) is a medic, frustrated by the hopelessness of his task
during wartime.  Rounding out the group is Cpl. Upham (Jeremy Davies), a
meek mapmaker who's never seen combat, but speaks fluent French and
German.
A lot has been said of the violence in the film.  While not the goriest
film around, people expecting a traditional Steven Spielberg or Tom
Hanks film should prepare themselves for the extremely graphic scenes.
Unlike most movie violence, the violence here comes coupled with
considerable emotional impact. This is the most intense modern war movie
ever made...every casualty onscreen truly feels like an actual life, and
the impact is staggering.
The extended battle sequences are some of the most powerful moments ever
put on film. From the very start, you can barely breathe as the action
unfolds on the screen. Using discomforting handheld shots, various film
speeds, and ample use of surround sound, the result is terrifyingly
realistic.
The story of Saving Private Ryan has been very well structured. It
begins by delivering grief at a personal level:  that of Mrs. Ryan,
confronted with the loss of three of her sons (and the possible loss of
her fourth).  However, from that initial shock, the audience is able to
grasp the emotional impact of any and every soldier losing his life.
The results are staggering.
The film raises no judgments about the war itself.  These aren't men
disillusioned in the cause, but they are frustrated in that they are
placed in jeopardy for what seems like a purely public-relations stunt.
All they really want it to help quickly end the war and get home.  Why
should Pvt. Ryan be the lucky one...all of these men have mothers and
loved ones who would grieve for them?
Tom Hanks delivers a strong performance, which, while not his best, is
certainly among them.  He has to rationalize the potential and actual
loss of every man under his command, and to keep himself from cracking
under the considerable pressure. Hanks' everyman persona helps to draw
in the audience with a sense of familiarity amid the chaos.
There are a few cameos placed here and there (Matt Damon pops up as a
soldier encountered by the squad), but most of the actors in the film
are portrayed by relative unknowns.  This actually works out well,
adding an element of uncertainty (particularly in the early scenes, when
you're truly unsure of who is going to survive that first reel).
However, the entire squad gives memorable performances, and it is
difficult to single one or two actors out above the others. Tom Sizemore
is debatedly the best of the bunch, but it is a close call.
It would be difficult to say that this is Spielberg's best film
(considering his remarkable filmography).  But it is certainly among his
best...and one of the best films of this decade.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Black Dog (1998)
It's been quite a while since there was a good trucking movie, and the
streak doesn't change with Black Dog.
Jack Crews (Patrick Swayze) is an ex-con trying to make ends meet.
Imprisoned several years earlier for involuntary manslaughter, he has
lost his livelihood: his trucking license.  Now he relies on a lowly
mechanic's job to provide for his wife (Brenda Strong) and daughter.
That is, until his boss (Graham Beckel), offers him an illegal trucking
run up the east coast which will solve all his financial problems.
Reluctantly, Jack agrees, and soon he's on the road with three
suspicious characters:  Earl (Randy Travis), Sonny (Gabriel Casseus) and
Wes (Brian Vincent).
His trucking run is far from easy.  He's dogged at every turn by a pair
of federal agents (Charles S. Dutton and Stephen Tobolowsky), and a
group of inept hijackers who are trying to seize his cargo. And with
each mile Jack gets closer to home, the stakes grow higher and higher.
The film itself is named for a trucker's superstition.  Just when
everything is going good...if you push yourself too far, a black dog
will appear and take everything away from you.  However, it also happens
to be an unfortunately apt title to place on this dog of a movie.
For the record, there are a couple of good truck stunts in the film, but
not nearly enough to make this worth watching.  Most of the film is
packed with "character defining" moments which serve little purpose
except to make the dismal characters more annoying than they previously
were.
The movie actually doesn't sink to its lowest depths until the finale.
Just when you think the movie can't get any more contrived, it continues
to surprise you.
Patrick Swayze tackles the everyman-trucker role with gusto, but this
material is beneath him.  Of the rest of the cast, only Gabriel Casseus
creates a somewhat likable character.  Dutton and Tobolowsky never fall
into the easy repartee which their comic-relief roles require.  The
additions of Randy Travis and Meat Loaf (as Jack's Atlanta connection,
Red) seem like pure stunt casting.
There may be worse films out there, but that's little consolation.  Your
time would be better spent watching The World's Deadliest Truck Chases
on television.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Rounders (1998)
Rounders introduces us to the world of high-stakes poker. With an
electric cast, and some apt direction, it transforms a run-of-the-mill
storyline into a fascinating movie.
Mike McDermott (Matt Damon) is a master poker player.  He claims that
poker is not a game of chance...it's a game of skill, and he can rank
with the best.  But when a bad stroke of luck proves him wrong, he
swears off the game and concentrates on a law career, much to the
delight of his girlfriend,Jo (Gretchen Mol).
However, things are about to change.  Mike's longtime best friend, Worm
(Edward Norton), has just gotten out of jail.  Needless to say, Worm is
a bad influence upon Mike, and sooner than you can shuffle a deck, Mike
is being drawn back into the world of high-stakes poker.
The story is a familiar one, but told with a surprising amount of
freshness and energy.  Matt Damon provides narration throughout the
movie, and this is actually one of the few examples of where narration
actually works.  The narrative doesn't preclude action on the screen,
rather, it is a counterpoint.  Damon provides an insight into the mind
and strategy of a genius at work.
The games of poker themselves are fun to watch, but you don't have to be
an aficionado  to enjoy them.  John Dahl's insightful direction
highlights the moods and strategies of the game, rather than the mundane
details.  The fact of the matter is, it doesn't really matter that they
are playing poker here.  The game of choice could be chess, bowling, or
hopscotch...it merely serves as the vehicle from which the characters
are introduced.
And what an assortment of characters!  Damon's congeniality works well
in the central role.  He's a character you instinctively want to root
for.  Norton, on the other hand, sort of creeps up on you.  He's an odd
mix of treachery and charm. Even though he keeps on doing the wrong
thing, you can't help but like the guy.
The supporting cast boasts the likes of John Malkovich, John Turturro
and Martin Landau.  Malkovich is the slimy Teddy KGB, a master poker
player with ties into the Russian mafia.  His mannerisms border at times
at being over the top, but because his character is played with such
relish, it's a forgivable sin. Turturro is Joey Knish, a "grinder", who
makes a living on the poker circuit.  He admires Mike's skill, but is
also wary of a dangerous streak, and often tries to give him advice.
Landau is a sympathetic judge who is teaching Mike in law school.
Of the supporting cast, only the women (both Gretchen Mol and Famke
Janssen as Mike's former poker-playing flame) don't get any meat.
They're stuck playing questionable roles that seem to exist merely to
keep this from being an all-male cast.
Just like Mike can sum up the status of a poker game with a few careful
glances, after a few scenes, you know pretty well where the movie is
going.  However, it's a fun game, and at times worth it just to watch
the masters at play.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for No Looking Back (1998)
Edward Burns tackles his third picture with No Looking Back, and like
his previous two, it is a working-class relationship picture.  However,
unlike his previous work, the film dwells on a more personal story, and
with a female protagonist.  And in No Looking Back, he stumbles, making
a slow, boring film without the spark that enlivened his previous work.
Claudia (Lauren Holly) is a small town waitress who is feeling stifled
by her life.  She's at a turning point in her life, and feels as if
she's going nowhere.  Her boyfriend, Michael (Jon Bon Jovi), is broke
and in a dead end job.  If she were to marry him, she'd never get a
chance to escape this town.
Enter Charlie (Edward Burns), Claudia's old flame.  He skipped town
several years before, without any explanations...even for Claudia. He
has come back to town to see her, and suddenly she is torn.  Should she
stay with stable Michael, and never escape her hometown...or should she
ignore her instincts and fall for Charlie again.
Part of the answer lies in the character of her mother (Blythe Danner),
who fell for the wrong man...and has spent her life pining for Claudia's
father to return.  Now it seems that Claudia is about to make the same
mistakes.
At only a little past ninety minutes, No Looking Back is rather short
for its genre.  Unfortunately, it seems much much longer.  The storyline
is simple and uninspired, and there's a lack of energy to the whole
proceedings, which makes the entire drama rather tedious.
Edward Burns makes a misstep by casting himself in the crucial role as
the egomaniacal old flame. There's no one to restrain his ego, which
reigns unchecked. He walks into the room and Lauren Holly swoons...yeah,
right.
Lauren Holly does what she can with her central character.  But we never
understand why her character makes such pathetically bad decisions...and
we never really care.
Bon Jovi is the only sympathetic character in the whole movie. His
acting talents are much greater than they might seem, but he is given a
mostly bland and ineffective role to work with.
There's not much to recommend in No Looking Back.  It's not that the
film is bad...it's simply boring.  There's no zest in any aspect of the
film, and no reason to spend ninety minutes watching it.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Parent Trap, The (1998)
Ahhh...Disney is back with yet another remake.  This time, they tackle
The Parent Trap.  The result is remarkably amiable and entertaining, if
a bit long.
Hallie Parker and Annie James are twins (both played by Lindsay Lohan),
each of whom never knew of the other's existence.  After their parents'
quick marriage, and even quicker divorce, the two girls parted ways,
Hallie living with her dad, Nick (Dennis Quaid), in California, and
Annie living with her mother, Elizabeth (Natasha Richardson), in London.
However, a quirk of fate has reunited the girls together at a summer
camp.  After piecing together their relationship, the two set in motion
a plan to reunite their parents.  Hallie and Annie will switch places,
going home with the wrong parent.  When the mistake is realized, Nick
and Elizabeth will have to reunite to swap the kids back. And when they
do, romance will blossom once again, or so the girls hope.
As the center of The Parent Trap, Lindsay Lohan holds her own.  The twin
special effects are done seamlessly, with few "showy" scenes.  Lindsay
manages to imbue each twin with a such personality and style that it's
easy to forget there's only one actress playing both girls.
Dennis Quaid and Natasha Richardson make a good match as the parents.
They are ideal parental figures, and a cute couple together.  You root
for their reconciliation as much as the twins.
The supporting cast boasts some good comic talent. Both Elizabeth's
butler, Martin (Simon Kunz), and Nick's nanny, Chessy (Lisa Ann Walter),
are charmingly funny.  And Elaine Hendrix is appropriately witchy as
Meredith, Elizabeth's rival for Nick's heart.
With a running time over two hours, The Parent Trap is much lengthier
than the traditional kids' film.  There's enough going on that older
kids shouldn't have a problem, but the younger ones may get antsy.
Saccharine yet satisfying, The Parent Trap is entertaining enough for
both kids and adults.  Even those familiar with the original should find
something new to like here.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Simon Birch (1998)
Simon Birch is a film loosely based on John Irving's novel, A Prayer for
Owen Meany. Names, dates, plot elements and places have been
changed...so fans of the books should be wary going in.  It may not be a
faithful adaptation, but with an open mind, it's a charming little film
in its own right.
The titular character is a diminutive twelve-year-old in a small Maine
town during 1964.  Despite his small stature, Simon has a big heart.  He
means to do well, even though he's constantly getting into trouble.  The
doctors claimed it was a miracle that he is even alive, so Simon
believes God has put him here for a purpose.
His best friend is also the film's narrator, Joe Wentworth (Joseph
Mazzello, and Jim Carrey as an adult).  Like Simon, Joe is somewhat of
an outcast in the small community.  He was born out of wedlock, and his
beautiful young mother (Ashley Judd) has steadfastly refused to reveal
to anyone the identity of his father.  This is a question which haunts
Joe day and night, and he has begun his own private search for his dad.
The action all takes place over one fateful year in the lives of Simon
and Joe. They have adventures, make new friends (notably Joe's mom's new
beau, Ben Goodrich (Oliver Platt)), and at least try to stay out of
trouble under the watchful eyes of Reverend Russell (David Strathairn)
and Miss Leavey (Jan Hooks).
There are times when the film nearly gets bogged down in its own
sweetness, but it is usually saved by some smart dialogue and good
delivery by Ian Michael Smith. Both he and Joseph Mazzello quickly
establish an easy, believable rapport that is crucial for the success of
the film.  The two young actors are a credit to the film.
Unfortunately, the same can't be said for Jim Carrey's bookending
narration.  Not only does his small cameo smell of a casting gimmick,
but it is unnecessary and actually spoils two crucial plot twists later
on in the film.
It may be for that same reason, but several of the "sad" moments in the
film are strangely unmoving.  The pivotal misuse of foreshadowing
undercuts any dramatic tension in these scenes.  Moments which are
intended to be deeply touching are instead dispassionate.
Still, that's not to say the film is a failure...far from it.  The
central story of friendship is strong enough to carry the weight of
Simon Birch on its own.  Add to that a nice little portrait of small
town life in the 60s, and several funny moments, and you've got a good
little film, just like Simon himself.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Soldier (1998)
What's that smell?  Why, it's Soldier, an insipid science fiction action
yarn that makes you long for the realism of Pigs in Space.
Right now, under our very noses, if you believe the timeline the film
gives us, an elite unit of men trained exclusively to be killing
machines are being raised by a top secret military unit.  Apparently
stolen from their cradles, these children are raised, in a Clockwork
Orangian fashion, to only understand discipline and violence.
Apparently, wars of the future are fought on a very small scale.  There
are only 20 of these soldiers (who survive their training, anyway), and
they're involved in what seems to be each and every war or conflict in
space.  (Oh, yes, by the way, in the next thirty years, humankind has
colonized the known galaxy).  The best of these 20 men is known only as
Todd (Kurt Russell), as you can read from the tattoo on his cheek.
In any case, this elite group of soldiers has never lost a single man
(at least until the main plot of the movie gets underway, that is).  You
see, the soldiers are being replaced.  There's a new breed of tougher,
faster, stronger soldiers (without hair, even) which are being
introduced.  And, since there can only be 20 soldiers in the entire
galaxy, Todd's unit is being retired...forcably.
For some reason, even though this replacement project must have been in
the works for most of the time he's been in command, the head of Todd's
soldier unit, Captain Church (Gary Busey), knows nothing about the
replacements, and doesn't believe in their superiority.  What better way
to test your men than to have them fight to the death?  Well, you can
guess the outcome... Todd's unit has been replaced, and Todd (mistakenly
thought to be dead) is simply thrown down the nearest trash chute.  Hey,
do you have a better way to dispose of a corpse?
Well, conveniently, Todd's coma lasts for the entire duration of an
interstellar flight to the local trash planet, where he's luckily dumped
on the top of a giant trash heap (rather than underneath it).
Strangely, this planet has incredibly strong windstorms that apparently
ignore these huge trash piles, which remain standing despite the 300+
mph winds.
Anyway, as luck would have it, there's a lost colony of humans thriving
amid the trash and the winds.  This colony adopts Todd as a pet.  But
can a man who's been bred for forty years to kill and to obey ever learn
to cope in normal society?  Or is there a conflict just around the
corner which will utilize all of Todd's lethal training?  You be the
judge.
Granted, Kurt Russell is supposed to be playing a virtually emotionless
soldier, bred only to kill and obey, but his performance is so flat,
glassy-eyed and featureless, that he's actually out-performed by a
garden snake! Just because you're an emotionless killing machine,
doesn't mean you have to  be uninteresting (just take a look at the
Terminator series).  But one look into the blank stare of Russell's
soldier makes you yearn for the thespian talents of Arnold
Schwarzenegger, or, heck, even Steven Seagal.
As the film blunders from one cliched subplot to another, it's actually
stunning to note the absolute lack of creativity on the screen.  The
closest thing the film ever gets to originality is in creating elaborate
death sequences.  And even those are foreshadowed so heavily, you could
probably name them before the deaths ever happen.
The only way in which Soldier is conceivably enjoyable is in a Mystery
Science Theater 3000 sort of way, in which, reveling in the absolute
horridness of the mess on the screen, you create your own entertainment
in the way of joking insults.  But, even then, you'd have to be pretty
desperate to pin your entertainment hopes on Soldier.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Real Blonde, The (1997)
Tom Dicillo directs this superficial comedy about superficial people in
superficial careers, all searching for deeper meaning. However, they
won't find much meaning in The Real Blonde, and not enough real humor,
either.
Joe (Matthew Modine) is a struggling actor, or he claims to be one, even
though he has no credits under his belt.  His girlfriend, Mary
(Catherine Keener) has no pretensions about her career:  she's a makeup
artist, working for the eccentric fashion photographer Blair (Marlo
Thomas) and supermodel of the month, Sahara (Bridgette Wilson).
Sahara, who has acquired a new age spirituality from repeated viewing of
The Little Mermaid, has an on-again, off-again relationship with Joe's
best friend, Bob (Maxwell Caulfield).  However, Bob has gotten his
biggest break yet:  a starring role on a soap opera opposite the
beautiful Kelly (Daryl Hannah), who may be that illusive woman he's
always pursued: a real blonde.
There are some moments of good humor in The Real Blonde, but not enough.
The best stuff is in throwaway details in the background, such as
Sahara's perfume ads: "Depression - It's Not Just a State of Mind". But
to find humor in the superficiality of models and actors is to shoot
fish in a barrel.
And, unfortunately, the film's forays outside the realm of comedy are
pathetic.  Take for example the film's framing device of an old lady and
her dog.  The story serves absolutely no purpose, makes little sense,
and is completely tangential to the main plotlines of the movie.
Matthew Modine and Catherine Keener have the most sympathetic characters
in the film, but they're stuck in the most boring plotlines.  Modine
whines and complains and would be completely pathetic if he was matched
against someone stronger than Elizabeth Berkley, who appears as another
struggling actor.  Keener's character has a stronger edge, but the
insult self-defense class (taught by Denis Leary, no less) she is stuck
in makes little sense.
The movie's running time is under two hours, but it seems like it is
well over it. There's just not enough humor to speed things along, and
not enough meaning to propel any drama.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Quest for Camelot (1998)
Everybody wants a piece of the Disney animated pie.  It's too bad that
most of the newcomers, such as Warner Brothers' Quest for Camelot,
concentrate more on replicating the Disney formula of story elements,
and less on the overall quality of animation.
Quest for Camelot tells the tale of Kayley (Jessalyn Gilsig speaking,
Andrea Corr singing), a young girl who dreams of being a knight of the
round table in Camelot, just like her father, Sir Lionel (Gabriel
Byrne). She gets a chance to prove herself when the exiled knight Sir
Ruber (Gary Oldman) hatches a plan to steal King Arthur's famous sword
Excalibur, along with Kayley's mother, The Lady Juliana (Jane Seymour).
But when Ruber loses the sword in the Forbidden Forest, Kayley sees it
as her chance to recover the lost weapon for the King. (The film never
quite explains why all the knights of the round table are simply sitting
on their thumbs back in Camelot.)  Evading Sir Ruber and his legion of
half-human half-weapon henchmen, Kayley teams up with the blind hermit
Garrett (Cary Elwes speaking, Bryan White singing), his seeing-eye
falcon, and a two headed dragon, Devon and Cornwall (Eric Idle and Don
Rickles).
The animation of Quest for Camelot is very inconsistent.  There are a
few key shots which are done very well (The Forbidden Forest vs. the
Griffin, for example, or the attack of the fire breathing dragons).  The
rest of the film is shortchanged.  It ranges from barely passable to
glaringly awful.  Kids who watch the film may not care, but apparently
neither do the filmmakers.
The story follows a standard formula, and there's not much to surprise
anyone here.  They might be trying to score some points by having a
female hero and a blind sidekick (who only acts blind on the rare
occasions the script calls for it), but that's about the only thing
unusual in the film.  Even the songs seemed tired and routine, having no
individual flavor or style.
There are a few nice touches here and there (the liveliness of the
Forbidden Forest is interesting, and a few passing moments of humor, but
for the most part, Quest for Camelot is dull and lifeless (particularly
when compared to the average Disney cartoon, or even Fox's Anastasia.)
Children may get a kick out of seeing the film once or twice, though it
doesn't bear the hallmarks of being a child's favorite must-watch film.
Adults, on the other hand, will simply have to suffer through.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Go (1999)
Documenting the wild and unbelievable events  that happen to a
collection of twentysomethings and teens in Los Angeles, the exuberant
movie, Go, is a film that doesn't feel original, yet sure is fun to
watch.
The film intertwines three stories over one fateful Christmas Eve. The
first revolves around grocery store clerk Ronna (Sarah Polley).  She  is
about to be evicted from her apartment, unless she can come up with  the
necessary money in the next 24 hours.  Hope comes in the form of two
bickering actors (Scott Wolf and Jay Mohr), who are looking to score
some ecstasy for an all-night rave.  Ronna decides to do this one time
drug deal for some quick cash...but quickly gets in over her head.
The second storyline follows four thrillseekers (including Desmond
Askew, Taye Diggs, and Breckin Meyer) on a Christmas trip to Vegas.  The
twenty-four hours that follow seem to spring from both their wildest
fantasies and nightmares.
The final story brings back elements of the first two, as the
aforementioned actors, Adam and Zack have their own set of
misadventures.  Primarily, they center around the duo's run-in with a
mysteriously eccentric character, Burke (William Fichtner). But the
story launches from there to tie in elements of the other two plotlines
as well.
It's impossible to watch Go without thinking about Pulp Fiction, but at
least in this instance, the comparison is favorable.  Both films tell an
anthology of stories, with titles preceding each one, and a non-linear
chronological structure.  But whereas Pulp Fiction was about criminals
who were shockingly acting like normal people, Go is rather about normal
people who are shockingly acting like criminals.
One thing that sets Go apart from the pack is the acting.  From the
leads, down to the supporting members, each actor has been flawlessly
cast.  However, Sarah Polley certainly stands above the crowd. From The
Sweet Hereafter to her performance here, she is proving herself one of
the most talented actresses of her generation.  Another great
performance comes from William Fichtner (another Pulp Fiction nod), who
gives the film a fine, creepy supporting performance.
The plot of Go is well written, and is able to stand on its own, even
without the borrowed structural gimmick.  The dialogue is sharp and
lively, and there are plenty of twists and turns to keep everyone on
their toes.
The intelligence of the script, the director and the actors allows Go to
rise above the level of a simple copycat picture.  Funny, shocking and
overall entertaining, Go delivers.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Deceiver (1997)
Deceiver is a plot twist in search of a movie.  This overly constructed
film succeeds in having many surprises, and, being true to its title,
being deceptive. But there is little in the film that is worthy of
deceit.
Braxton (Chris Penn) and Kennesaw (Michael Rooker) are two cops
investigating the brutal murder of a prostitute (Renee Zellweger).
Their lone suspect is Wayland (Tim Roth), a wealthy young man whose
phone number was found in the hooker's pocket.
However, a routine lie detector test turns against the investigators, as
the crafty Wayland somehow turns the tables.  Braxton and Kennesaw are
forced to confront their own troubled lives.  Braxton is a gambling
addict in deep to Mook (Ellen Burstyn), a local bookie. Kennesaw is
bitter about his marriage to a socialite (Rosanna Arquette), believing
his wife to be unfaithful.
The plot is twisty and complex, with lots of lengthy flashbacks, and
plenty of surprises.  However, there are times when it is needlessly
complex, and at least one instance the storytelling turns so muddled
that the answers to important plot points actually get lost.  Take a
look at L.A. Confidential, or the film's more likely inspiration, The
Usual Suspects for how a complex plot can properly be handled.
The dialogue in Deceiver is as overcrafted as the plot.  For example,
the film tells a few substories (such as the tale of a woeful absinthe
bender, or an alternative telling of how Van Gogh lost his ear), but
they are so flat and so plastic that they come off as prefabricated and
unbelievable. There's never the sense that these are real characters
engaging in conversation. They appear to be nothing more than words on a
screenplay.
The characters, themselves, are rather pathetic and despicable.  Not one
of them is an ounce sympathetic, and as a result, the labyrinthine plot
is all for naught. What does it matter who is guilty of what and why?
Writer-directors Josh and Jonas Pate seem to desire to emulate the Coen
brothers' masterwork Blood Simple, or the Wachowski brothers' less
worthy Bound. But, while they have got the plot twists down cold, they
need to work on characterization and dialogue.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Mod Squad, The (1999)
The Hollywood creative rut of recycling old TV show reruns has finally
gotten deep enough to reach The Mod Squad.  A ridiculous show to start
with, should we be surprised that it has spawned an even more ridiculous
movie?
It seems that the qualifications to work as a cop are completely
optional.  At least that is what Detective Greer (Dennis Farnia) decides
when he recruits three young criminals to form an elite, though
weaponless, undercover squad...the Mod Squad.  Whose great idea was
this?!?  The film conveniently starts in media res, so we never get to
hear Greer's arguments for turning the justice system on its head.
In any event, the Squad is composed of Julie (Claire Danes), Linc (Omar
Epps) and Pete (Giovanni Ribisi), guilty respectively of assault, arson
and robbery.  Their mission in the movie is to infiltrate a high class
prostitution ring.  Oh, and to look cool while doing it.
But things quickly go wrong.  Soon, The Mod Squad are embroiled in a web
of murder, deceit, drug deals and police corruption.  Before you jump to
the conclusion that this sounds interesting, let me assure you that any
life and excitement that may have one time inhabited this plot has long
since fled the scene.
The Mod Squad's best attribute, nay, its only positive attribute, is its
sense of style, and even that is troublingly forced.  Shot with moody
colored lighting, and the occasional wild angle, The Mod Squad is less
of a film that an extended length music video...without the
entertainment factor.
There are a few good actors buried under the moldy plot and pointless
dialogue.  The film tries to give each of the Mod Members a poignant
scene or two.  Julie runs afoul of an old flame (Josh Brolin), Pete
tries to reconcile with his parents, and Linc...well, Linc really likes
his car.
But then, there's the plot.  Ugh...what a plot!  The whole thing relies
on the bad guys clearly stating their evil intentions in a loud enough
voice to make any James Bond villain proud.  I guess since policework is
this easy, it's no wonder any random criminal can be a cop.
And don't go to see The Mod Squad expecting any excitement.  The
characters themselves even remark how incredibly boring it is, sitting
around in cars.  And yet, nothing is ever done to liven things up.  Even
the few "action" scenes are dull and lifeless.
The Mod Squad is the type of film that is best enjoyed merely from
watching its commercials.  Subject yourself to this mindless movie in
quantities larger than 30 seconds, and you'll certainly regret it.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Love and Death on Long Island (1997)
An obsessive stalker seems an unlikely comedic hero, but the recent
comedy Love and Death on Long Island actually manages to pull it off, to
a little extent.  Though it gets awkward at times, the film is mildly
amusing.
Giles De'Ath (John Hurt) is a reclusive London author who has eschewed
most modern conveniences in favor of a simpler life.  However, a
disruptive set of circumstances sets Giles off to watch the latest E.M.
Forster film when he stumbles upon a trashy teen flick, Hotpants College
II. Dismayed at first by his mistake, Giles is soon transfixed by the
actor in one of the film's smaller roles: teen heartthrob Ronnie Bostock
(Jason Priestley).
At first it seems just a passing fancy, but soon Giles' desire to know
all things Bostock turns into an obsession.  He sets out for Long
Island, where he begins to stalk (though with good intentions) the teen
idol and his supermodel fiancee, Audrey (Fiona Loewi).
John Hurt gives a delightful performance of a confused man faced with an
inexplicable obsession.  He has two wellsprings of humor: his
unfamiliarity with the modern conveniences of life, as well as the
convolutions he must go through to self-justify his crush (watching him
expound on the artistic merit of such Bostock classics as Tex-Mex and
Skidmarks is a hoot).
For his part, Jason Priestley gives a richer performance than you
expect, even though he's playing a vapid teen idol with little talent
beyond his looks.  His Ronnie Bostock is a limited actor who doesn't
quite understand his limitations, and yearns for more.  Priestley adds
subtlety to a role which could easily have been a simple stereotype.
The script, written by director Richard Kwietniowski, is at its best
when it is light and comical.  But, given the subject of a film like
this, you know it can't end well.  Given that, Love and Death on Long
Island pulls out a better ending than you might expect, but it is still
an uncomfortable one.
But, though it has its share of faults, there are several amusing
moments throughout the film.  It's probably not worth hunting down in
it's limited release theater, but as a second-choice video rental, this
one might fit the bill.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Gloria (1999)
Gloria is a remake of the 1980 John Cassavettes drama about a streetwise
woman who ends up protecting a child from the mob.  A good lead
performance keeps this otherwise sluggish film from becoming a disaster,
but it's a mild redemption at most.
Gloria (Sharon Stone) has spent the last three years in a Miami jail,
covering for her sleazy gangster boyfriend, Kevin (Jeremy Northam). Upon
being paroled, what is the first thing she does?  Breaks parole by
hopping a jet back to New York.  She seeks out Kevin, hoping  to find a
changed (and grateful) man.
Kevin, of course, could care less about his trashy girlfriend.  He's a
mid-level gangster in the Irish mob, and he has other things on his
mind. Most notably, an accountant in his employ has made a copy of all
the bribes and payoffs.  Kevin's lackey Sean (Mike Starr) goes
overboard, and kills the accountant, and his entire family...all except
the young Nicky (Jean-Luke Figueroa), who, as luck would have it, has
the disk with the incriminating data.
Wouldn't you know that Gloria and Nicky would get together.  The
tough-talking Gloria's long-dormant maternal instincts kick into high
gear as she does her best to protect the little kid from the wrath of
the mob.  But is this a challenge that even Gloria can't face?
This movie belongs to Sharon Stone.  Her plucky, streetwise Gloria is
the best thing about the film.  She tackles the role with plenty of
brass and personality.  Though her character begins to get a bit grating
as the film winds to a close, she's still head and shoulders above the
rest of the cast.
However, though Sharon does her part, the rest of the movie doesn't keep
pace. The bad guys are as generic as the "find the floppy disk" plot.
The film's few action scenes are sluggish and dull.  Even the developing
mother-son bond between the spunky kid and the spunkier Gloria is rather
trite and contrived.
A few good actors in some small roles here and there don't make a
lasting impression.  George C. Scott stumbles as mob boss Ruby.  Bonnie
Bedelia is downright irritating as Gloria's better-off sister, Brenda.
Only Cathy Moriarty is able to add some zest to the proceedings, as the
woman Gloria might have become.
Gloria is not quite good enough to recommend purely on the basis of
Sharon Stone's performance.  But that performance is good enough to
avoid an all-out pan.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for My Giant (1998)
Billy Crystal reappears in yet another high concept comedy.  He tries to
infuse some life into it, but it gets bogged down with sentimentality
and a lack of sophistication.
Sammy (Billy Crystal) is a struggling agent at the end of his ropes.
He's separated from his wife, Serena (Kathleen Quinlan), and down to his
last serious client...in a low-budget film shooting in Romania. But in a
turn of bad luck, Sammy wrecks his car...only to be mysteriously saved
by a giant (Gheorghe Muresan).
But this giant has a heart of gold.  He leads a solitary life, helping
out the monks at a local monastery.  His only longing is for his long
lost love, Lilianna (Joanna Pacula), who has since moved to America.
Sammy, seeing a golden ticket, convinces Max to become an actor
(represented by Sammy, of course), and come back to America.
And so Sam and Max bounce from pathetic job to pathetic job, with Sammy
dangling a meeting with Lilianna as a carrot before Max's nose.  But
slowly Sammy's deceptions begin to haunt him.  But will he develop a
conscience before the innocent Max becomes disillusioned.
The humor in My Giant isn't the world's greatest.  Mostly, it falls
under the category of "boy...he's so big!", and that can only go so far,
no matter how hard the talent tries.  Still, its slightly amusing parts
are longed for when the movie gets bogged down in sappy moments.
The film's best moment (and that's not saying much) is a bit part by
Steven Seagal, playing himself.  Between Executive Decision and this,
all of Seagal's best roles have been cameos.  Maybe he should consider a
change of work:  Steven Seagal, the character actor!
Gheorghe Muresan isn't a natural actor at all, and his thick
cotton-mouthed accent certainly doesn't help.  In fact the only thing he
adds to the role is his immense stature.  Originally, the concept was
designed several years ago for  Andre the Giant.  Andre also had a hefty
accent, but he displayed a knack for comedy in The Princess
Bride...something Muresan should have studied for some pointers.
Why does Billy Crystal continually get caught in these pathetic
comedies? He's proven that he can be much funnier than these formulaic
films allow him to be, and yet, like a glutton for punishment, he keeps
coming back. That doesn't mean we have to.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for There's Something About Mary (1998)
Peter and Bobby Farrelly (the writer/directors of Dumb and Dumber, and
Kingpin) have turned their sights onto a romantic comedy.  And in
There's Something About Mary, the masters of bad taste have managed to
create a surprisingly good film, their best work to date.
Ben Stiller plays Ted, a writer, who is still struggling with a teenage
crush formed thirteen years ago.  Back then, he, a pathetic loser, fell
in love with Mary (Cameron Diaz), the most beautiful girl in school.
Alas, fate intervened and kept them apart, but Ted has been stricken
ever since.
Following the advice of his best friend (Chris Elliott), Ted hires a
sleazy private detective named Pat Healy (Matt Dillon) to track down his
long lost love. However, when Pat finds her, he discovers there's
something about Mary that makes just about every man fall in love with
her.  Pat decides to forget about Ted and pursue Mary himself.
This may sound like your typical run-of-the-mill romantic comedy, but
don't be fooled.  The Farrelly brothers have applied their unique comic
sensibilities, and manage to toe one step further over the line.
There's Something About Mary is crude, vulgar, offensive, and in
exceedingly bad taste, but it's painfully funny.  Not every joke hits
its intended target, but plenty of them do.
Unlike the previous Farrelly films, the characters aren't merely stupid
people doing stupid things.  Instead, there's actually some time spent
developing the characters.  Granted, they still are pretty flat, but it
is a giant step forward. Surprisingly, the additional depth makes the
humor all the more funny (because we're finally able to see it in
contrast).
The cast is outstanding.  Ben Stiller manages to inspire just the right
amount of pity for his pathetic loser.  Matt Dillon makes appropriate
amounts of slime seethe from his pores.  And Cameron Diaz...well, she
fills the role.  She doesn't get to enjoy the comic romping of her
costars, but she simply radiates charm.
If you are easily offended, skip this one, for there's something here
that'll offend even the most jaded moviegoer.  However, if you're open
for low humor (and this one gets as low as it goes), There's Something
About Mary may be the funniest movie you've seen in quite a while.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Tarzan and the Lost City (1998)
Though technically a sequel to Greystoke: The Legend of Tarzan, Tarzan
and the Lost City boasts none of the same cast, and even less quality.
It's a difficult task to make a Tarzan movie on the heels of the
successful George of the Jungle, one that Tarzan and the Lost City just
isn't quite up to.
The action picks up with Tarzan (Casper Van Dien) in London, about to
come into his inheritance as Lord Greystoke, and preparing to wed the
lovely Jane (Jane March).  However,  his bliss is interrupted by a
mystical vision from his homeland which sends him (and Jane) packing
back to Africa.
An evil poacher, Nigel Ravens (Steven Waddington), is on a quest.
Certain artifacts (which he has plundered from the corpses of dead
tribal chieftains...during their funerals, no less) point him to the
lost city of Opar, the cradle of civilization. Tarzan is asked by an old
friend, the tribal shaman Mugambi (Winston Ntshona), to prevent Ravens
from reaching (and plundering) his goal.
One of the many problems that plague this movie is in this summons.
Mugambi is given such godlike magical powers (from shapeshifting to even
resurrection) that it is unlikely that he'd need the assistance of
anyone so comparatively pathetic as Tarzan!  Why doesn't he simply wave
his magical hands and make those mean ol' poachers disappear?
Ahh...but then, this wouldn't be a Tarzan movie.  (And I suppose a
Mugambi movie is a tougher sell.)  But, on the other hand, Van Dien
doesn't make a particularly convincing Tarzan.  True, he does have the
Tarzan yell...but it sounds canned, as if someone had tape recorded a
clip from the old movies.  Van Dien merely places his hands by his mouth
and the sound appears.
But then that's par for the course in a film filled with shoddy special
effects.  It's hard to imagine a giant snake that's even more
fake-looking than the one in Anaconda, but somehow this film succeeds.
But then, it looks right at home among the hideous gorilla suits,
styrofoam boulders, and Power Ranger-quality magical warriors.
Tarzan and the Lost City was a film released with little fanfare, and
deserves to remain that way.  Tarzan devotees would be better served by
waiting at least until next year's Tarzan cartoon by Disney, and leaving
this one to the wild.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Senseless (1998)
Senseless is a prime example of what can happen when you try to push a
one-joke concept a bit too far.  Director Penelope Spheeris is no
stranger to this, having subjected audiences before to such tortures as
The Beverly Hillbillies.
Marlon Wayans stars as Darryl Witherspoon, a college senior vying for a
lucrative job at a prominent brokerage.  However, he lacks the
advantages of his chief opposition, Scott Thorpe (David Spade, in the
smarmy sort of role he can deliver in his sleep): an athletic record,
sponsorship by a fraternity, and, most of all, a wealthy family to back
him up.  In fact, Darryl has to work at four jobs simply to make ends
meet.
But there may be a light at the end of that tunnel.  He signs up as a
human guinea pig in a neurological experiment run by the university's
Dr. Wheedon (Brad Dourif).  As a result, his senses are magnified
tenfold. Using his newfound abilities, he sets himself in complete
pursuit of the job (unaware that there may be some disadvantageous
side-effects to having super senses).
Naturally, Marlon Wayans plays this comedy at full throttle, giving Jim
Carrey-ish amounts of physical humor.  The problem is, aside from a few
genuinely inspired bits, there's not much that's funny here.  The film
has it's one central gag, and pads out the rest of its length with
rather obvious lowbrow humor.
There obviously wasn't much thought put into the plot.  The entire job
selection process is completely ridiculous. I mean, why the emphasis on
extra-curricular activities if the entire job is going to come down to a
single-elimination quiz anyhow? And is this the only job being offered
to economics majors this semester?
To give it credit, Senseless does try to create a secondary joke with
Darryl's roommate, Tim LaFlour (Matthew Lillard).  Apparently, he is
supposed to be faddish, but the film never does anything with him,
leaving him in a piercing phase throughout the movie.  His
"intervention" scenes with Darryl, however, do provide a rare, and
welcome, laugh.
And then there's the love interest which is always pathetically tacked
onto comedies like this one.  In this case, the object of Darryl's amor
is Janice (Tamara Taylor), a fellow student who won't have anything to
do with Darryl until he gains his super-senses.  Needless to say, the
romance is completely extraneous, and adds little to the film.
This is a film that desperately needed something else.  Be that a good
plot, more jokes (or simply funnier ones), or a strong character or two,
anything would have helped Senseless get off the ground.  As it is, all
the manic exuberant mugging in the world can't help Marlon Wayans get
this one off the ground.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Sphere (1998)
For many years, Michael Crichton's novel Sphere has sat around simply
awaiting a film adaptation.  However, unlike his more recent novels
(which are almost published in screenplay format), Sphere makes an
attempt at some genuine science fiction ideas...concepts which don't
lend themselves toward easy screen translation.  But, finally, director
Barry Levinson has tackled the screen project.  The result, though, is
mixed.
Several years ago, psychologist Norman Hoffman (Dustin Hoffman) drafted
a report for the government detailing procedures for a possible first
contact with an alien life form.  Thinking it was a bureaucratic
boondoggle, he whipped out a half-serious report that named several of
his colleagues as members of the first contact team.
Now he has been called out to the South Pacific, where that very team
has been assembled.  There's mathematician Harry Adams (Samuel L.
Jackson), astrophysicist Ted Fielding (Liev Schreiber), and biochemist
Beth Halperin (Sharon Stone), with whom Norman had a brief romantic
fling several years before.
The team is there to investigate an alien spacecraft which apparently
crashed into the bottom of the ocean 288 years before.  Barnes (Peter
Coyote), a military officer, is overseeing the operation, which involves
transferring the team to a mobile habitat on the ocean floor.  But they
aren't quite prepared for what is uncovered in the
spacecraft...something mysterious and profound...but possibly deadly.
James Cameron tackled similar subjects, but with much greater success,
in his 1989 underwater epic, The Abyss.  Here, despite the talented
cast, many of the shocks lack impact, and the wonders just don't quite
seem so wondrous.
Too often, it is left up to the dialogue to explain the mood and
atmosphere. This is fine when the characters themselves are creating
that mood, but when it is generated by their situation, the audience
should be able to feel the dread without having it explained for us.
The cast is what saves this movie from being a disaster, though none of
them are at the top of their form here.  Hoffman manages to be the
central link for the audience, even though his performance is rather
flat. Samuel L. Jackson has a good turn as the mathematician who may
think too much for his own good.  Sharon Stone has the meatiest role,
but never sells the audience that she is on the borderline of a
breakdown.
A few of the sequences actually do work, and there are times when the
film almost manages to create a mood.  But these intermittent flaws
eventually pass.
The film's final revelation was a little hokey in the book, and is even
more so when writ large upon the screen.  The film strives to be
profound, but ends up being forgettable.
There are gleams here and there of several intriguing ideas, but they're
never fully realized.  If you relax and go with the flow, Sphere ends up
being a mildly enjoyable, but, overall, an unsatisfactory experience. If
you're looking for truly thoughtful science fiction, go out and rent
Contact, and skip Sphere.  However, if you're just looking for a
diversion, Sphere may fit your bill.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Jawbreaker (1999)
The high school comedy seems to be a hot genre of the moment.  With
She's All That and Varsity Blues behind us, and several more set for
release later in the year, the teen comedy seems to be experiencing its
own Renaissance.  However, you wouldn't know it from the quality of the
latest entry:  Jawbreaker. This shockingly bitter candy definitely has a
sour center.
The most popular, and most feared, clique at Reagan High School have an
unexpected dilemma.  They have accidentally killed one of their own, the
"teen dream", Liz Purr (Charlotte Roldan), choked on a giant jawbreaker
during a kidnapping prank for her 17th birthday. Now the three surviving
girls must decide what to do.  It takes little time at all for the
group's leader, Courtney (Rose McGowan), to decide to cover it up.
The ditzy Marcie (Julie Benz) is game to go along, but the clique's
final member, Julie (Rebecca Gayheart), has a guilty conscience.  To
make things worse, another student, the hopelessly geeky Fern Mayo (Judy
Evans Greer) accidentally discovers the truth.  The girls' cover is
surely blown...
Not so fast.  Thinking quickly, Courtney offers Fern a
once-in-a-lifetime chance.  After a quick makeover, Fern is transformed
into Vylette, the beautiful "new girl" at school, and a full-fledged
member of the popular crowd.  Does this mean that popularity is the key
to getting away with murder?  Or will this finely honed plan crack over
time?
Jawbreaker is obviously attempting to be the Heathers of its generation,
and failing miserably, I might add.  It manages to capture the mix of
murder and teen social observations, but misses three crucial elements:
sharp dialogue, witty characters and the much-needed humor.
It is possible that Jawbreaker might have succeeded in being (darkly)
humorous if it wasn't shackled to its dead-weight plot.  The film's most
innovative twist is the makeover of Fern Mayo.  At this point,
Jawbreaker seems poised to spin wildly into the uncharted depths.  But
then,  all of a sudden, the innovation stops.  The film becomes mired in
the murder-and-cover-up plotting, which quickly saps what little life
and energy there was right out of the film.
In the film, Rose McGowan fares the best.  As the manipulative clique
leader, she truly dominates every scene she's in (not a difficult feat
in a crowd such as this, however).  It's a character crying out for a
better movie (or at least another decently drawn character with which to
interact.)
Jawbreaker doesn't quite know how to handle its semi-likable characters:
Fern and Julie.  Either one could effectively end the movie at any time
by simply revealing what she knows.  The lengths to which the film goes
to prolong the plot have the unintentional effect of distancing us from
these characters.  As their motives become murky and unclear, the film
finally falls to the point that it doesn't really matter who wins or
loses, since all sides have become equally detestable.
"Detestable" is a good word to describe the film, Jawbreaker.  It's
certain that, like the murder weapon described in the film's title,
Jawbreaker will be triggering more than one gag reflex in the audience.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Message in a Bottle (1999)
Is it possible for someone to love too much?  Is being overly romantic a
severe character flaw?  Those are a few questions posed by Message in a
Bottle, an adaptation of Nicholas Sparks' romantic novel.  It is
schlocky and disposable at times, but makes for a decent romantic
diversion.
Theresa Osborne (Robin Wright Penn) is a research assistant for a
prominent columnist at a Chicago paper.  One day, while on vacation, she
discovers something interesting: (you guessed it) a message in a
bottle.  This particular message is a hopelessly romantic love letter
from a man to his dead wife.
Theresa becomes obsessed with the letter, and convinces her boss at the
paper to let her track down the author.  It's not revealing too much to
say that in a rather short amount of time, she does.  The man is one
Garret Blake (Kevin Costner), a North Carolina man who restores boats
for a living.
So, Theresa hops a jet and finds herself in North Carolina, looking for
this man of passion, and falling hopelessly in love (even before setting
eyes upon him). But Garret still pines for his dead wife, and is unsure
if there is room in his heart for another love.
Nearly everything in this film seems distant and adrift.  This
disconectedness works all right for the beginning.  But, even after
Theresa and Garret meet, and romance begins to bloom, there is never a
sense of immediacy to the couple or their relationship.
Kevin Costner's laconic style is on full display here.  It seems to fit
a man pining for his lost love, but isn't as suited for a man finding a
new love. Robin Wright Penn is strangely subdued while playing what is,
when you think about it, a stalker.  There is some chemistry between the
pair, but the whole thing never gets hotter than a slow burn.
The one thing that does bring a jolt of life to the film is Paul Newman,
playing Garret's cantankerous father, Dodge.  He's given all the film's
best lines, and even when they're not given to him, he takes them anyway
and makes each scene in which he appears his.  The fire and skill with
which he crafts his character puts all the other actors in this film to
shame (even though they're not doing that shabby of a job).
The entire plot of Message in a Bottle is clearly telegraphed several
scenes ahead. Even when the film takes a sharp left turn into melodrama,
it doesn't catch you completely by surprise.
On the whole, what Message in a Bottle needs is a little energy.  Just
as Paul Newman enlivened what could have been a stock, throwaway
character with a spark of vitality, so too could the whole film used an
extra burst of life.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Other Sister, The (1999)
It is apparent that the makers of The Other Sister intended their film
to be a thoughtful comedy-drama exploring the subjects of love and
mental retardation. But, the film's depiction of mental retardation
never rises above a simple gimmick. The end result is slightly
condescending to the audience (and its characters), and robs the film
from any hope of its intended dramatic impact.  However, The Other
Sister is still able to skate by (barely) on the merits of its comedy.
The main character of The Other Sister is Carla Tate (Juliette Lewis), a
mentally retarded teen who has just returned home from an institution.
Her rich parents, Elizabeth (Diane Keaton) and Radley (Tom Skerritt),
don't quite know what to do with her.  Carla's goal is to get a high
school diploma and become a veterinarian's assistant. Elizabeth thinks
that's out of the question.
But Carla is determined to declare her independence, whether her parents
approve or not. Soon, she's enrolled in the local PolyTechnic school,
and hunting for an apartment of her own.
The final test of her parents' patience comes when she meets Danny
(Giovanni Ribisi), a classmate of hers who is also mentally retarded.
The two form a quick friendship, and fall in love.  But when the topics
of sex and marriage are raised, Carla's parents are at a complete loss.
Juliette Lewis and Giovanni Ribisi apparently attended the same acting
class on the subject of portraying the mentally handicapped. They both
deliver the same affectations, and an overabundance of mannerisms that
bely a true lack of confidence in their characterizations. They are
never able to get lost in the characters; in each and every scene, you
are always acutely aware that you're watching someone acting.
The script provides them plenty of crutches to work with: She has a
childlike affinity for animals, and he has a childlike affinity for
marching bands.  She throws a childlike tantrum when people laugh at
her, he throws a childlike tantrum when he is called "stupid".  But
these lovable quirks are the end-all and be-all of their characters.
And it doesn't end with Carla and Danny...every single character in the
film can be singularly identified by a defining quirk.
The Other Sister has its cute moments, several of which actually do
work. However, the majority of the movie is elaborately over-staged. The
film is perfectly willing to sacrifice believability for a quick laugh.
The movie is also surprisingly long.  It clocks in at over two hours, an
excessive amount of time for what is in actuality a simple romantic
comedy.
The Other Sister is much too self-conscious to pack any dramatic weight.
But, as a lightweight, throwaway romantic comedy it's harmlessly
entertaining.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Why Do Fools Fall In Love (1998)
Why Do Fools Fall in Love is an unusual biopic...one that isn't terribly
interested about its subject.  It's more concerned with the various
other lives which are intersected and thrown into turmoil.
Why Do Fools Fall in Love tells the story of singer Frankie Lymon
(Larenz Tate), who in 1955 wrote his first smash hit (the title song),
at the age of 13.  However, his star burned bright and brief.  He
quickly spiraled into despair, drugs and death.
The film takes place in 1986, and reveals Frankie's story in
flashbacks.  Many years after his death, Diana Ross performs a
best-selling version of Why Do Fools Fall in Love...adding many dollars
to Frankie's previously bankrupt estate. Soon, there is not one, but
three separate women who each claim to be Frankie's widow, and entitled
to the fortune.
One woman is Zola Taylor (Halle Berry), a singer with The Platters, who
toured sometimes with Frankie.  Another is Elizabeth Waters (Vivica A.
Fox), a shoplifter who helps Frankie through the lowest valleys of his
life.  The third is Emira Eagle (Lela Rochon), a somewhat prissy
schoolteacher who loved Frankie during his final days.
It's difficult to point out exactly where Why Do Fools Fall in Love goes
wrong. For starters, it drags on about a half an hour too long.  Each
woman tells her own story about Frankie Lymon, and by the time you've
reached the second one, you're ready for the film to end.
The film tries to portray Frankie in three different lights, as seen by
each of his three "wives".  However, the pictures they paint aren't as
surprisingly dissimilar as they claim to be.  Add to that the fact that
Frankie never truly emerges as a compelling enough character for a two
hour biopic, and you're in for a long sit.
Still, although Larenz Tate is somewhat undefined in his role, the three
lead actresses give it a good try.  None of them are quite convincing in
their "middle-aged" scenes set during the 1980s, however.  Of the three,
Vivica A. Fox has the juiciest role, and is quite convincing as the
unlikely target of Frankie's love who would (and does) do anything to
prove her devotion.
Why Do Fools Fall in Love has an interesting concept, but is poorly
executed. The film should have put more focus on Frankie, and why he was
the way he was. Instead, we are left with a collection of fading
memories that are never quite as vibrant when told second-hand.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Players Club, The (1998)
Oh boy!  Another foray into the world of strippers!  Are there any
stories here that haven't been told?  Are there interesting ways to
present tired material? Well, if there are, you wouldn't know it from
The Player's Club.
Diana Armstrong (LisaRaye) is an unwed mother and college student
struggling to barely get by.  One day, while on her job at a local shoe
store, she meets two strippers, Ronnie and Tricks (Chrystale Wilson and
Adele Givens), who advise her to join them in a new career at The
Player's Club.
The Player's Club is a gentleman's club (aka strip bar) owned by the
supposedly colorful Dollar Bill (Bernie Mac).  Dollar is heavily in
debt, but hires Diana on the spot, hoping a new young body will bring in
more dough.
Diana puts her dignity aside, and prospers in the job, seeing it as
merely a temporary money-making venture while she completes her
education.  However, trouble ensues when her young cousin, Ebony (Monica
Calhoun), idolizing Diana's lifestyle, decides to work at the club as
well, and go farther than she wisely should.
The plight of the stripper is hardly anything new, having recently been
covered by several bad movies (Showgirls, and Striptease).  And while
The Player's Club tries to put an ethnic spin on the story, the result
is not much better.
Ice Cube makes his directoral debut with this movie, and, of course,
gives himself a bit part as a lowlife who frequents the club.  His
direction is serviceable, but uninspired.  He fares much worse as the
film's screenwriter, surviving barely on the merits that his dialogue
never plummets to the depths of Showgirls.
There are a couple of stories here that could have been interesting, but
instead are relegated to pointless subplots.  Diana's relationship with
an inspirational college professor, and the conflict of her protective
father and her boyfriend (and club DJ) Blue (Jamie Foxx) are both
stories that had much more potential than the mundane fare that fills
the rest of the movie.
LisaRaye does the best she can with the "stripper-with-a-heart-of-gold"
role. But, like virtually every other character here, she's void of
personality, and is merely a loose collection of stereotypes.
The Player's Club is an inauspicious directing debut for Ice Cube.
Hopefully his future efforts will be better than this unimaginative
outing... it won't be hard.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
Analyze This at first seems like the perfect example of a high concept
comedy, able to be summarized in a mere sentence fragment:  mob boss
seeks therapy. But, on further analysis, the movie proves to be
atypical.  It's actually funny.
Paul Vitti (Robert DeNiro) has a big problem.  He's a powerful mafia
boss in New York City.  Mob control of crime is beginning to wane, and
the heads of all the powerful families want to meet. Paul's bitter
rival, Primo Sindone (Chazz Palminteri) would prefer that Paul sleep
with the fishes, and orders a series of hits on the mob boss' life.
But that's not Paul's big problem.  No, his big problem is that he has
stress.  So much stress that he's suffering from panic attacks, and
severe emotional breakdowns.  Things get so bad that he reluctantly
decides to see a shrink:  one Dr. Ben Sobol (Billy Crystal).
Dr. Sobol doesn't particularly relish the idea of having an infamous
criminal as a client.  But a few kidnappings here, and a little harmless
torture there, and suddenly Paul Vitti is his favorite patient, or at
least his most persistent one.  When Paul needs therapy, Ben is expected
to deliver...any time, anywhere.  Even Ben's pending wedding to
newswoman Laura MacNamara (Lisa Kudrow) isn't a worthwhile excuse.
Analyze This is based on a gimmicky formula...but if there's a director
who knows how to take a comedy based on a gimmicky formula and make it
work, it's Harold Ramis (director of Caddyshack and Groundhog Day).
Under his easy, guiding hand, the film is able to weather a few
predictable scenes, and actually locates humor in unexpected places.
The key to the entire film is Robert DeNiro.   He has played every
variation of mobster known to film...but who knew he had such comic
potential?  His Paul Vitti is not only believable as a mafia boss, but
is played with perfect deadpan comic precision.
Billy Crystal finally breaks his unlucky streak of smarmy roles. He
subdues his typical schtick, and delivers a stronger character because
of it. He may be playing the straight man to DeNiro's more vibrant don,
but he never allows himself to become overshadowed, having many humorous
scenes of his very own.
The supporting cast can't quite live up to the film's two leads. Lisa
Kudrow, so wonderful in last year's The Opposite of Sex is woefully
misused here.  As is Chazz Palminteri, who barely registers on screen as
the movie's villain (relatively speaking). Only Joe Viterelli, as Jelly,
Vitti's loyal, but self-admittedly stupid henchman, makes a lasting
impression.
Excellent comic performances by the two leads, and a steady hand of
direction are able to overcome the film's few weaknesses.  The comedy of
Analyze This is occasionally predictable, but always funny.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Entrapment (1999)
Hollywood's fascination with the older man-younger woman romance
continues in the heist drama, Entrapment.  Sean Connery and Catherine
Zeta-Jones are the cross-generational lovers.  Their lukewarm romance is
the pitiful highlight of this thoroughly ridiculous film.
Robert MacDougal (Sean Connery), aka "Mac", is a master thief, rich
beyond all wildest dreams. He steals now for the challenge, seeing each
potential theft as a magnificent puzzle to be solved.  He is the best of
the best, and has never been caught.
Gin Baker(Catherine Zeta-Jones) is an insurance investigator who has
been tracing Mac's illustrious career.  She gets approval from her boss,
Cruz (Will Patton), to go undercover and trap Mac in a heist.  However,
Gin has other plans in mind...
Entrapment is a movie with only one redeeming value:  the personal
charisma of its stars.  The dialogue is horrible, the plotting
ridiculous, and even the stunts aren't all that alluring.  But when Sean
Connery and Catherine Zeta-Jones are on the screen, you start to forget
how bad a movie this really is.
But it is bad...very bad.  The movie starts with some promise, in a
whiz-bang robbery scene right off the bat.  But when the dialogue kicks
in, the technical wizardry seems to go out the window, and the entire
film deflates into nothingness.
The plot hinges around the upcoming millennium shift.  It's a timely
topic, but the screenwriters apparently didn't research Y2K issues much
deeper than the name.  Then again, nothing in this movie seems to be
very well researched.  From security measures to tricks of the thieving
trade, the details of the film all seem to be invented off the cuff.
The leads, appealing as they are, are hopelessly trapped in their
shallow characters.  Sean Connery is actually given very little to do.
His role here is more of a coach than a player.   Catherine Zeta-Jones
would be much more enchanting if her character  wasn't constantly
whining and pouting.
Don't be lured into Entrapment on the basis of the stars alone. The
power of their sheer presence can only lift the movie so far. Entrapment
isn't worth the heist.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Ringmaster (1998)
At the turn of the millennium, the name Jerry Springer has become
synonymous with "trash tv" and everything that has gone wrong with our
culture.  It's only fitting, then, that Jerry gets his own movie. But
Ringmaster, a half-hearted attempt to translate the "ideal" Jerry
Springer show free-for-all to the screen, ends up an even worse movie
than the concept sounds!
Jerry Springer stars as Jerry Farrelly, talk show host.  His show,
Jerry!, lets its guests air their dirty laundry in front of a national
television audience, and also (occasionally) engage in brutal fistcuffs.
The first set of guests, for the show titled "You Did WHAT With Your
Stepdaddy?", are a pathetic bunch of trailer trash.  Angel Zorzak (Jaime
Pressly) is a sex-starved 19-year old having an affair with her
stepfather (Michael Dudikoff).  In retaliation, her 34-year old mother,
Connie (Molly Hagen) strikes up a relationship with Angel's fiancee,
Willie (Ashley Holbrook).
The second Jerry! show is entitled "My Traitor Girlfriends". Starletta
(Wendy Raquel Robinson) is having problems with her boyfriend, Demond
(Michael Jai White).  He'll sleep with anyone, including Starletta's
best friends, Vonda (Tangie Ambrose) and Leshawnette (Nicki Michneaux).
Now, obviously, these are the screenwriters' attempts at setting up the
"perfect" Jerry Springer show.  But, where's the fun in that?  I mean,
part of the lurid appeal of his TV show is that the guests are real.
Real people with real problems and real bad attitudes.  Here, it's just
a bunch of actors acting badly, and it shows.
I guess here you also get to see the enchanting lives the "typical"
Jerry Springer guests live before their on-air appearances.  And you
also get to gawk at the "glamorous" life behind the scenes of Jerry's
show.  In other words, nothing very appealing is here at all.
But nothing can compare to when the film starts preaching its "message".
You see, Jerry Springer is all about helping the poor.  Anyone who
dislikes the show is simply uncomfortable with watching poor folk talk
about their problems.  However, Ringmaster conveniently forgets to
mention the fact that the show also happens to be exploiting those same
"poor folk" it supposedly champions.  Oh well, they never claimed it was
a rational argument.
If you're a die-hard Jerry Springer junkie, you ought to stick with the
real thing.  For those of you non-fans out there, Ringmaster certainly
won't convert you.  If anything, it may make you despise Jerry Springer
all the more.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Newton Boys, The (1998)
Richard Linklater, notorious for his modern day Generation X films,
strikes off in new territory in The Newton Boys, a period drama
detailing the true-life exploits of the most successful gang of bank
robbers in United States history.
The mastermind behind the robberies is Willis Newton (Matthew
McConaughey) who, after being wrongly imprisoned, decides to take a
little back from the system.  He teams up with an explosives expert,
Brentwood Glasscock (Dwight Yoakam), and together they plan to rob
square-door bank safes up and down the country.
To help them out, Willis enlists his brothers.  There's Jess (Ethan
Hawke), the cowboy of the bunch who lives for the moment.  Joe (Skeet
Ulrich) is the youngest Newton, and the one with the largest moral
dilemma.  Finally, there's Dock (Vincent D'Onofrio), the eldest, and
most stubborn of the family Newton.
Together, they blaze a trail throughout the Midwest in the early 1920s
(and even to Canada at one point).  They never aim to hurt anyone...they
just want the money.  Along the way, Willis discovers one more thing he
wants:  Louise Brown (Julianna Margulies), whom he woos by pretending
he's a wildcatting oilman.
The Newton Boys takes a cavalier attitude toward its subject, painting
the bank robbers as modern day Robin Hoods, who, since they were poor,
robbed the rich and gave to themselves.  The film is more about their
attitude than about their crimes, or even their personalities.  Aside
from the well-done period detail, there's not much we learn from The
Newton Boys.
The lead characters are all genial in their roles.  They're likable, but
not outstanding.  They're not bad here, but they've all done better
work.
Perhaps the problems that fail to give the movie any lasting weight are
the same that have allowed the exploits of the Newton boys to fade from
popular knowledge.  Sure, they set a record, but other than that,
there's very little there: no lurid tabloid details that stick in the
mind, or lasting personalities to haunt us.
The best I can claim about The Newton Boys movie is that it is
diverting. It is an anecdote of a movie that will pass the time, but
won't linger on your mind.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Mulan (1998)
Disney cements their place in the forefront of feature animation with
the release of their latest animated adventure, Mulan.  While it adheres
a bit too close to the Disney formula to be perfect, it is nonetheless
an entertaining film for both kids and adults.
Fa Mulan (Ming-Na Wen, singing: Lea Salonga) wants nothing more than to
be a dutiful daughter and honor her family...it's just that she doesn't
quite fit in with the chafing customs of her time.  While most girls her
age are trying to quietly and demurely seek the approval of the local
matchmaker (Miriam Margoyles), Mulan would prefer speaking her mind.
But there is trouble on the horizon.  The evil Huns, led by Shan-Yu
(Miguel Ferrer), are invading China.  The Emperor (Pat Morita) has
decreed that each family must donate one man to serve in the army.  The
only male in Mulan's family is her father, Fa Zhou (Soon-Tek Oh), who,
old and with a bad leg, honorably accepts his fate.  Mulan, on the other
hand, decides to save her father's life...by secretly masquerading as a
man and taking his place on the battlefield.
Mulan, under the assumed name of Ping, appears at camp where she, along
with the other bumbling recruits, Yao (Harvey Fierstein), Chien-Po
(Jerry Tondo) and Ling (Gedde Watanabe), are trained in the art of war
by Captain Shang (B.D. Wong, singing: Donny Osmond).  But she's not
alone in her tasks...in typical Disney fashion, she has three animal
companions:  her horse Khan, a lucky cricket Crickey, and a pint-sized
"guardian" dragon called Mushu (Eddie Murphy).
Much like the gargoyles in The Hunchback of Notre Dame, the humor in
Mulan is lukewarm and doesn't flow well with the rest of the more
serious story.  Sure, some occasional comic relief is welcome,
particularly in a film geared for the younger set, but Mulan overdoes
it.  The overdose of humor turns what could have been a powerfully great
film into a good, but schizophrenic experience.
But, that commentary aside, this is a very well made film (which makes
the formulaic additions all the more regrettable). The animation is on
par with some of Disney's best.  The story itself is interesting, and
the action scenes are awe-inspiring.
The musical score to the film is enjoyable, though, as has been the case
with Disney's recent work, the songs are mostly forgettable. At least,
we're only subjected to four of them this time around.
Mulan boasts the highest death toll of any Disney cartoon to date. Most
of the killing is off-screen and it's all highly depersonalized (there's
nothing to compare with the death of Mufasa or Bambi's mom). There's
nothing graphic, and the film resides snugly inside a G rating. Children
will probably have more questions about the restrictive ancient customs
than of the slaughter of armies.
It's ironic that a film concerned with bucking tradition is hampered
because of its strict adherence to Disney tradition.  If the filmmakers
had the guts to lessen the humor, ax the compulsory songs, and remove
the obligatory (and somewhat unrealistic) romance, they could have had a
classic on their hands. Instead, they merely deliver a very good time at
the movies.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Ronin (1998)
Ronin takes the concept of the generic spy thriller to new heights. In
the post-Cold War atmosphere, it doesn't matter who the bad guys are (as
long as they're sufficiently bad), nor who the good guys are (as long as
they're sufficiently good).  Ronin depicts a group of people with
indeterminate motives working for unknown parties to achieve an obscure
goal. It doesn't really matter what the ends are...Ronin is primarily
interested in the means used to get there.  And, surprisingly, given how
little is actually revealed, Ronin turns out to be an impressive
thriller.
As we are informed in some clumsy prologue text: Ronin is the term used
to describe masterless samurai...or in this case disfranchised cold
warriors.  Brought together as sort of a mercenary Mission: Impossible
group, these renegade ex-CIA, ex-KGB, and ex-(insert spy agency here)
agents are assigned an obscure but dangerous task: to retrieve the
ultimate MacGuffin: a mysterious, and heavily guarded, case.  What's in
the case? That information is on a need to know basis only.  Besides,
it's unimportant...all that they (and we) need to know is that many
people are willing to pay a high price (and kill an even higher number
of people) to possess it.
Acting on behalf of the mysterious Seamus (Jonathan Pryce), Dierdre
(Natascha McElhone) draws together a diverse group of ex-spies to
capture the case. Chief among them is Sam (Robert DeNiro), an
experienced agent who is likely ex-CIA, and who has survived on his
well-honed instincts.  Vincent (Jean Reno) is an equipment man, with his
fingers dipped into the black market. Gregor (Stellan Skarsgrd), East
German ex-KGB, is an electronics expert, Larry (Skipp Suddeth) is the
expert driver, and Spence (Sean Bean) is a roguish weaponry specialist.
Due to the secrecy involved, we never learn too many details about any
of the gang...much less about their mission.  This is a spy movie
stripped to its barest essentials.  There's no fat here.  You've got car
chases, gun fights, swarms of double crosses and plenty of
intrigue...all without the unnecessary complications of plot or
characterization.  But has some muscle been stripped away as well?
The film thrives on its heart-pounding action sequences, which mostly
live up to their billing.  However, some of the scenes are so intense
that they border on parody.  The casual slaughter of innocents is done
by both good guys and bad, and seems to be mere punctuation to
underscore the seriousness of all involved.  But, at times, the film
seems to draw from the well of excess once too often.
At least there are some good actors at play here...actors so charismatic
that they don't really need strong characters to hold our attention.
DeNiro is simply magnetizing in his portrayal of a desperate ex-spy.
Jean Reno and Stellan Skarsgrd are also impressive.  Natascha McElhone
is slightly disappointing, but that is mostly in comparison to the other
great talent here.
Ronin is not a film that you will think upon for days afterward, but
you'll certainly have a good time while you're watching it.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Governess, The (1998)
The Governess is a romantic drama that's like an overripe peach.  It has
a strong core, but a soft, mushy outside.
Minnie Driver stars as Rosina da Silva, a devout Jewish girl in 19th
century London. After her beloved father passes away, she is forced to
take a job to support her family.  However, there aren't many lucrative
job opportunities for Sephardic Jews, so Rosina poses as a gentile named
Mary Blackchurch in order to take a job as governess on the remote Isle
of Skye.
There, she is hired by the Cavendish family to look after the devilish
Clementina (Florence Hoath).  The head of the Cavendish family, Charles
(Tom Wilkinson), is a reclusive inventor who is fascinated by the new
science of photography.
Despite the amorous advances of Charles' son Henry (Jonathan Rhys
Meyers), Rosina finds herself attracted to Charles, himself.  Will
Charles return her affections, or will he remain devoted to his wife
(Harriet Walter)?
The heart of this unconventional love story is pinned together by Driver
and Wilkinson.  The whole thing depends on convincing performances by
the two leads, and they successfully carry it off.  Driver displays a
degree of eroticism heretofore undiscovered in her works.  And Wilkinson
is able to make us understand why a young woman would be attracted to
this older man, with a performance bristling with perception and
intelligence.
It's too bad the rest of the film isn't as strong as their relationship.
The Governess' multiple subplots are awkwardly set up. You can spot the
"miraculous" photography breakthrough from several miles away, and one
never gets a sense of what the Henry-Rosina relationship is ever trying
to accomplish.
Worth seeing on the basis of its central romance, The Governess is never
able to get much beyond that core relationship.  It's aimless at points,
but has a good heart...and after all, that's what's most important in a
romantic drama.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Night at the Roxbury, A (1998)
Ah, yet another film has emerged from the apparently bottomless fool's
goldmine known as Saturday Night Live.  Very rarely, an unexpected movie
gem will emerge from the skit-based comedy show.  But that is not the
case with A Night at the Roxbury, which successfully translates a vapid
and empty skit into a vapid and empty film.
For those of you unfamiliar with the skit, the film thoughtfully
provides a quick example right off the bat.  The main characters are
Steve and Doug Butabi (Will Ferrell and Chris Kattan), two pathetic
losers who (unaware of their loserdom) constantly try to pick up women
at nightclubs.
The movie fleshes out the skit somewhat (not a hard task, given that
there's practically no substance to start with).  During the day, Steve
and Doug work for their father (Dan Hedaya) at his fake flower shop.
But at night, their dreams turn to scoring at the local nightclubs
(including the elusively exclusive Roxbury).
One night, their dreams come true, and the bumbling duo manage to get
into the club of their dreams.  There they mingle with celebritys
(Richard Grieco), try to work a business deal with the owner (Chazz
Palminteri), and are targeted by a couple of gold-digging women (Elisa
Donovan and Gigi Rice).
At first, the Roxbury guys seem to fit the mold cast by successful
SNL-to-film skits such as Wayne's World or The Blues Brothers.  There's
a pair of wacky and slightly dimwitted protagonists, and...well, that's
where the similarity ends.  But the filmmakers seemed to miss one key
difference: those successful films featured both strong, endearing
characters, and a pair of the era's finest comedians performing at their
peak. A Night at the Roxbury has neither.
The Roxbury guys is (next to It's Pat: The Movie) the flimsiest Saturday
Night Live skit ever to cross the film adaptation threshold.  It truly
is based on one joke:  the losers who don't know they're losers.  As a
film, one joke will never make it...particularly when the same joke has
been at the core of several films this year already (Almost Heroes, Meet
the Deedles and BASEketball come to mind).
That leaves the movie up to Ferrell and Kattan.  But their performances
are rote and uninteresting.  They've turned in much better performances
on Saturday Night Live...but then, we weren't confronted with them as
the same characters for a full hour and a half.
The movie is amusing for about the length of a 3-5 minute skit.  There
are a few minor chuckles scattered throughout the picture, so it's not a
total loss...but nothing worth 90 minutes of your time.
A Night at the Roxbury aims little higher than its skit...and you could
hardly pick a flimsier skit upon which to base a feature film. It's a
one-joke movie that doesn't even have a good joke.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Stepmom (1998)
With a bland and unrevealing title like Stepmom, you might half expect a
horror film about the mad matriarch of a dysfunctional family. That's
not the case here.  Rather, Stepmom is another a long tradition of
three-hankie weepies, and a rather archetypical one at that. Luckily,
this tearjerking comedy-drama compensates for its familiar structure
with several superior performances.
Luke and Jackie Harrison (Ed Harris and Susan Sarandon) have been
divorced now for two years.  They have joint custody of their two
children: aspiring magician Ben (Liam Aiken), and the uncontrollably
angry Anna (Jena Malone).  Luke and Jackie are still on fairly good
terms... until Luke's girlfriend Isabel (Julia Roberts) moves in with
him.
Isabel is a career photographer, who has had no experience with kids.
She tries, but nothing she does can live up to the perfect example of
motherhood, Jackie.  Ben and Anna love tormenting her, and Jackie's
shrewish attitude doesn't make Isabel feel welcome either.
But there's another piece to this puzzle.  Something which will cause
everyone involved to reevaluate their feelings and attitudes.  But can
this non-traditional family bond together in a time of true crisis?
Stepmom shamelessly goes overboard in its attempts to manipulate your
emotions.  It pulls out every stop, and utilizes every trick in the book
to wring that one last tear from your body.  It performs these tasks
strictly according to the tearjerker textbook.  If you've seen even one
tearjerker before this one, you'll know exactly where the plot is going.
Still, there is considerable talent involved here.  And despite, the
blatant manipulation, the excellent performances that permeate the film
somehow manage to redeem Stepmom.  Both Susan Sarandon and Julia Roberts
excel in the lead roles.  Ed Harris, when he's not busy being
under-utilized, is a joy to watch as well.  Even the children are above
par for this sort of film., though Liam Aiken was seemingly cast on the
basis of his infectious laugh alone.
The film itself is a bit rushed, confining all the action to a few short
months.  This dramatic shortcut does serve to heighten the emotional
shocks of the film (the impacts are all felt sooner than they should
be), but at the cost of realism.
After the end of Stepmom, you feel like a finely wrung sponge. The film
may be completely by-the-book, but thanks to the performances at its
center, its emotional manipulation succeeds. This may be a formulaic
tearjerker, but it's one done well.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Pleasantville (1998)
Pleasantville is, of all things, a pleasant little film.  It asks the
question, what would the world be like if everything was perfect?  And
then it uses that, not only as a launchpad for social commentary on
contemporary values, but as an examination on the roles of passion and
change in our lives.  Though inconsistent and obvious at times, the film
manages to be elegant and subtle in others, and makes for a pleasant
time at the movies.
Pleasantville is the name of a stereotypical 50's black and white
sitcom, where everything is, well, pleasant.  Mom and Dad have all the
answers to even the toughest problems in this small town.  There's no
crime, fewer worries, and even the firemen only have to rescue cats from
trees.  In short, it's about as far from reality as you can get.
But it's the reality 90s teen David (Tobey Maguire) yearns for.  A
hopeless outcast in the increasingly frightening real world, David longs
for the "perfect" existence in his favorite old sitcom.  His slutty twin
sister, Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon), simply thinks he's nuts.  She'd
rather watch MTV than some moth-eaten rerun. However, when their
television remote breaks, it looks like neither of them will have their
way.
That is, until a mysterious TV repairman (Don Knotts) shows up.  He
gives David a gift: a magical remote which zaps David and his sister
into the world of Pleasantville.  There they take the place of Bud and
Mary Sue, the kids of the Parker family, including salesman dad George
(William H. Macy), and the perfect housewife, Betty (Joan Allen).
But David and Jennifer soon discover that "pleasant" isn't all it's
cracked up to be. In fact, it's somewhat repetitive and boring.  The
people of Pleasantville have no idea what to do outside the constructs
of the various episodes.  In fact, there's literally nothing outside of
Pleasantville (which apparently curves back around upon itself).  But,
when David and Jennifer introduce their 90s sensibilities into this 50s
world, things begin to change in Pleasantville...something which has
never happened before.
Pleasantville utilizes an ingenious technique to demonstrate these
changes.  As passion, in any form, begins to creep into the
black-and-white world of Pleasantville, slowly objects and people erupt
in color.  At first, the changes are minor, but as the citizenry of
Pleasantville learn of the possibilities of change, color springs up all
around.
Toward the end, the film gets a bit heavy-handed in its overall
"message", but, along the way, it delivers several poignant and
memorable scenes.  The film has potential in its middle passages as it
moves beyond simple television satire, and into an exploration of
innocence and potential. However, it then clumsily segues into a
ill-conceived tone nearly as preachy as the one it tries to condemn.
One of the more serious problems with the film is with its two leads.
Both Tobey Maguire and Reese Witherspoon are, well, bland.  And when
you're forced to compare them with a purposefully "bland" world, the
comparison doesn't hold as much weight as it should.  By contrast, many
of the Pleasantville characters (including Joan Allen, J.T. Walsh as the
town mayor, and Jeff Daniels as the local malt shop guy) are much more
colorful...even in black and white.
If you can manage it, try to avoid the trailers and advertisements for
the movie, as they give away most of the film's surprises.  Not that
it's much of a spoiler (since you can see most of the plot developments
coming from miles away), but the few moments of discovery in this film
are best if they're fresh.
Overall, Pleasantville is a nice film with a few nice moments, and a
generally nice case. But it is obviously striving to be more than
"nice", and to achieve a depth of meaning which it never reaches.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Mighty, The (1998)
The Mighty is a very good film, saddled with a very perplexing
advertising campaign. Based upon Rodman Philbrick's novel Freak the
Mighty, someone somewhere apparently objected to the word 'Freak', which
has been inexplicably jettisoned.  To follow that up, the ads have been
an odd hodgepodge of Sharon Stone and a bunch of medieval knights, and
while she does appear in a supporting part (as do the knights), this
hardly gives a clear idea of what the film is about:  friendship,
identity, and chivalry.
The Mighty is narrated by Max (Elden Henson), a giant of a kid, who's in
the seventh grade for the third time around.  Though bigger and stronger
than all the other kids, Max doesn't think too well, and is constantly
the object of ridicule.  It doesn't help matters that his father (James
Gandolfini) is imprisoned for murder, leaving Max to stay with his
grandparents (Gena Rowlands and Harry Dean Stanton).
The new kid next door isn't much better off.  Kevin (Kieran Culkin), is
a brilliant boy with Morquio's Syndrome...his bones have stopped
growing, but the rest of him hasn't.  Living alone with his mother
(Sharon Stone), Kevin has built a fascinating intellectual world in
which to live.  But he longs to do the things a normal kid could do.
Though at first Max and Kevin appear to be complete opposites, they're
actually quite complementary.  Max has the brawn, and Kevin has the
brains.  Working together, they make a team more powerful than the sum
of its parts.  Following the ideals of the legend of King Arthur, the
two friends envision themselves as knights bringing chivalry back into
an unchivalrous world.
Although this movie shares the theme of childhood friendship with the
recent  Simon Birch, The Mighty is able to delve for additional meaning
while managing to be just as touching.
The largest chunk of the credit has to go to the film's two leads.
Kieran Culkin has the seemingly showier role as Kevin, and, indeed, he
manages to express a depth of character that his elder brother Macaulay
never did.  However, he has the unfortunate benefit of working alongside
Elden Henson, who turns in a brilliant portrayal of Max.  Elden brings a
deep humanity to his role of the slow-witted giant.
Even though the protagonists are kids, one shouldn't assume that this is
strictly a kids movie (the rating is PG-13).  Although kids and teens
would identify with it (who hasn't felt like a freak at one point or
another), the messages are universal, and the story is fully enjoyable
for adults, too.
The film takes a few twists and turns, some surprising, and some not so.
However, wherever the film takes you, you'll be glad to go along for the
ride.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
The first of the dueling disaster pics has hit!  Deep Impact has beat
its competitor, Armageddon, by nearly two months. Gunning to be the more
thoughtful of the two, Deep Impact does manage to deliver a few thrills,
but it is too detached to deliver much more.
The film opens with the discovery of the doomsday comet by an amateur
astronomy buff, Leo Biederman (Elijah Wood).  As if that weren't enough
bad luck, the movie proceeds to segue into a tragic act that has little
purpose and virtually no relation to the rest of the film.
But then things get rolling again as the film picks up the action one
year later. An MSNBC reporter, Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni) has stumbled
upon the scoop of a lifetime. Thinking she is delving into yet another
Capitol Hill sex scandal, she blunders her way into unveiling the
government's secret preparations to avoid Armageddon.
President Beck (Morgan Freeman) has been working with the Russians to
build the largest spacecraft in history, the Messiah.  An international
team of astronauts and cosmonauts (Ron Eldard, Blair Underwood, Jon
Favreau, Mary McCormack, and Alexander Baluyev) are joined by Apollo
pilot Spurgeon Tanner (Robert Duvall) in their mission to divert the
comet.
Of course, a disaster flick wouldn't be a disaster flick if it didn't
have the mandatory cross-society slice of life.  To that extent, we meet
Jenny's estranged parents (Vanessa Redgrave and Maximilian Schell, no
less), and reunite with the now famous Biedermans, to see how various
families cope with the potential end of the world.
Watching Deep Impact, you get the feeling that you're being left out of
the loop.  There's some interesting information that's going on just
underneath the surface, but the film never quite lets you get a good
look.  Take the pre-apocalypse baby boom for example, or the riots and
civil unrest that accompany the harbinger of doom.  The movie presents
you with conclusions, but never explains the details of the argument.
It gives you a synopsis of events, but never makes you feel like you are
there.
The pool of talent definitely isn't lacking in the film.  However, when
you've got Freeman, Duvall, Redgrave and Schell in the background, Tea
Leoni and Elijah Wood can't quite compete.  To be fair, they do a decent
job, but are simply outclassed.
The character writing doesn't help them out that much, either.  To
further the plot, and raise suspense, several of the main characters in
the film are forced to make wincingly bad decisions.  These are
decisions that no sane man (and few crazy ones) would dare make.
At least the film has some good eye candy to divert your attention.  The
special effects are good, but not as awe inspiring as they should be.
That's probably the result of the recent glut of disaster pictures.
After seeing mass destruction in every other movie, one quickly develops
a blasi attitude.  Still, there are a few impressive scenes.
Overall, Deep Impact isn't by far a perfect disaster film, but it has
its entertaining moments.  It's nothing to rush out to see, but a good
way to pass the time during a matinee.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Without Limits (1998)
Without Limits is the second biopic of Olympic track athlete Steve
Prefontaine (following last year's Prefontaine). Both films hit all the
same bases, and have about the same effect:  a modest appreciation, but
little understanding of the man.
Steve Prefontaine (Billy Crudup) is introduced through the eyes of
college scouts.  "Pre" is the most sought after high school runner in
the country, and every prestigious college can't wait to recruit him.
However, Pre has his sights on the University of Oregon, where the
legendary Bill Bowerman (Donald Sutherland) coaches.
The film doesn't display a very high opinion of running coaches.
Bowerman's only advice to Prefontaine is to avoid "front running", a bad
habit which Pre refuses to break, and with which he wins.  Aside from
that, the grand strategy in this film seems to simply be: run faster.
The film follows Pre, both as a collegiate athlete, an olympian, and
later as an "amateur" athlete.  Through it all, he's the consummate
rebel. He never wants to simply run with the crowd...he always wants to
lead the pack.
More than the previous Prefontaine biopic, Prefontaine, Without Limits
gets us on a personal level with Steve Prefontaine.  It's too bad the
Pre Without Limits shows us isn't all that interesting. He's just
another romanticized version of the "doomed athlete".  We never find out
what makes him tick...or why he was important enough to merit two movies
about his life.
Billy Crudup plays Pre with all the spit and polish deserving a
wonder-boy athlete. There are no rough edges, yet no real defining
character distinctions, either. Donald Sutherland fares better as his
coach, though at times he seems like he's starring in a Nike commercial
(a company with which the real life Bowerman was involved).
The story itself is more or less straightforward, but there are odd
little gaps here and there.  They're kind of like holes in memory...it
doesn't seem like anything is missing, but things don't quite flow
right.  Whether this was the filmmakers' intent, or just the result of
some sloppy editing, the result is a vague outline of the events in
Pre's life, rather than a clear picture.
Without Limits is not completely satisfying.  But it does manage to
conjure up a sense of respect for an athlete who, after nearly 30 years,
has likely faded from most memories.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Ravenous (1999)
Ah, what could be better than the return of the good ol' fashioned
cannibal movie?  Well, judging from Ravenous, quite a bit, actually.
Though it nearly hits its stride as a black comedy, the film never quite
finds its rhythm, and falters when it turns into a hybrid monster movie.
The film follows a war hero of the Mexican-American  war, John Boyd (Guy
Pearce).  An accidental hero, Boyd's true cowardice is suspected by his
superior (John Spencer). And, though promoted to Captain, Boyd is sent
to a remote outpost in the California wilderness
The soldiers at the fort are eccentric and unusual (played by Jeffrey
Jones, David Arquette, Jeremy Davies and Neal McDonough among others).
But things take a turn for the bizarre when a stranger (Robert Carlyle)
arrives at the fort with a dreadful tale of a settler expedition that
turned to cannibalism during the harsh winter.
The soldiers mount a rescue party to see if they can locate any
survivors.  However, Boyd learns of a peculiar Native American legend.
A man who eats the flesh of another becomes a wendigo,  a vampire of
sorts, who grows in strength, and appetite, with each mouthful of human
flesh.  Could this monstrous legend be true, and, if so, how can the
soldiers hope to stop the beast?
Ravenous falls somewhere between being an out-and-out monster movie, and
a very dark comedy, and it probably would have fared better as one or
the other.  As implemented in the film, the comic tone works better.  In
fact, when the film strays into the supernatural, things seem out of
place, and don't quite click.
Robert Carlyle is a perfect fit for this film.  His wiry, menacing
presence has always been a bit on the feral side. However, Guy Pearce is
a weak link in this film.  Whereas his quiet fortitude worked wonders in
L.A. Confidential, it never seems at home here.
>From its unusual scoring, to its casting, it is apparent that Ravenous
is trying to be quirky.  Sometimes it works (with a great performance by
Jeffrey Jones), but mostly it doesn't (as with the overly distracting
nature of the score).  The search for the perfect cannibal movie
continues...
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Lost & Found (1999/I)
In Lost and Found, David Spade has gained his first leading role in a
non-buddy movie.  It's too bad he's not up to the task.
Yet again, Spade is cast as another smarmy loser, this time an Italian
restaurant owner named Dylan.  The love of his life, French cellist Lila
(Sophie Marceau), has just moved into his apartment complex.  However,
she refuses to even give him the time of day.
One day, when Dylan discovers Lila's lost dog, he gets a brainstorm.  He
kidnaps the dog himself, and helps Lila with the hunt.  The two
bond...but what will happen when Lila discovers the truth?
Dylan's chief rival is pianist Rene (Patrick Bruel), who has followed
Lila to America.  He's annoying, rude and extremely irritating.  In
fact, his only good quality is that he's not David Spade.
Spade truly suffers without his previous screen partner, Chris Farley.
Lost and Found makes a fatal misstep by presenting another
overweight-but-good-natured sidekick (played by Artie Lange).  By trying
to fill the hole Farley left, they only make his absence all the more
noticeable.
The core problem here is that David Spade cannot carry a movie on his
own.  His smarmy style of barbed wit is ideal for a colorful supporting
role, but not the stuff leading men are made of.
The gags in Lost and Found are miss and miss.  Whether intentionally or
not, the film constantly hearkens back to There's Something About Mary.
With it's cruel dog jokes, frequently disgusting humor, and even an
end-credits lip synch track, Lost and Found continuously makes
comparisons to a film that is well beyond its league.  That is a
mistake, as it only serves to make Lost and Found seem more bland.
It's not that the film doesn't try to be funny...it's just that it tries
in all the wrong ways.  I mean, the film's penultimate joke is a set
piece about Neil Diamond.  Even the film's quick cameos by Jon Lovitz
and Martin Sheen are wasted.
Even if you're in tune with David Spade's unusual wavelength of humor,
there's nothing worth finding here.  Lost and Found is better off lost.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Life (1999)
The pairing seems ideal.  Putting Eddie Murphy and Martin Lawrence
together sounds like a perfect comedy teaming.  Toss in a high-concept
gimmick and plenty of old age makeup and you get Life, a bland movie
that may not be a prison term, but falls well short of its potential.
When the film opens, in 1930's New York, the pair haven't met and would
seem the unlikeliest of friends.  Ray Gibson (Eddie Murphy) is a thief
and con-artist with dreams of one day owning a nightclub:  Ray's Boom
Boom Room. Claude Banks (Martin Lawrence) is a debt-ridden accountant
who has landed a new job and a beautiful girlfriend.  Things are looking
up, until Claude and Ray both run afoul of local gangster, Spanky (Rick
James).
The pair are given one chance to redeem themselves:  they are to make a
quick trip down to Mississippi to collect some bootleg moonshine. But,
things don't go as planned down South...and Ray and Claude somehow find
themselves sentenced to life imprisonment for murder.
Luckily, the two find themselves assigned to one of the comfiest hard
labor camps in Mississippi (or at least it seems that way onscreen). The
cell-free camp includes the friendliest bunch of murderers you're likely
to see, and plenty of rest and relaxation time (most of which is spent
playing baseball).  Anyone who tries to leave gets shot (except Ray and
Claude on their multiple escape attempts, of course), but the prison is
so cozy, why would anyone dream of leaving? If you get the idea that
Life offers a simplified view of incarceration, you would be correct.
The other inmates at the prison (including Obba Babatunde, Bernie Mac,
Miguel A. Nunez Jr, and Bokeem Woodbine) are meant to be colorful and
interesting, but not enough time is spent with any of them.  We never
learn their stories, and they all end up as mere generic convicts.
The entire film seems to be structured around one idea:  Eddie Murphy
and Martin Lawrence grow old together in prison.  Pile on the latex
aging makeup, and who cares about the lead-up material?  The problem is,
since from the film's opening we know the two spend their entire lives
imprisoned, there's no real point to any of the intervening scenes.
They'll never escape...they'll never die...so why not just skip to the
old age scenes and get on with it?
When Martin and Lawrence are on a roll, they come up with some pretty
funny stuff.  Unfortunately, most of the film is spent rehashing tired
old prison jokes, and the pair are rarely able to cut loose.
There's enough material here for about half a movie, and Life simply
repetitiously stretches it out to the full term.  As a video, this film
may fit the crime, but it isn't worth a sentence at your local theater.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Fallen (1998)
How's this for a plot:  cop stalks supernatural body-swapping entity.
No, it's not a remake of The First Power, but it is Fallen, an mostly
unsuccessful thriller whose good cast can't overcome a bad script.
Detective John Hobbes (Denzel Washington) has finally reached closure
with one of his toughest cases.  Killer Edgar Reese (Elias Koteas) is
finally being executed.  However, Reese doesn't seem too distraught at
the occurence, singing The Rolling Stones' Time is On My Side as he is
gassed.
Soon more killings occur throughout the city, each with the same set of
circumstances used by Reese.  More disturbingly, each victim seems to be
killed by a different murderer.  It's up to Detective Hobbes to stop the
slayings, but he doesn't suspect what has been unleashed.
A theology professor, Greta Milano (Embeth Davitz), is the first to
reveal to Hobbes that his foe is of supernatural origin.  The fallen
angel Azazel, who can possess bodies with a simple touch, is to blame.
For some (never explained) reason, Hobbes is unpossessable, and so
Azazel has selected him as a target.  But how can one stop a
supernatural being?
Washington is as good as always in the role of the tormented cop, but
there are too many scenes of him simply doing something, with the
narration taking over, explaining what he's doing.  A more confident
filmmaker would have shot the film without the narration (although it
does provide a non-crucial twist), relying on the talents of Washington
(or a better script) to convey the meaning of his actions.
Washington is surrounded by a good supporting cast, including his trusty
partner, Jonesy (John Goodman), his secretive Lieutenant, Stanton
(Donald Sutherland), the weaselly Lou (James Gandolfini), and the
aforementioned Gretta (Embeth Davitz). You know as the film goes on that
one (or more) of them will become hosts for Azazel.  However, they seem
to spend most of the film waiting for that moment to arrive, rather than
doing any particularly interesting things.
There are a few interesting concepts, and a couple of thrilling scenes
wherein the killer's rapid body switching creates some true paranoia.
However, one of the problems with creating a nearly all-powerful
supernatural foe is defining its limits, something that Fallen fails to
properly do.  When we finally learn of Azazel's true plans for revenge,
we wonder why it didn't just do that before.  The only thing which would
have stopped it was the script.
Fallen's quasi-religious themes don't ever quite play out.  There are
too many questions that go unanswered.  (Such as why Denzel can't be
possessed?  Or why this fallen angel acts more like a serial killer than
a supernatural force?) When the screenplay gets stuck, it smugly hides
behind a "there are some things we aren't meant to know".  One or two of
those might have been acceptable...but when the film is filled with
them, you're left to wonder, what's the point?
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 500 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Hope Floats (1998)
Sandra Bullock rebounds from Speed 2 with a romantic drama that's
routine, but enjoyable.
Birdee Pruitt (Sandra Bullock) was the most popular girl in high school.
She was cheerleader, prom queen, and married the quarterback, Bill
(Michael Par). Everything was perfect...and then it changed.  One day,
she's invited to be a guest on the Toni Post show (ostensibly to receive
a free makeover), only to have her best friend and her husband reveal
their affair on national television.
Birdee swallows her pride, takes her daughter Bernice (Mae Whitman), and
moves back to her small Texas hometown.  There she finds more changes.
Her beloved father is now suffering from Alzheimer's and a stroke.  The
losers she derided when she was class queen have changed for the better,
and take delight in Birdee's reversal of fortune.
But Birdee's mother, Ramona (Gena Rowlands), hasn't changed much.  She's
still meddlesome and eccentric (her hobby is taxidermy).  And she tries
to set Birdee's life straight by hooking her up with town handyman
Justin Matisse (Harry Connick Jr).
The problem with this sort of setup is that everyone knows what's best
for Birdee, but you have to wait through the whole film for her to
finally realize what's been obvious all along.  This can be a nuisance
if it is the only dramatic wellspring in a film, but luckily, in Hope
Floats, there is one other source of drama:  social status.
A crucial character flaw of Birdee is her refusal to accept change.  She
was on the top of the world during high school, and any change will only
lead downhill. What she doesn't realize is that the rest of the world
has moved on while she remained in the past, and now the very qualities
which made her the most popular girl in school are a liability rather
than an asset.  The film nicely parallels her story with that of
Bernice, who is just starting to establish her place in the formative
social strata of school.
And, of course, while all these social observations are going on, the
romance is a necessary evil. Bullock and Connick Jr. make an attractive
couple, even if they are a bit heavy on the saccharine.  Bullock tackles
her first meaty role in quite a while, and carries it off nicely. In his
first leading role, Connick proves he can pull his own weight. (However,
the question still remains whether he can portray something besides the
down-home guy he typically plays.)
Director Forest Whitaker indulges himself by allowing one too many
"cutesy" moments to pervade the film (such as an all too exuberant
"cheer-up" song, or "awww"-inspiring closeups of little kids dancing).
But, aside from that, he does a good job of shepherding the mostly
straightforward story.
Hope Floats isn't a perfect romance, and it's not a perfect drama.  But,
as the message of the movie goes, being ordinary isn't all that bad.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Home Fries (1998)
Home Fries is an unusual romantic comedy where you never quite know what
to expect.  Just when you think you've figured it out, the film veers
off in a different direction.  The end result may leave you disoriented,
but its ultimately pleasing.
Sally (Drew Barrymore) has been having an affair with a married man.
Not only that, but she's eight-months pregnant, and her lover still
refuses to leave his wife.  Oh well, at least Sally has her dependable
Burger Mart job to count on.
However, one night, she picks up a radio communication on her drive-thru
headset.  She hears the chatter between Dorian (Luke Wilson) and Angus
(Jake Busey), two brothers in the Air National Guard, who have
"borrowed" a helicopter to use in an elaborate prank.
However, when the prank backfires, Dorian is sent to the Burger Mart to
discover if anyone there knows what happened.  Yet, instead of finding
witnesses, Dorian finds love...with Sally.
So is this movie a spunky romantic comedy where Sally and Dorian
overcome their obstacles to fall in love?  Or is it a quaint small town
slice-of-life story, where the glamourous jobs are all at the local
cigarette factory?  Maybe it's a dysfunctional family portrait, or even
a grim black comedy?  The answer to all of those is yes.
As you might surmise, the movie becomes a bit cluttered here and there.
However, though it may not always know what genre it wants to be, it
always manages to be amusing, tackling all of its varied topics with a
true sense of fun.
Drew Barrymore fits perfectly as the wholesome young woman who just
happened to get pregnant while having an affair with a married man.
Compared to her easygoing style, Luke Wilson comes off a bit stiff.
However, the supporting roles are all top notch.  Jake Busey is a hoot
as Dorian's brother Angus...but he can't compare to the masterfully
wicked performance by Catherine O'Hara, as the boys' mother. Shelly
Duvall and Lanny Flaherty, as Sally's white trash parents, deliver a
couple of good scenes as well.
If you're in the mood for an out of the ordinary romantic comedy (and
like your humor a little warped), Home Fries fills the bill.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Practical Magic (1998)
Based on Alice Hoffman's novel, Practical Magic is a partially
enchanting film about the lives and loves of a family of witches.  The
film is never as magical as it needs to be, and it is harmed by some
overly simplistic solutions.
The Owens family is a family of witches...stubborn witches apparently.
For 300 years, their small Massachusetts town has persecuted and shunned
the Owens girls.  But, do they move away and start anew?  Nope.  They
don't even put a curse on the locals.  Instead, they live in the same
small town, and even suffer under a curse of their own.
You see, ever since one Owens girl was unlucky in love many many moons
ago, any man who ever loves an Owens is doomed to die young.  This curse
doesn't bother the flighty Gillian Owens (Nicole Kidman), who thinks
there are plenty of men around, so why should she get attached to just
one? However, for Sally Owens (Sandra Bullock), the curse presents a
problem... one she attempts to solve (but apparently unsuccessfully)
with magic.
Flash forward several years...a desperate plea from Gillian, whose
flighty ways have landed her in Florida, sends Sally on a rescue
attempt. Apparently Gillian's latest boyfriend, Jimmy (Goran Visnjic),
isn't a really nice guy.  But when the two witches start using magic to
get out of their predicament, they're unprepared for the dark forces
they are about to unleash.
For the most part, Practical Magic displays the light side of
witchcraft. There's one moderately gruesome spirit, but other than that,
the magic here is as tame as Bewitched.
Sandra Bullock is a bit bland as Sally.  She's likable, but her
character cries out for a magical zest which never materializes. Kidman
is a little better as the free spirited Gillian.  At least she
captivates your attention a little bit.  But both of the leads are a
little flat...too one note.  They both seem more like short descriptions
rather than full-fledged characters.
The supporting cast is a mixed bag of tricks. Stockard Channing and
Dianne Wiest seem to hit the right notes as Sally and Gillian's wise,
doting aunts.  But Aidan Quinn doesn't quite fit as a detective hot on
Jimmy's trail.  The townsfolk are amusing at times, but rarely
believable in their convictions.
Practical Magic is a nice enough movie, but, on the whole, it's
disappointing. Everything wraps up a bit too neatly, and the whole film
is missing a certain charm.  At best, it makes for a fluffy little
diversion.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Nil by Mouth (1997)
For his directoral debut, Gary Oldman chose a highly personal family
drama about a violent, alcoholic husband and father, and the various
lives he affects.  But while the characters, places and events may have
special meaning to the writer-director, the audience is left in the
dark.
The center of this tale is the abusive Raymond (Ray Winstone), and the
film focuses on him and the people who orbit around him.  He spends his
days hanging out with his friends at pubs and girlie bars.  Then, he
returns home to his pregnant wife, Valerie (Kathy Burke) and their
five-year-old daughter.
Raymond demonstrates his violent tendencies (and his paranoid delusions)
early on when he accuses Valerie's brother, Billy (Charlie Creed-Miles),
of stealing.  Raymond then proceed to beat (and bite) him to a bloody
wreck.  But these are the least of Billy's problems.  Billy is a heroin
addict on the downturn, and it doesn't seem that he'll last much longer.
Billy and Valerie's mother, Janet (Laila Morse), is Raymond's nemesis.
She disapproves of him (and he of her), but is powerless to do anything
about it.  She merely struggles on, hoping her children will survive
their respective torments.
If this description seems bleak, I haven't told the half of it.  This is
not a cheery movie, and most of the time it's downright depressing.
While at times it is interesting to watch to see just what makes Raymond
tick, and why no one ever simply calls the cops on him,  in the end,
it's not quite worth it.
There are too many scenes which randomly dot the picture with little or
no purpose. Take for example the extended sequence where one of Billy's
scuzzy friends defends a stray puppy.  The film is filled with these
"character moments" that never really achieve anything.  Granted, there
are a few genuinely powerful (and sickening) moments in the film, but
their expression seems to be more of a catharsis for the creator than
us.
The actors do a fine job, particularly in the central roles.  The good
thing about an actor turned writer is that Oldman knows how to write
good scenes, and the actors in Nil By Mouth have some meat they can tear
into.
The bad thing about an actor turned director is that there's no one to
restrain
Oldman from making poor choices.  A good character drama should mean
something to
those involved in making the film AND the audience.  Oldman got it about
half right.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Music From Another Room (1998)
Is love at first sight possible?  The romantic comedy, Music From
Another Room would like you to believe so.  However, it doesn't make a
very convincing argument.
Danny (Jude Law) has met his true love.  It happened when he was five
years old...he helped to deliver a newborn named Anna Swan, and knew
that one day they would marry.
Flash forward many years.  Danny accidentally stumbles across the Swan
family again and sets about integrating himself into their lives.  The
mother of the family (Brenda Blethyn) remembers him, but the rest of the
family is not so sure of his intentions.  Particularly when his feelings
for Anna become known.
Anna (Gretchen Mol), you see, has grown up and is now engaged to be
married to Eric (Jon Tenney).  She has also turned out to be rather cold
and remote.  Why Danny spends the entire movie chasing after her is a
complete mystery.
At least Anna's family is more interesting, in a contrived sort of way.
Her sister Nina (Jennifer Tilly) is blind and fearful of the world.  Her
brother Billy (Jeremy Piven) has some fidelity issues with his wife.
And her sister Karen (Martha Plimpton) is a shameless feminist.
In the entire movie, Nina is the most interesting character, although
her storyline never pans out in a believable way.  Jennifer Tilly is
able to endow her character with the spark of life that is absent from
Anna.
Music From Another Room is painfully overwritten.  The stilted dialogue
that fills the film is nothing anyone would actually say.  But that's
ok...hardly any of the film's scenes are believable anyway.  The film's
script is definitely its weakest link.
So that leaves us with characters we don't care anything about,
blabbering nonsense, all the while doing incredulous things.  Hardly an
auspicious set of ingredients for a romantic comedy.
None of the cast give terribly endearing performances.  Jennifer Tilly
and Jude Law are the standouts in a rather uninspiring collection.
Music From Another Room tries to be a light and whimsical romantic
comedy, with a little dysfunctional family humor tossed in for topical
spice.  However, while not a complete disaster, it's rarely comic and
hardly romantic.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Bug's Life, A (1998)
The season's second computer-animated ant tale (following Antz) has
finally hit the theaters.  It lacks some of the earlier film's
sophisticated humor, but more than makes up for it with its rich
animation and endearing characters.
The ant colony on Ant Island has problems.  Every year, the ants must
toil to collect enough food to appease a gang of bad grasshoppers, led
by the menacing Hopper (Kevin Spacey), in addition to enough food to
support the colony.  One inventive ant, Flik (Dave Foley), has a
creative food-gathering idea...which unfortunately backfires, leaving
the colony to face some rather angry grasshoppers.
Flik is sent away to find some help:  warrior bugs the colony can hire
to fight off the grasshoppers.  Unfortunately for the colony, the
error-prone Flik brings back a band of misfit circus bugs (who are under
the impression they've been hired to put on a show).
Among the helpers are a trio of clowns:  the a male ladybug Francis
(Denis Leary), walking stick Slim (David Hyde Pierce), and corpulent
German caterpillar Heimlich (Joe Ranft).  There are a pair of Hungarian
pillbug acrobats, Tuck and Roll (Michael McShane), the quick-spinning
black widow Rosie (Bonnie Hunt), and her tame beetle Dim (Brad
Garrett).  Rounding out the troupe are the praying mantis magician Manny
(Jonathan Harris), and his moth sidekick Gypsy (Madeline Kahn).
The animation quality of A Bug's Life is simply spectacular.  The
animators at Pixar have broken new ground with the realism of the
surroundings.  The plants, twigs, and surrounding vegetation is
impressively realistic.  The bugs aren't as impressive (most look like
they're made of cloth or vinyl), but are still expressively animated.
But, as good as the animation is, it's the characters here that stand
out once again.  As with Pixar's earlier film, Toy Story, the vocal
talent have been perfectly matched with the characters they play. Unlike
Antz, whose characters were overshadowed by the big name voice actors,
the characters in A Bug's Life come first.
The humor of A Bug's Life is both subtle and simple.  The in-jokes that
peppered Antz aren't to be found here...instead we're assaulted with the
humor present in a minutiae of details.  There are lots of little
things, such as the variety of bugs and buildings in the bug "city",
which require multiple viewings to catch them all.  Not much of the
humor here will sail over the heads of children...but adults will still
find plenty to grin about.
A Bug's Life may not be as groundbreaking as Toy Story, but it is nearly
as entertaining.  There's a little something for everyone here, and the
film is a blast to watch.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Vita  bella, La (1997)
Life is Beautiful is a rare treat:  a lighthearted comedy that tackles a
very serious subject without committing the sins of being disrespectful,
or, even worse, humorless.  It combines a charming romance with a dash
of farce, stirs in a little poignancy, and ends up a very enjoyable
movie. It's an Italian film, but don't let that discourage you.
Subtitle-phobes will be missing a wonderful experience.
Life is Beautiful opens as a sweet romantic comedy, with the clownish,
but good natured Guido (Roberto Benigni) arriving in a rustic Italian
town to work as a waiter for his uncle.  The year is 1939, and Guido
literally stumbles into the girl of his dreams, Dora (Nicoletta
Braschi). Their romance seems to be picture perfect, with only one
stumbling block: she's already engaged to another man.  Can Guido
overcome the odds and win his girl? What do you think?
However, five years later, things have taken a turn for the worse in
Italy.  The fascists have stepped up their race initiatives, which is
bad news for the Jewish Guido and his new son Giosue (Giorgio
Cantarini), who are rounded up and shipped off to a concentration camp.
Unable to protect his boy in any other way, Guido attempts to shield his
young son from the horrors of the labor camp.  He pretends that
everything is all an elaborate game, with points awarded for such tasks
as hiding, being brave and being very very quiet.
As you can tell from the description, Life is Beautiful has two very
different tones, but manages to excel at both of them.  As a romantic
comedy, it is sweet and funny.  As a bittersweet tale of hope amid
despair, it is touching.
Roberto Benigni's work here has been compared with some of the best of
Chaplin's, and it is easy to see why.  He is able to run the gamut of
comic expression, from slapstick to farce, with a warm-hearted feeling
that celebrates his downtrodden hero's "triumph of the underdog" spirit.
Life is Beautiful treads a thin line when it turns its attentions to the
Holocaust.  However, it is able to successfully navigate the minefield,
without demeaning the gravity of the horrors involved, nor without
losing its humorous edge that allows you to smile through the tears.
With Life is Beautiful, Benigni has created a triumphant, but
bittersweet comedy. It's quite simply one of the most enjoyable times
I've had at the movies this year.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Siege, The (1998)
What steps are necessary to control domestic terrorism? How far do you
go to combat an evil that hides among us?  Those are among the questions
that are asked by The Siege, a political thriller which goes a bit
deeper than your traditional shoot-em-up to explain and question the
ethics involved in battling an unseen enemy.
Denzel Washington stars as FBI agent, Anthony Hubbard.  "Hub" is the
leader of an anti-terrorism task force in New York City, who is thrust
into the spotlight when a series of devastating terrorist attacks rock
the city.  As the incidents and the civilian body count rise, he is
placed under increasing pressure to find and eliminate the terrorist
cell.
As the incidents continue to escalate, the federal government begins to
question whether standard law enforcement can hope to stop the bombings.
The spectre of martial law is raised, under the leadership of one
General Devereaux (Bruce Willis).  Devereaux is personally against the
idea, but if ordered to enforce martial law, he is determined to let no
obstacle stop the army from destroying the terrorist threat.
Contributing to the confusing situation is the mysterious CIA agent
Elise (Annette Bening).  She apparently has tangential contacts with the
terrorist cell, but how deeply is she (and the CIA) involved with the
terrorists themselves?
Though it starts out apparently as a standard fight-the-terrorists
thriller, The Siege eventually unfolds into an ethical debate.  The
Arabic-speaking population of New York (in which, it is presumed, the
terrorists are hiding) become targets of suspicion and derision. Hate
crimes against the community begin to rise, and the entire city is
polarized.
Denzel Washington falls once again into a role where he gets to act out
his righteous indignation.  I suppose he gravitates toward those roles
because he plays them so well (as he does here), but, at least just
once, I'd like to see him argue the "wrong" side of a moral dilemma.
Anyhow, his performance here is as captivating as always.  Even though
his character isn't that interesting by itself, his sheer presence grabs
your attention while he's on the screen.
Bruce Willis is in a mostly thankless role as the reluctant general. He
gets to speechify a bit upfront, but for most of the film he's placed in
the "bad cop" role (opposite Washington's "good cop"). Annette Bening is
an interesting wild card, and she's able to hold her own opposite
Washington.
As the bad guys, the terrorists in the film are rather shallow.  They're
really used as merely a plot device, rather than actual villains.  The
true conflict is the ethical one...not the cop vs. terrorist storyline.
The moral questions at the center of the film are truly intriguing, and
deserve contemplation.  However, in order to wrap the film up with a
tidy neat ending, the plot makes a few "lucky coincidence" leaps.  It
still flows all right, but the film loses a bit of moral
resonance...it's like playing with a stacked deck.
Still, The Siege is exciting and thought-provoking.  It's designed to
stir up some questions (something which it certainly does), but it also
entertains as well.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Desperate Measures (1998)
To save a loved one, how great a cost would you be willing to pay?
Would you be willing to break the law?  If so, which ones, and how many
times? Is that one life worth the lives of others?  How about a
potential threat to those lives?  These are several of the questions
that float just below the surface of Desperate Measures, which is
otherwise a routine thriller. Ultimately, the film could have been a
better one with a more thorough exploration of these issues, but, as it
stands, it is a mildly entertaining piece of work.
Frank Connor (Andy Garcia) is a San Francisco cop, and a dedicated
father. Those two roles are about to conflict when his leukemia-stricken
son needs a bone marrow transplant.  Unable to find a conventional donor
who is compatible, Frank turns to some ethically improper techniques to
discover the one man who can save his child's life:  Peter McCabe
(Michael Keaton).
However, McCabe presents a problem.  It turns out that he is a
sociopath, a convicted multiple-murderer serving out a life sentence
without parole.  Frank has to find some way to get McCabe to agree to a
bone marrow transfer.  And then there's the procedure itself (ably
performed by Dr. Samantha Hawkins (Marcia Gay Harden)), which could be
McCabe's best hope for escape since he was incarcerated.
The story in Desperate Measures is a straightforward one.  You can see
the end of the film from the beginning.  The ending is never in doubt.
Just ask yourself, how many child-in-jeopardy thrillers actually end up
with a dead kid?
McCabe's scheme is outlined.  We see what he's planning to do, and then
he does it (mostly) without flaw.  Although there's some interest in
seeing how intricately plotted his plan is...it seems mechanical, and
lacks a spark that might have made it totally enthralling.
On the dramatic side, there are plenty of conflicts where McCabe uses
his medical uniqueness to his own advantage.  Frank not only has to
recapture McCabe, but he has to keep him alive...or his own son will
die.  This puts Frank uncomfortably at odds with his own police force,
whose goal is to keep McCabe from escaping at any cost.
Realistically, Frank's actions, carrying a tremendous cost of life and
property, simply to save his son, would land him in a nice comfy cell
(right next to McCabe, perhaps).  Of course, the film never follows up
the matter quite this far.
Andy Garcia is sympathetic as Frank, but beyond his mindless devotion to
his son, there's really very little to his character.  He actually
covered some of the same ground (the conflict between duty and family)
with a much better performance in the neglected Night Falls on
Manhattan. Between him and the villain, Keaton is certainly the one to
watch.  He not only gives the more vibrant performance, but has the
better character of the two.
The action scenes in the film are fun to watch, even if, at times, they
seem a bit unplausible.  Even though the plotting of the film is
straightforward, watching Keaton's plan unfold is interesting, and there
is suspense...mostly of the "how" variety, rather than "what".
Though there definitely are flaws in the movie, it is entertaining. You
might wish the film explored some of its core issues in more depth, but,
unlike many thrillers, it does give you something to think about as you
leave the theater.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Beloved (1998)
The movie Beloved is rather like it's title character:  unusual,
disorienting and not quite what you'd expect.  However, that's not to
say that the film isn't good (which it is), but rather that it's a
difficult beast to classify.  It's eerily supernatural, yet with an
earthy realism.  It's intimate in scale, and yet epic in scope.
Oprah Winfrey stars as Sethe, a woman who ran away from slavery eighteen
years earlier, and now lives on the outskirts on Cincinnati.  She lives
with her antisocial daughter, Denver (Kimberly Elise), as well as a
mysterious poltergeist, in their house at 124 Bluestone Road.
Yes, you read that right, "poltergeist".  Their house is haunted.  And
while the Amityville-goings-on might scare away anyone with common
sense, Sethe is simply tired of running.  Besides, the spirit which
shakes their house and squeezes their dog isn't evil..."just sad".
But things are stirred up by the arrival of two visitors.  The first is
Paul D (Danny Glover), a weary man who knew Sethe when they were both
slaves at the Sweet Home Plantation.  The second is more mysterious, an
asthmatic girl (Thandie Newton) who moves like an epileptic puppet and
calls herself "Beloved" in a croaking voice.
Jonathan Demme directs this adaptation of Toni Morrison's novel with a
hallucinatory flair.  Some scenes are oversaturated, others faded.
Colors glow, the angles shift... it's almost as if the camera is
possessed, as well as the house.  Yet, through it all, we are able to
connect and bond with the characters, and experience the horrors and
triumphs of their story.
Oprah Winfrey could have her pick of roles, and certainly could have
picked a more glamorous one than Sethe, but it would have been hard to
find a stronger character. Wounded with scars deeper than the welts on
her back, Sethe is a complex, multilayered character.  Many an actress
might have stumbled in the role, but Oprah is up to the challenge, and
delivers Sethe's many facets.
Danny Glover isn't as lucky.  His Paul D is as downtrodden as Sethe, but
not as nuanced. We learn little about him as the film progresses, and,
eventually, he is just cast aside.  We see his external feelings towards
Sethe, Beloved and Denver, but rarely his motivations.
Thandie Newton is appropriately creepy and charming in the role of
Beloved.  Though, even at the end of the film, many things about her
remain a mystery, it is a fascinating character, and a challenging
role.  Kimberly Elise's Denver is less showy, but no less well acted.
She is able to hold her own against all the otherworldly happenings in
her house...just not ready to face the real world.
The storyline of Beloved is complex, but not convoluted.  It does
require that you pay attention, however.  An ill-timed bathroom run
during this 3-hour movie may mean you'll be missing the keystone to the
whole puzzle.  Be warned.
Perhaps the best adjective to describe Beloved is "haunting".  Just as
Sethe and Paul D are haunted by the past, and just as 124 Bluestone Road
is haunted...so too, you'll be haunted by Beloved.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Species II (1998)
Just when you thought it was safe to go back to the movie theater,
there, lurking in the corners, leaps out a stupefyingly horrid sequel to
1995's sci-fi misfire, Species.
Those rascally scientists, not having learned their lesson from the
first movie, have recreated Sil...now called Eve (Natasha Henstridge).
Under the supervision of Dr. Laura Baker (Marg Helgenberger), this new
Eve is calmer and more sedate, but is used as a lab rat to research
weapons against future Species-alien attacks.
That disaster scenario is coming true sooner than some have anticipated.
The first manned mission to Mars is underway, with a crew including
Justin Lazard and Mykelti Williamson.  The Martian soil samples they
retrieve contain more than dirt...they contain Species DNA samples. When
the crew returns, all three may have been infected and are potentially
hazardous to their mates.  Luckily, NASA has established a 10-day sexual
quarantine for interplanetary flights (no, really!).
>From there, it all goes downhill (which, since it is one of the opening
scenes, is no small trick).  Soon, multiple alien sexual predators are
on the loose again, each trying to mate to produce the "perfect"
offspring.  Now that's one thing that I just don't quite understand
about this movie.  Why would this creature, which now has the ability to
assimilate people with merely a few strands of its DNA, need to bother
with creating a "perfect" offspring. (Disregarding the fact that the
offspring of two hybrids wouldn't necessarily be "pure").  One would
think that the creature should just wander around the countryside
bleeding.  Its pools of blood are apparently sentient, and if they can't
kill humanity...they should be able to merge with it in no time.
But that would assume the movie was trying to make sense.  No, this is
the movie that has people thinking things like, "Hmm...a crawling pool
of blood...I think I'll walk over and touch it..."  The film touts its
own stupidity and scientific ignorance as if it were a badge of honor
(even though I don't think the film's even smart enough to know what a
badge is.)
No...the heart of Species and its sequel is: alien sex.  Rather than
present us with the ultimate femme fatale, as in the original, the
sequel instead delivers a series of literally explosive pregnancies.  (A
strange thing though:  all the resulting offspring mysteriously acquire
identical grey shirts as their only form of clothing.  Maybe it's
another mutation...but then, I'm thinking again.  Bad reviewer!  Bad
reviewer!).  The film is chock full of  nudity (both human and alien),
sex and gore.  Heck, if that turns you on...more power to ya.
But don't go in expecting any great sci-fi action scenes.  (Or even
tepid ones like the original).  No, the brainless attitude of the film
destroys any sense of suspense even quicker than your credulity
evaporates.
One thing we can, unfortunately, expect is yet another sequel.  Like
most horror films, this one leaves the door wide open.  In fact, it
fails to resolve a central point to do so.  Gone are the days of the
faint rasp of facehuggers crawling after the credits in Aliens...these
days the filmmakers don't care about subtlety, or even resolving the
plot... At least they didn't stoop as low as the mutant rat in the first
film (a thread which, thankfully, is never followed upon).
As Marg Helgenberger utters after witnessing a spectacularly gory
corpse:  "This is awful...just awful."  I couldn't have said it better.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Doug's 1st Movie (1999)
Following the success of The Rugrats Movie, Disney has been quick to
follow suit.  Doug's 1st Movie takes the TV cartoon staple, Doug, and
plops him where he doesn't quite belong:  on the movie screen. The
result is mildly entertaining (though purely for kids), but possesses no
real draw to see it at the theater.
Doug Funnie (Thomas McHugh) is your average everyday kid.  His time is
divided between pining for his love, Patti Mayonaise (Constance
Shulman), and helping his pal, Skeeter Valentine (Fred Newman), hunt for
the legendary Monster of Lucky Duck lake.
His adventures truly begin when he discovers that the monster is real!
Not only that, but the monster is friendly (in an E.T. sort of way), and
moves in with Doug.  Of course, this complicates Doug's plans to help
Patti organize the Valentine's Day dance.
The plot fluctuates between the realistic (Doug's infatuation with
Patti, and his rivalry with a suave 8th-grader, Guy (Guy Hadley)) and
the bizarre (the Monster, a killer robot, and a magical shrinking ray).
But, then again, when the average student at Doug's middle school might
be blue, purple or green, who's to say what's normal?
The film tries to tackle the issue of pollution, but never truly grasps
the issue.  Apparently, town mogul Mr. Bluff (Doug Preis) has been
dumping toxic waste into Lucky Duck Lake.   This has not only spawned
the friendly monster, but made the lake into a terrible pool of acid not
seen since the likes of Dante's Peak. Now, however, the monster decides
that the Lake is to toxic for him to call home (though, shouldn't our
atmosphere be toxic to a monster born to pollution). Meanwhile, the evil
Mr. Bluff wants to kill the monster for two widely different reasons:
to keep people from knowing about the monster, and to let people know
about the monster (so he can be the hero who saves the town). It gives
you a headache if you try and make sense of it all.
Kids who enjoy Doug on TV will continue to find him likable on the big
screen.  However, there's very little reason for him to be there. In all
honesty, this feels more like a direct-to-video cartoon rather than a
piece of quality feature animation.  There's little here to entertain
adults, and kids aren't likely to care whether Doug Funnie is 40 feet
tall on a movie screen, or 27" on TV.
If you're desperate for a kid film to see at the theater, this one will
certainly do in a pinch.  But, on the whole, you're better off waiting
for the video.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Shooting Fish (1997)
Stefan Schwartz directs this con-game comedy from his own script...a
script has a few good idea, but which is overwhelmed by problems.
Dylan (Dan Futterman) and Jez (Stuart Townsend) are a pair of hard
working con artists seeking to earn 2 million pounds for poor orphans
(they're both orphans, you see...).  Dylan is the smooth talker, while
Jez is the technical genius.
For one of their scams, they hire a typist, Georgie (Kate Beckinsale),
to pretend to be a computer.  However, each of the men fall madly in
love with Georgie, who doesn't want anything to do with illicit scams.
You see, Georgie has problems of her own.  She's secretly (at least from
Dylan and Jez) engaged to marry a man she despises, yet must marry. Yet
she yearns for the sense of adventure she experiences while around Jez
and Dylan.
Shooting Fish has an occasional bright moment scattered here and there.
Some of the cons are amusing, but most of them are a little too
prolonged.
The movie seriously runs aground during its last act, when it contorts
to deliver a cloyingly happy ending.  Its intent may be self-parody at
this point, but whatever the intentions, it rings a note shockingly out
of tune with the rest of the film.
The cast is pleasant, but nothing special.  Of the three leads, Kate
Beckinsale is the most congenial, and has the strongest character.
There's not much more to Dylan and Jez than has been put down in this
review.
Shooting Fish ends up being a nice, but unmemorable little film that had
the chance to be much better.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Men with Guns (1997/II)
John Sayles tackles his next subject in his new film Men With Guns.  The
trouble is, I'm not sure what his subject is...and I'm not sure he
knows, either.
Dr. Fuentes (Federico Luppi) is a city doctor in an unnamed Latin
American country.  His wife has recently died, and he is coping with the
issue of his legacy.  The one thing he has done which gives him the
greatest pride is a program he started to bring medicine to the Indians.
He taught several medical students and then sent them out to the Indian
villages in the mountains.  However, he hasn't heard from them, and so
he begins a quest to track them down.
The journey takes him into the remote regions of his country, where
people are tryannically ruled by Men With Guns:  be they soldiers,
guerrillas, or thieves. Along the way, he is joined by several fellow
travelers:  a parentless young boy (Dan Rivera Gonzalez), an outcast
soldier (Damian Delgado), a priest (Damian Alcazar), and a mute girl
(Tania Cruz).  They are all searching for something, yet none quite know
what it is.
With all of these characters searching for a common unnamed goal, the
film has a strong allegorical feel.  But what is the film trying to
represent?  The movie's message is clouded by its lack of specificity.
Is it yearning for simpler times?  Crying out against the use of
violence?  Deploring the conditions in Latin America?  Pointing out the
futility of altruism against chaos? All of the above?  None of the
above?  The movie is so vague and open to interpretation, the message
could be any or none of these. Somehow the message of the film seems as
pointless as the hero's quest.
Men With Guns is at its strongest during its flashback sequences.  The
appropriately haunting sections are more moving and tragic than the
central quest plotline.
Mandy Patinkin and Kathryn Grody make a few brief, but amusing,
appearances as an American tourist couple who effortlessly bounce along
on a parallel journey to Dr. Fuentes, visiting ruins in a never-ending
search for atrocities.
Overall, watching the film, I get the feeling that Sayles was more
interested in creating the moods and textures involved in the film than
in telling any particular story.  The end result is detachedly
interesting, but could have been strung together to be a much more
interesting movie.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Snake Eyes (1998)
Brian DePalma once again revisits his favorite genre:  the Hitchcockian
thriller. Borrowing a trick from Rope, he films the opening twenty
minutes as one (nearly) seamless scene.  However, soon after this
bravura opening, the film loses all cohesion and begins to fall apart.
Rick Santoro (Nicolas Cage) is a cop who's just as happy to shake down
small time criminals as he is to pursue justice.  He's right at home
among the petty thieves and gambling addicts in his hometown of Atlantic
City.
Snake Eyes takes place during one night, when Hurricane Jezebel is about
to hit the city just as the heavyweight boxing championship is on the
line.  Thanks to Rick's pal Kevin Dunne (Gary Sinise), he has scored
ringside seats.  You see, Kevin is arranging security for the Secretary
of Defense, who is attending the match.
However, when there's an assassination attempt on the secretary's life,
it is up to Rick to unravel the conspiracy.  Suddenly, all 40,000
members of the crowd become potential witnesses, or potential
conspirators. This becomes Rick's one true shot at greatness...but is he
willing to gamble it all?
He may be a crooked cop, but it's hard not to like Rick Santoro. Nicolas
Cage goes the extra mile when infusing Rick with energy and pizzazz.  He
does everything possible to keep the film from bogging down, but in the
end, he just can't help it.
The supporting cast is colorful, but pale next to Cage.  Gary Sinise
plays his role a bit too obviously.  Carla Gugino isn't terribly
tempting as a mysterious woman who is wrapped up in the proceedings.
The minor actors actually fare better, with intriguing turns from Stan
Shaw, Luis Guzman and Kevin Dunn.
The opening "shot" of the film is spectacular.  There are a few
computer-blurred transitions, but otherwise it is one continuous scene.
It lends an immediacy to the proceedings that a traditional shooting
technique might have missed. There's lots of background detail...some
important (which is flashed back upon later in the film), and some red
herrings.  It's a great start for a thriller.
But then everything falls apart.  After such a strong buildup, the
critical piece of evidence ends up being an incredible series of
coincidences. Then, the film's finale is an editing nightmare, filled
with other bizarre coincidences and non sequiturs.  It's a very crude
way to end a film that began with such good portents.
It's a shame, and seems all the worse in retrospect.  It's like being
one card short of a royal flush.  Snake Eyes has the strong central
performance, and some good direction...but in the end, a weak script
brings it all tumbling down.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Half Baked (1998)
Nostalgia for the 70s continues, as we see a revival of one of the
decade's greatest achievements:  the marijuana comedy.  However Half
Baked doesn't quite run with all its brain cells, and will make you
appreciate the questionable talents of Cheech and Chong all the more.
The plot follows the misadventures of four ne'er-do-well stoners.
There's the group's unofficial leader, Thurgood (David Chappelle),
Scarface (Guillermo Diaz), Brian (Jim Breuer), and Kenny (Harland
Williams).
Kenny gets into trouble, when, while on a munchie run, feeds his snack
foods to a diabetic police horse.  When the animal keels over, he finds
himself accused of killing a police officer, and facing a $1,000,000
bail.
His friends promise to raise money for a 10% bail bond, but have no idea
how. That is, until Thurgood stumbles upon a stash of pharmaceutical
marijuana being tested at the company where he works as a janitor.  Soon
the three guys are dealing dope to raise funds, while avoiding the cops
and rival dealer Sampson Simpson (Clarence Williams III).
For a comedy, the film is pretty humorless.  Not that it doesn't
try...it's just that the comic setups are obvious and the payoffs nearly
all fall flat.  The four leads are nearly all playing the same
character.  Only Williams stands out (while still performing on the
level of his humor-free comedy Rocket Man), but that is because he's
imprisoned throughout most of the film, giving a much needed change of
pace (but mostly swapping one set of obvious gags for another).
To help out, the film is packed full of cameos.  Steven Wright, Tommy
Chong, Janeane Garofalo, Willie Nelson, Snoop Doggy Dogg, and Jon
Stewart all make appearances at one point or another. None of them work,
beyond the simple "hey, that's _____" level.
In fact the funniest work in the film comes from Chappelle.  Not as his
bland pothead lead, but in his second role, as a pot-obsessed rapper,
Sir Smokealot.  Granted, it's pretty much a one-joke role, and there
aren't a ton of laughs...but this film needs every one it can scrape up.
To top it off, and in a move contrasting with the tone of the rest of
the film, Thurgood is given a love interest, Mary Jane (Rachel True).
Her role is that of the Public Service Announcement:  to inform us why
doing drugs (including pot) is wrong.  Her character seems fabricated
merely as a defense to the "your film promotes the use of drugs" camp.
The film would have been better off by sticking with the "rebel" tone it
so eagerly tries to claim.
Yet, in the end, it doesn't really matter.  Watching the film clean and
sober, you are bound to recognize how truly awful it is.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 500 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
Not your typical Jim Carrey fare, The Truman Show is a daring
comedy-drama which turns a scathing eye upon the media culture.  Fans
expecting Carrey's usual shtick will be disappointed here...but few else
will be, for this intelligent and invigorating film is a fascinating
look at the struggle between individual spirit and the media culture.
Truman Burbank (Jim Carrey) is the star of the world's most popular
television show, only he doesn't know it.  As a baby, he was adopted by
a corporation, and ever since, every moment of his life has been
secretly broadcast to billions.
His entire life, the entire world around him, is artificial.  The entire
town of Seahaven, where Truman lives, is in reality one huge set. The
sun, the moon, and even the weather are artificially controlled. Every
person he ever met has been an actor playing a carefully scripted role.
>From his best friend (Noah Emmerich) to his wife (Laura Linney),
everyone is in on the secret but Truman himself.
But this carefully constructed world is starting to unravel for Truman.
Whenever he does something unexpected, such as falling in love with an
extra (Natascha McElhone), the show's godlike director Christof (Ed
Harris) has to scramble to keep reality consistent for his star.  But
little cracks are beginning to show, and the wanderlust-driven Truman
begins to doubt his own reality.
The film is nearly as much about its audience as it is about its title
character.  Even the opening credits are staged as if we were watching
The Truman Show itself (i.e. Starring Truman Burbank as Truman Burbank),
with the actual movie credits saved until the end.  Only occasionally
does the film venture outside the television perspective to show us
either the backstage workings behind the show, or the reactions of the
show's devoted audience.  But in reality, we are the audience who are
captivated by the struggles of a seemingly normal man in a seemingly
normal life.  Truman Burbank is the ultimate celebrity... prepackaged
for our viewing enjoyment, but also a human being fighting the eternal
struggle for freedom.  Entertainment at its best (and worst).
Jim Carrey tackles the best role of his career, and (how's this for a
shocker) he's not playing Jim Carrey, unlike the rest of his virtually
interchangeable frenzied roles.  No, this is a subtle, nuanced Jim
Carrey...and, what do you know...he actually can act!  There were still
one too many "Jim Carrey" moments in the film... bones thrown to the
masses of Jim Carrey fans who, the studio apparently fears, might rebel
if not treated to a glimpse of standard Carrey fare.
The rest of the cast has the unique challenge of playing the part of
actors playing a part.  Emmerich does a good job as the best pal who's
somehow always nearby when Truman needs a friend, but Laura Linney
stiffly overacts her part as Truman's wife.  It's hard to believe Truman
doesn't see through her from the start. One opportunity lost in the film
is to fill in any back story on the other actors.  While it's not
crucial to the film (which is the Truman show after all), it would have
been interesting to see (or simply to hear the actors say in an
interview, for example) the effect of living a 24-hour lie on their own
lives.
Ed Harris does a delightful job as the show's creator/producer. Half
deity, half mad scientist, he can't quite comprehend whyTruman would
even want something besides his artificial ideal existence. It may be a
zoo cage...but it's a really, really nice one.
A couple of times the question comes up, why hasn't Truman detected the
ruse long before?  I believe the answer lies in his upbringing. His
entire life has been a lie, to the extent that he doesn't know the truth
when he sees it. If Truman has never seen a real sunrise, why would he
be disappointed in a spectacularly recreated one?
The film does make a misstep (though one calculated to make Truman more
accessible to the audience) by casting Truman as such a normal guy.  He
should have been used to being subtly pushed and prodded around, and
should have been oblivious the minor inconsistencies that are obvious to
the audience.  But that's a minor nit, and the film doesn't lose much by
portraying Truman as a much more normal man than he should have been.
Multi-faceted, The Truman Show delivers on several levels.  Not only is
it an enjoyable human drama, but also an intriguing look at the excesses
of a celebrity oriented culture and a disturbing look at the future of
entertainment.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Dangerous Beauty (1998)
Marshall Herskovitz directs this alternatively comic and earnestly
serious period piece based on the biography of a famous 16th century
poet/courtesan, Veronica Franco.
As a girl, Veronica Franco (Catherine McCormack) has only eyes for Marco
Venier (Rufus Sewell).  Yet fate schemes to keep them apart.  For, you
see, this is 16th century Venice, where marriage is a political tool,
and women are little more than property, their worthiness judged by
their dowry.  Marco comes from a high standing political family, and
Veronica, alas, is poor.
However, there is a way out for Veronica.  Her mother (Jacqueline
Bisset) gives her the option of becoming a high-class prostitute, a
courtesan, as she once was herself.  Although it may seem appalling at
first, the courtesan dwells amid luxury, freedom and riches.  And (the
point which wins Veronica over) courtesans are the only women in which
education is encouraged, since they are the confidants and bedtime
advisors of nobles and generals.
By taking this path, rather than following her friend, Beatrice (Moira
Kelly), into the sheltered life of an arranged marriage, Veronica hopes
to be Marco's lover, since she can't be his husband.  But will Marco be
accepting of the love of a courtesan?
Dangerous Beauty is at its best when it is lighthearted, a mood which
dominates most of the film.  However, there are moments, particularly in
the film's finale, when the film's tone shifts to one of deadly
seriousness. At such times, the dreadful self-importance threatens to
overwhelm the film.  Luckily, they don't make up the bulk of the film.
As long as you have an open mind about the film's subject matter, the
playful attitude of Dangerous Beauty wins out.
Catherine McCormack delivers a splendid performance as Veronica,
believably running the gamut from innocent to...not so innocent, with an
appropriate mix of inquisitiveness and longing. Though Rufus Sewell
turns in a decent performance as her would-be lover, Oliver Platt steals
the show as his penniless friend, Maffio, who engages Veronica in a
battle of wits, while he secretly longs for her.
The film faithfully recreates 16th century Venice, with some stunning
vistas along the canals.  The beautiful scenery helps to enhance the
atmosphere which made Venice one of the most decadent cities of its
time.
Dangerous Beauty is anything but the stuffy period drama a cursory look
might curse it to seem.  As a lighthearted and funny look (most of the
time) at 16th century mores, the movie is a delightful sweet to savor.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Primary Colors (1998)
In 1994, an insider's look at a scandal-ridden run for the Democratic
presidential nomination (closely based on Clinton's 1992 campaign) was
written anonymously (former Newsweek writer Joe Klein later claimed true
authorship).  Now, the book, Primary Colors, has been made into a movie,
directed by Mike Nichols, and, in light of recent presidential scandals,
seems to be more relevant than ever. But the film is more than a
diatribe against, or a paean in praise of, the president.  It is a
fascinating look at the political machinery, and the ethical quagmire,
that surround modern politics.
Jack Stanton (John Travolta) is the governor of a small southern state
running for the Democratic presidential nomination.  He is charismatic,
but has several flaws which threaten to doom his campaign, and strains
his relationship with his wife, Susan (Emma Thompson).
The film is told from the point of view of Henry Burton (Adrian Lester),
grandson of a civil rights leader, who is swept away by Stanton's ideals
and helps to organize the campaign.  He joins political strategist
Richard Jemmons (Billy Bob Thornton, looking an awful lot like James
Carville), and campaign advisor Daisy Green (Maura Tierney).
Governor Stanton's past repeatedly pops up to haunt him, a fact that his
chief rival, Lawrence Harris (Kevin Cooney), consistently uses to his
advantage.  To help clean up the Stanton campaign, Jack and Susan bring
in an old friend, Libby "The Dustbuster" Holden (Kathy Bates).
The acting throughout Primary Colors is superb. It would be worth seeing
the movie for Bates' wild performance alone. She enlivens the atmosphere
with energy in a truly boisterous performance. Travolta does a fair
Clinton impersonation as Governor Stanton, although his accent does
stray a little.  Emma Thompson delivers a strong performance as his
suffering wife who can't let anything show that might hurt the
presidential run.
The problem with political movies is that they tend to alienate over
half of their audience by promoting one side or the other, or else the
movie is vague to the point of boredom.  Primary Colors treads lightly
on this issue.  Though Stanton is clearly portrayed as a Democrat, and
there are a few minor barbs thrown in the way of Republicans, the movie
touches on few actual political issues. In fact, most of the "bad guys"
are fellow Democrats on the same road to the White House.
Rather than issues, the film is primarily concerned about scandals and
spin control.  Although the film strays into some obviously non-Clinton
territory, it is difficult to completely separate it from reality
(particularly when certain scenes seem to highlight the President's
current troubles).
Primary Colors' chief problem is its length.  It runs about 15 minutes
too long.  There are some scenes which could have easily been cut. For
example, midway through the film, the candidate gives a speech to an
assembly of laid off machinists.  The scene's only apparent purpose is
to establish Stanton's character, which has already been done in similar
scenes earlier in the film.  The extra length isn't long enough nor
tiring enough to be annoying, but it mars an otherwise excellent film.
Republicans, Democrats, and political agnostics should all be able to
find something to like in Primary Colors.  It's a funny, and at some
times shocking, look at the modern political process.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for I'll Be Home for Christmas (1998)
It must be the holiday season already.  Stores are stocked with
decorations galore, and the local theaters are stocked with "feel-good"
holiday films, like I'll Be Home for Christmas.  However, don't be
fooled by its title...you aren't likely to build up much holiday cheer
by forcing yourself to sit through this torturous ninety-minute debacle.
Jonathan Taylor Thomas stars as the annoying prep school kid, Jake. Jake
is the type of smarmy kid who tries to talk his way out of everything,
and mostly succeeds.  His father (Gary Cole), believing the only way his
son will return home for the holidays, resorts to bribery.  If Jake can
make it home by 6:00 Christmas Eve, he will get his dad's classic
Porsche as a present. Jake would do anything for the car...but he runs
into a little bit of trouble along the way...
A group of angry jocks, angry at Jake for a failed scheme of his,
kidnaps him, glues him into a Santa suit, and strands him in the
California desert.  Penniless, Jake must make his cross-country trek in
a few short days if he ever hopes to see that car...or his girlfriend.
You see, his charms have been wearing thin on his girlfriend, Allie
(Jessica Biel).  She's had one too many stories and lies, and when he
fails to meet her for the Christmas return home, she decides to take a
ride with Jake's rival, Eddie (Adam Lavorgna), instead.
All of this might be the slightest bit interesting if we cared one iota
about Jake and/or his predicament.  But we don't.  From the get-go, his
cocky attitude is extremely off-putting, and his "charms" never grow on
us.  Frankly, his dad might as well keep the car, and Allie would
certainly be better off with the only slightly-less annoying Eddie.
Of course, we are treated to all sorts of wild adventures and wacky,
"colorful" characters which Jake runs across in his cross-country trek.
Anyone who's seen any sort of road-trip movie will be intimately
familiar with the type.  Most of these are not near as interesting, nor
as entertaining, as they might have appeared on paper (though it's even
doubtful that some of these appeared interesting there either).
I'll Be Home for Christmas is reminiscent of an annual present that you
don't really want to get.  It means well, but is best left alone and
forgotten.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Chairman of the Board (1998)
Used as a joke in Austin Powers, the infamous Carrot Top movie finally
sees the light of day, and the world is much worse for wear.  A gimmicky
prop comic, Carrot Top (aka Scott Thompson), lacks even the range of
thespian Pauly Shore, and the film's meager compliment of jokes fails to
even be amusing in a bad way.
Carrot Top stars as Edison, a misunderstood gadget genius.  He lives
with his two surfing buddies (Mystro Clark and Jack Plotnick), in a
shack filled with his failed ideas.  One day, he meets an old man (Jack
Warden) with a shared love for inventions and surfing.
Little does Edison know that the man is really Armand McMillan, chairman
of McMillan Industries, and sooner than you can run screaming from the
theater, Armand kicks the bucket and leaves his company to Edison.  Of
course, this doesn't sit well with Armand's nephew, Bradford (Larry
Miller), who has been scheming to sell off the company to a competitor
(Raquel Welch).
Soon, Edison is using the company to produce his wacky ideas while he
romances his co-worker, Natalie (Courtney Thorne-Smith).  Meanwhile,
Bradford does his best to eliminate Edison and destroy the company.
Carrot Top has managed to create a film rarity: a good guy you want to
throttle every time he appears onscreen.  His only saving grace is that
the film is chock full of characters nearly as annoying.  Of the cast,
only Jack Warden and Courtney Thorne-Smith survive with only their
dignity stained.
The plot of Chairman of the Board is familiar and tired.  There's not a
single twist that you couldn't see coming from the opening credits. That
leaves the jokes.  Even in a film as hopeless as this one, a few moments
of humor could have been hidden here or there.  Nope. That's not the
case.  The film's pathetic attempts are so brainless that they're too
stupid to be considered stupid-but-funny.
If you feel a hankering to run out and see Chairman of the Board, you
ought to swallow a handful of thumbtacks.  It will be less painful in
the long run.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Forces of Nature (1999)
Part road movie, part romantic comedy, Forces of Nature takes several
overfamiliar plots and, well, repeats them.  It's certainly not
innovative, but it does have its moments.
Ben (Ben Affleck) is about to be married.  His fiancee, Bridget (Maura
Tierney) is waiting for him in Savannah, where the wedding is set to
take place in a few days.  All Ben has to do is travel from New York to
Savannah.  Easy, right?  Not so fast...
With a seemingly unstoppable streak of bad luck, Ben's path is thwarted
in some way each step of the way.  To further complicate things, he
meets the free-spirited Sarah (Sandra Bullock), also on her way to
Savannah.
The pair use nearly every method of transportation aside from pogo
sticks in their travels, but are always diverted in one way or another.
Will Ben reach Savannah in time  for his wedding?  Will he still want to
get married after his wild  adventures?  Will the audience's still care?
It is hard to watch Forces of Nature without thinking that the
filmmakers must have been heavily influenced by the Steve Martin-John
Candy comedy Planes, Trains and Automobiles.  In fact the plot feels
like a watered down version of that earlier comedy, with a little
romance mixed in.  The misadventures of Ben and Sarah are never truly
inspired, but do have the odd moments of humor.
The screenplay does little to ward off the strange feelings of deja vu.
The film is never subtle about its foreshadowing.  For example, the
film's opening scene focuses on a weather forecast showing a hurricane
heading straight for Savannah.  This warning is repeated multiple times
throughout the film.  The only thing that comes as a surprise is the
fact that none of the characters in the film seem to be aware of what's
coming.
Still, despite the odd feeling that you've been here before, the cast is
able to make the journey worthwhile.  Surprisingly, it isn't due to the
leads who, though likeable, spark little chemistry.  It's the supporting
cast that makes this one shine.  From Maura Tierney to Richard Schiff,
the little roles make the movie. Particular credit goes to Steve Zahn
for perking up the few scenes he's in as the wild and crazy best man.
To wrap things up, Forces of Nature contorts itself to deliver an ending
that is neither crowd-pleasing nor believable.  It's the final
puzzlement in a puzzlement of a movie.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
Call him Godzilla, The Reluctant Lizard.  The makers of Independence Day
have applied their unique sensibilities to reinventing everyone's
favorite big, green, city-stomping reptile.  You don't really expect
much in the way of plot and/or character development, do you? Good.  But
in this new incarnation, the scaly fella may be bigger, but he's not
very impressive.
Born many years earlier, during French nuclear testing in the South
Pacific, Godzilla has chosen this moment to make his public appearance
(And why not?  This is the Summer Movie Season!) From his South Pacific
home, he makes a beeline toward The Big Apple...presumably because of
the smell of fish.
Naturally, the military is concerned.  They bring in an expert in
radiation-induced growth-mutations, Dr. Niko Tatopoulos (Matthew
Broderick).  He is the stock personality-free scientist who has
frequented other Emmerich productions such as Stargate (James Spader),
and Independence Day (Jeff Goldblum).
But Dr. Tatopoulos isn't the only character strewn into the path of a
giant lizard. No, we are tormented with the presence of his
ex-girlfriend, and television reporter hopeful, Audrey Timmonds (Maria
Pitillo)...a completely annoying and unsympathetic character.  At least
she's accompanied by cameraman Victor "Animal" Palotti (Hank Azaria),
who gives the film its best Godzilla-induced fear reaction.
On a more entertaining note, the French Secret Service have dispatched
crack agent Philippe Roache (Jean Reno) to quietly dispose of the
monster. Reno's cool mannerisms and suave style easily make him the most
enjoyable character in the film, even if the French jokes are layed on a
bit thick.
And then there's the big guy...Godzilla himself.  In the original
Japanese monster flicks, Godzilla always had sort of a surly attitude
(probably the result of an unhappy actor spending too much time in an
uncomfortable rubber suit).  The new Godzilla, on the other hand, has no
attitude whatsoever.  He's a personality free lizard, and though you may
not spot any zippers in his new incarnation, he's hardly the same ol'
creature.
The special effects have obviously improved over the years, and you
might think that Godzilla would benefit from the enhanced technology.
The answer is yes and no.  In redesigning the creature, the filmmakers
apparently decided to stay with the "guy in a lizard suit" theme.
Although the new creature has been given a good, realistic head, he is
also in possession of very human arms and legs.  So, even though he's
entirely computer generated, you can never quite shake the image of a
guy in a suit creeping around a model city.
Every special effects driven movie needs to have some sort of
centerpiece scene, a scene which is so impressive that you instantly
forget about secondary problems such as plot or characterization.  Such
a scene is missing from Godzilla.  There's only one action sequence,
stuck at the end of the film, which comes close (it's derivative and
unbelievable, but fun).
You can never expect much from the script for a special effects
extravaganza (after all, if the film is done right, no one will ever
notice little details like a screenplay), but the script for Godzilla
scrapes the bottom of the barrel.  Not much makes sense here (for
example, why is anyone surprised when the radioactive-mutation expert
suggests Godzilla is the result of radioactive-mutation?) and a lot of
little details haven't been thought out (why don't the attack
helicopters fly above the lizard, rather than at mouth range?)  And the
characters?  Independence Day had a stronger batch, and that's not
saying much.  Even the so-called humor in the film (the labored
Siskel-and-Ebert jokes simply seem bitter) fall flat.  No, there's not
much here.
If you're looking for a popcorn film, Godzilla may seem to fill the
bill.  And at the dollar theater, you might be right.  But even as
low-grade mindless entertainment, Godzilla isn't quite satisfying.
You'd get much better entertainment value for your buck by rewatching
some of Godzilla's inspirations: Jurassic Park, or even the original
Gojira. This Godzilla may be big, but he's an empty shell.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Swept from the Sea (1997)
Beeban Kidron directs this romantic epic based on Joseph Conrad's short
story, Amy Foster.  But while the film captures the scenery and scope
necessary for an epic romance, it falls short with a stale plot and a
flat romance.
Vincent Perez stars as Yanko, a Ukranian on an emigrant ship to
America.  He is washed overboard during a severe storm, and washes
ashore on the English countryside.  With his ragged appearance and
unknown tongue, the locals take him for a madman.  He soon finds himself
working for a local property owner, Mr. Swaffer (Joss Ackland), who
treats him little better than a slave.
Only two people sense the humanity inside Yanko.  The first is Amy
Foster (Rachel Weisz), a quiet woman, born to a scandalous marriage, who
is as much of an outcast in the community as Yanko.  Amy is unafraid of
the "mad" stranger, and treats him with kindness and love. The second is
James Kennedy (Ian McKellen), the town's doctor, who is as attracted to
the man as Amy, and sets out to teach the stranger English.
The tale is told in flashback by Kennedy to Swaffer's daughter (Kathy
Bates). However, both of them play integral parts in the tale.  It seems
odd that Miss Swaffer pretends as if she doesn't know the details and
that Kennedy would have to explain so much to her.
With its broad themes of ostracism and acceptance, Swept From the Sea
paints the world in black and white.  The film is at its best in its
earliest scenes, such as Yanko's departure for America, or the English
town's handling of a tragedy.  At these times, there are hints of
shading...we don't quite know where the film will take us, but we're
looking forward to the ride.  Then, once all its characters are in
place, the film settles down into a rut, with no surprises and no
excitement.
In another key problem with the film, the lovers, Amy and Yanko, lack
definition. A quiet woman, Amy says very little, and does little more.
Rachel Weisz never manages to convey any sense of Amy's inner life, and
she remains dead to us and the world. Yanko fares a little better.  At
least Vincent Perez gives him a spark of passion. However, when the two
are together, that spark does not ignite.
Luckily, there's a very strong supporting cast.  Ackland, McKellen and
Bates may be playing nearly featureless characters, but they utilize
their crafts to enliven the hollow shells and give them humanity.  Ian
McKellen in particular has a difficult job.  The film hits you over the
head with his character's subtle leanings, but McKellen manages to give
Dr. Kennedy an air of dignity underneath it all.
When the supporting cast isn't onscreen, at least there are some
beautiful vistas of the English countryside to occupy your attention, so
you're never quite bored.  Yet, when going to see an epic romance, you
usually expect a little more romance than what is delivered.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Big Hit, The (1998)
The Big Hit is a ridiculous ultraviolent action spoof.  It does not take
itself seriously, and neither should you.  It's not the typical
action-comedy, but once you get adjusted to its unique rhythms, it
becomes a hilarious satire.
Melvin Smiley (Mark Wahlberg) is a really nice guy.  He just wants
people to like him.  The trouble is, he's a hitman.  He's good at what
he does, but his job leaves him with ulcers.  To show what a nice guy he
is, he's always giving money away.  Two women are taking advantage of
this human ATM: Melvin's fiancee Pam (Christina Applegate), and his
girlfriend Chantel (Lela Rochon).  Melvin would break up with them...but
he thinks they might not like him anymore if he did that.
Another person who takes advantage of Melvin's generosity is Cisco (Lou
Diamond Phillips).  Melvin and Cisco both work as hitmen for Paris
(Avery Brooks), but Melvin typically does all the work (Cisco just grabs
the paychecks). When Cisco comes up with a money-making scheme, he knows
just the guy to help him out: Melvin.
The two of them, along with Crunch (Bokeem Woodbine) and Gump (Robin
Dunne), plan to kidnap Keiko Nishi (China Chow), the daughter of
billionaire Jiro Nishi(Sab Shimono).  But unforeseen complications ensue
which will turn the kidnappers against one another.
If this sounds the slightest bit serious to you, ignore it.  The film is
a complete and absolute spoof.  If you go in expecting a straightforward
action pic (or even an action-comedy), you'll be tremendously
disappointed.
That's not to say that there's not any action in the film.  Director
Kirk Wong delivers several fine action pieces that, although played
firmly tongue-in-cheek, are very thrilling.  However, they are
subservient to the comedy (rather than the other way around). People
expecting a Hong Kong style action-fest are heading for a letdown.
The comedy in the film doesn't aim very high.  It's just a step-or-two
away from the Airplane style of parody.  But there are plenty of funny
moments, mostly character based.  Crunch's self-love affair, Cisco's
stereotypical boat dream, and Marvin's video-store battles are still
bringing me chuckles.
The film does have its failings.  The characters of Pam's parents
(Elliott Gould and Lainie Kazan) aren't nearly as funny as they try to
be. And there are several moments when the dialogue in the film
unintentionally crosses the boundary between bad-funny and bad-bad.
But, for the most part, The Big Hit is humorous when it counts.  Again,
I caution that you must be in the right frame of mind when seeing this
film.  But if you are, you should find it hilarious.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Elizabeth (1998)
Elizabeth is a loose biopic of the early years of Queen Elizabeth I. It
may be a period piece, but it sure doesn't feel like one.  Thick with
intrigue, and even thicker with strong performances, Elizabeth is
actually more thrilling than many modern-day "thrillers".
The film starts when Elizabeth (Cate Blanchett) is merely a princess,
and one in considerable danger.  The problem, you see, is that she is
next in line for the throne...and a Protestant.  She constantly awaits
an execution order from her half-sister, the dying Queen Mary (Kathy
Burke).
Things don't get any easier when Elizabeth becomes queen herself. The
country is in horrible shape, and the political atmosphere is positively
deadly.  She relies on the advice of the cunning Sir Francis Walsingham
(Geoffrey Rush) to avoid the most turbulent encounters:  particularly
the schemes of the Duke of Norfolk (Christopher Eccleston), who is
constantly plotting her overthrow.
The chief concern of many, including another trusted advisor, Sir
William Cecil (Richard Attenborough), is that Elizabeth marry and
produce an heir.  Only then will her reign be secure.  But the question
remains:  whom to marry?  Marriage alliances with France and Spain
present themselves, but Elizabeth's heart is with Robert Dudley (Joseph
Fiennes), the Earl of Leicester.
Elizabeth is not your typical period piece.  In fact, it has a much more
Godfather-ian feel than the traditional costume drama.  Politics, sex,
murder and deceit are everywhere in this film.  It's not just haughty
people in strange attire...there's a tangible sense of danger that
permeates the film.
The film owes much of its success to the stunning performance by Cate
Blanchett.  She is the heart and soul of the film, and her exciting
portrayal of the young queen proves that it is a strong heart and
vibrant soul indeed.
That's not to diminish the contributions of the remainder of the
splendid cast.  Joseph Fiennes is appealing as the forbidden object of
Elizabeth's desire.  Christopher Eccleston triumphs over a rather flat
character by imbuing him with a truly sinister side. But the true scene
stealer is Geoffrey Rush, whose plots and machinations are a delight as
they unfold.
The sets of Elizabeth are truly a marvel.  Gigantic and sparsely lit,
the shadowy castles, damp corridors and opulent rooms help to establish
the film's moody atmosphere.
Director Shekhar Kapur has created a lush, atmospheric picture, which
(though it takes a few liberties with history) paints an captivating
picture of the slippery slopes of royalty.  Elizabeth is truly a
fascinating film to watch.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)
One of the oldest adages in Hollywood is:  find a good formula and stick
with it.  So, hoping for another Sleepless in Seattle, writer/director
Nora Ephron has once again teamed up with stars Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan
for a cutely sentimental romantic comedy, You've Got Mail.
Kathleen Kelly (Meg Ryan) runs The Shop Around the Corner, an
independent children's book store in New York.  Her store specializes in
personal attention and service...but it is being threatened by the new
Fox Books superstore which is opening down the street.
Kathleen seeks comfort from an online friend she met in a chat room on
the internet.  She anonymously falls in love with this charming,
complete stranger.  But, unbeknownst to her, her online love is none
other than her arch-rival, Joe Fox, of Fox Books fame.  And neither does
Joe Fox know that his online paramour is the troublesome Kathleen Kelly,
chief crusader against the presence of his chain bookstore.
Both Joe and Kathleen are currently involved in relationships.  Kathleen
is attached to a self-obsessed columnist (Greg Kinnear), and Joe is
living with a hyperactive publisher (Parker Posey).  But they are
relationships without passion...unlike what Joe and Kathleen find with
each other online.
Nora Ephron deftly takes the formula from Sleepless in Seattle, and
makes a few minor substitutions (such as, instead of An Affair to
Remember and The Dirty Dozen, You've Got Mail uses Pride and Prejudice
and The Godfather to illustrate the dichotomy between the sexes).  The
end result is familiar, yet pleasant.
The reason the film uses that formula is simple:  it works. Both Ryan
and Hanks cutely emit waves of niceness wherever they go. It's hard not
to like their characters, and you instinctively want them to be
together.
The film's overall plotline is inconsequential in the grand scheme of
things...it's merely there to provide enough obstacles so Meg Ryan and
Tom Hanks don't hook up too soon.  But for an inconsequential plotline,
it is handled well.  The film smartly avoids painting either Ryan or
Hanks as the villain in the bookstore battle (though the film does seem
to favor the "independent" side).  And there are plenty of interesting
little subplots that keep the whole thing from becoming tedious.
In addition to good performances by Hanks and Ryan, the film boasts a
plenitude of above-par supporting turns.  Kinnear and Posey are likable
as the alternative romantic interests...even though they're not
perfectly matched with Ryan and Hanks, we can understand why they start
the movie together.  Steve Zahn makes a good impression as an unusual
employee at The Shop Around the Corner.  Dabney Coleman and Jean
Stapleton  aren't overwhelmed with things to do in their minor roles,
but are a welcome, recognizable presence.
You've Got Mail distills the essence of Meg Ryan and Tom Hanks. It's
cute, funny, nice and ever-so-appealing romantic comedy.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Happiness (1998)
Don't be fooled by the title.  There is happiness in Todd Solondz'
latest film, but it's not exactly what you would expect.  The film
explores several unhappy (and, in some cases, extremely dysfunctional)
people in their quest to find "happiness", wherever they can. Sometimes,
it is in the oddest and most unusual depths.
The film centers on the lives of three dysfunctional sisters, and the
dysfunctional people around them.  First of all, there's Joy (Jane
Adams), who starts out the movie with a painful breakup with her latest
loser boyfriend (Jon Lovitz).
Joy's sister, Helen (Lara Flynn Boyle), is an outwardly successful
woman, beautiful and intelligent.  That's probably what attracts the
attention of her neighbor, Allen (Philip Seymour Hoffman), the obscene
phone caller next door.
And finally, there's Trish (Cynthia Stevenson), a naive housewife
married to Allen's therapist, Bill (Dylan Baker).  Bill has his own
problems:  he's a compulsive pedophile serial rapist.  But, he still
tries to be a good dad to his son, while lusting after his son's young
friends.  And these are just a few of the sympathetic characters you'll
meet in Happiness.
A problem with Happiness is often a problem in ensemble stories like
this.  Some of the plotlines are considerably less interesting than the
others.  A good ensemble work needs balance...Happiness just seems
desperately uneven.
Surprisingly (or, well, maybe not that surprisingly) the film's most
disturbing characters are also its most interesting.  Heading out the
pack is Dylan Baker's serial rapist.  He's certainly not the type of guy
you'd want to spend too much time with, but he's fascinating to
watch...there certainly hasn't been another character quite like this
one before.  And then there's the insecure Allen, wonderfully played by
Philip Seymour Hoffman, who's so pathetic he's alternately frightening
and endearing.
In comparison, plotlines like the romantic travails of Joy, or the
separation of the sisters' parents seem hopelessly conventional and
bland.  The film establishes its own peculiar rhythm, but then
constantly loses it every time it trudges back to the mundane.
That said, even the interesting characters and plotlines here aren't for
everyone (if you couldn't tell just by the descriptions). Happiness is a
film that revels in depravity, and is definitely not a movie for the
easily offended (and perhaps many of the not-so-easily offended).
The movie is X-Mozilla-Status: 0009 treats.  Some are quite good, some
are quite bad, but you can be assured that you've never seen an
assortment quite like this before.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Phantoms (1998)
Why is it that Hollywood has such a hard time adapting the works of
best-selling horror authors to the screen?  Witness the countless failed
atempts at adapting Stephen King's horror novels.  Not a one (excepting
maybe Misery and The Shining) has been worth a dime.  Enter the works of
Dean Koontz. Hollywood already made a botch of his novel Hideaway. Now,
the curse strikes again with Phantoms.
Dr. Jenny Pailey (Joanna Going) is returning to her small hometown of
Snowfield, Colorado, bringing her sister Lisa (Rose McGowan) back from
L.A.  But when the two sisters arrive, they find the small town
completely deserted...almost.  They begin to discover bodies, but are
clueless as to what might have caused such widespread fatality. Could it
be disease?  A chemical agent?  Radiation?  An amazingly efficient
lunatic?  Or something else . . .
The girls are not alone long.  Soon, they are joined by the county
sheriff, Bryce Hammond (Ben Affleck), and a couple of his deputies
(including Liev Schreiber), and later by some anti-terrorism experts,
and, of all things, a tabloid writer (Peter O'Toole), who may truly have
an idea of what's going on. The purpose of all these newcomers seems
purely to provide the movie with more bodies to kill without having to
eviscerate its leads.
The title of the film is never explicitly explained, yet there are
several options to pick from:  the phantoms could be of the dead
inhabitants of the town (who have a mysterious knack of haunting the
living), or perhaps it could apply to the ultimate source of all the
death. But, luckily, the ludicrous (and grammatically incorrect) line
used so prominently in the advertising campaign ("Throughout history
there have been unexplained mass disappearances...scientists call this
phenomenon 'phantoms'.") is nowhere to be found in the movie.
Of the actors that actually have a character to play, most of them do a
good job. Affleck and Going are appealing, but O'Toole seems to be
slumming it up a bit here. Of the recognizable characters, only Liev
Schreiber hits the wrong note, aiming his performance way over the top
in a role that could have been much subtler.
There are some rather effective moments in the film.  The opening
scenes, when the girls begin to explore the apparently deserted town,
unsure of what is going on. Unfortunately the mystery is dispelled all
too quickly, and we're left with only one unknown for the film to solve:
who will die before the end credits roll. However, with the constant
influx of new generic characters, rest assured that it will be no one
worth caring for. Some cleverer writing could have cured this problem,
enhancing both the mystery and the overall film.
Another noteworthy sequence involves Affleck and a dog that may or may
not be what it seems. By this point, the movie has lost most of its
plausiblity, but it goes to show that a good setup and proper pacing can
create suspense out of thin air.
However, ultimately the movie fails.  The majority of its action seems
to be of the "generic character does something stupid and dies"
variety.  The ultimate source of the mystery in the film, when it
finally is revealed, is disappointing...as is the unneccessary hook for
a sequel.
There was a spark of an idea in Phantoms, but that spark fizzles early,
leaving a movie as vacant and abandoned as the town of Snowfield,
Colorado.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 500 upcoming releases

Title
Review for BASEketball (1998)
The first film to take advantage of the South Park craze has hit the big
screens.  Starring the creators of Comedy Central's crudely funny
animated show, BASEketball is a hamhanded attempt to merge their brand
of offbeat insult humor with the zany gags that have been a trademark of
director David Zucker.  Surprisingly, the alliance actually works,
creating a movie that, while not for all tastes, has moments of genuine
hilarity.
The new sport baseketball gets its start as the brainchild of two
friends, Coop (Trey Parker), and Remer (Matt Stone). Making up rules on
the spot, the two merge baseball and basketball, removing all sense of
athleticism while adding a heaping dose of trash talking.  The end
result is enjoyed by Coop and Remer and several of their neighbors,
including Kenny "Squeak" Scolari (Dian Bachar).
However, things take off when the wealthy Theodore Denslow (Ernest
Borgnine), enjoying the freshness and innocence of the new sport,
creates a national league.  Within five years, the new sport has become
a national craze, but can it live up to its idealism?
One man, owner Baxter Cain (Robert Vaughn), seeks to spoil the sport.
Will his desire for higher profits lead to the corruption and downfall
of baseketball? And can Theodore Denslow's trophy wife, Yvette (Jenny
McCarthy), be up to any good? At least Coop & Remer's love interest,
Jenna (Yasmine Bleeth), seems to be on the side of goodwill...or is she?
Fans of South Park are obviously the film's intended primary audience,
and said fans are likely to have a blast here.  (Though, the film only
resorts to using South Park voices twice.)  However, if the South Park
brand humor doesn't particularly strike your fancy, BASEketball isn't
likely to convert you.
The film expends most of its gags on its insult humor, applied when the
teams attempt to "psych out" their opponents.  The result is a mixed
bag, with some of the psych-outs being genuinely funny, others landing
with a dull thud.  The film is actually better when it aims its comical
eye elsewhere:  such as at the excesses of pro sports.
The film's plot is a letdown, constructed merely as a loose framework
for gags and jokes.  There's hardly an unanticipated step in the film.
Even in the sporting scenes, you never are made to care who wins or
loses... it's all done for the gags.
Vulgar and gross, the film never rises above low comedy.  But at times,
the low comedy really shines.  It's never as consistent as There's
Something About Mary, and its laughs are rarely as intense, but it does
have its fair share of them.
BASEketball should please it's target audience.  If simply hearing about
this film makes you want to go see it, then this is likely for you.  For
those with second thoughts, this one can easily wait until video.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for In Dreams (1999)
Director Neil Jordan takes a gamble and fails with his latest movie, In
Dreams.  He assembles a talented cast, and combines it with some superb
camera work.  But then he applies these paints to a fragmented and
nonsensical story.  Can a movie exist with style, but no substance? In
Dreams is a convincing argument in the negative.
Claire Cooper (Annette Bening) has had psychic visions all her life,
though she never knew what they meant.  However, lately they've been
getting much more disturbing, as she becomes certain that at least part
of what she's seeing involves a missing young girl.
The increasingly nightmarish visions are beginning to upset her husband,
Paul (Aidan Quinn), as well.  He begins to suspect his wife may slowly
be going crazy.  A psychiatrist, Dr. Silverman (Stephen Rea) suggests
that she be hospitalized.
Claire, however, begins to suspect that someone is feeding her dreams.
She fears that her psychic pen-pal may be a serial killer (Robert Downey
Jr.), and that her visions are anticipating his actions.
In Dreams is wonderfully shot by cinematographer Darius Khondji.
Haunting and evocative, the imagery of the film is easily the film's
strongest suit.  The only flaw here is that the film is a little
overreliant on a few questionable motifs (you won't leave the theater
craving any apples, that's for sure).
However, there is not much behind this pretty facade.  What starts out
as a mildly interesting premise quickly becomes ludicrous as the film
descends along its mindless path.  Disjointed and confusing at times, In
Dreams is like a bad dream itself.  Full of none sequiturs and loose
ends, just when you think the movie can't make any less sense, it
somehow surprises you.
There's some good talent here, though, that gives the material a fair
shot.  Annette Bening makes the strongest impression with her descent
into madness.  Aidan Quinn is also notable as her beleaguered husband,
yet the film doesn't quite know what to do with his role. It tosses him
a minor subplot early on, only to forget about it a few scenes later.
Robert Downey Jr. is appropriately creepy as the film's mysterious bad
guy. However, his familiar character seems to be patched together from
the assorted parts of serial killers of films past.
Despite the efforts of the cast, nothing can quite disguise the
hollowness at the film's center.  In fact, it's almost tragic that such
good actors and imagery have been wasted on such a worthless movie.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)
The odd-numbered Star Trek film curse strikes again.  For those of you
unfamiliar with Star Trek lore, it has been maintained that the only
good Star Trek films are those with even numbers.  Perhaps in response
to this, Paramount stopped numbering their Star Trek films after #6. The
latest outing of the Star Trek franchise, Star Trek: Insurrection, is
the ninth film in the series...and like many of its odd-numbered
brethren, it proves to be an awkward misstep.
Once again, it is the Star Trek: The Next Generation crew which takes
center stage.  This time, they're embroiled in a plot that feels like a
leftover tv episode.  The peaceful Ba'ku people are in trouble, but they
don't know it.  Their idyllic paradise planet is being lusted after by
the evil Son'a race, who crave its fountain-of-youth properties.
Certainly the Federation wouldn't allow this warlike race to totally
eliminate another society, would they? Well, therein lies the problem,
the evil Son'a are allies with the Federation, and the Federation is
willingly assisting the Son'a in their efforts.
Enter Jean-Luc Picard (Patrick Stewart) and crew.  Brought in to disable
malfunctioning android Data (Brent Spiner), the crew learn of the plot,
and quickly take sides against their own beloved Federation in order to
save the 600 Ba'ku people.
The dialogue of Star Trek: Insurrection is easily the worst quality yet
seen in a Star Trek film.  Virtually every other line is either a quip
or a catchphrase.  The rest of the script is meaningless technobabble.
There are several good acting talents among the cast, and they all
deserve better than this.
The special effects are above average, though most of them are pointless
effects for effects sake.  The starship combat scenes are visually
impressive, but confusing and lacking urgency.  Apparently more time was
spent determining what would look cool, rather than worrying about
things such as pacing, or even common sense.
There's precious little, if any, character development here.  In fact,
several of the characters have seemingly regressed from the events of
the last several movies (for example, Data's emotion chip is nary to be
seen).  There are a few romantic subplots:  Riker (Jonathan Frakes) and
Troi (Marina Sirtis) rekindle a relationship, and Picard gets together
with Anij (Donna Murphy), a Ba'ku woman.
The villains are also rather bland.  The most interesting thing about
the Son'a is their obsession with obtaining eternal life through
technology (rather than the Ba'ku's "natural" methods).  However, their
leader, Ru'afo (F. Murray Abraham) is all bark and little bite.
Star Trek: Insurrection isn't painful to sit through, but it adds
nothing to the Star Trek mythos, and overall is a complete waste of
time.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Happiness (1998)
Don't be fooled by the title.  There is happiness in Todd Solondz'
latest film, but it's not exactly what you would expect.  The film
explores several unhappy (and, in some cases, extremely dysfunctional)
people in their quest to find "happiness", wherever they can. Sometimes,
it is in the oddest and most unusual depths.
The film centers on the lives of three dysfunctional sisters, and the
dysfunctional people around them.  First of all, there's Joy (Jane
Adams), who starts out the movie with a painful breakup with her latest
loser boyfriend (Jon Lovitz).
Joy's sister, Helen (Lara Flynn Boyle), is an outwardly successful
woman, beautiful and intelligent.  That's probably what attracts the
attention of her neighbor, Allen (Philip Seymour Hoffman), the obscene
phone caller next door.
And finally, there's Trish (Cynthia Stevenson), a naive housewife
married to Allen's therapist, Bill (Dylan Baker).  Bill has his own
problems:  he's a compulsive pedophile serial rapist.  But, he still
tries to be a good dad to his son, while lusting after his son's young
friends.  And these are just a few of the sympathetic characters you'll
meet in Happiness.
A problem with Happiness is often a problem in ensemble stories like
this.  Some of the plotlines are considerably less interesting than the
others.  A good ensemble work needs balance...Happiness just seems
desperately uneven.
Surprisingly (or, well, maybe not that surprisingly) the film's most
disturbing characters are also its most interesting.  Heading out the
pack is Dylan Baker's serial rapist.  He's certainly not the type of guy
you'd want to spend too much time with, but he's fascinating to
watch...there certainly hasn't been another character quite like this
one before.  And then there's the insecure Allen, wonderfully played by
Philip Seymour Hoffman, who's so pathetic he's alternately frightening
and endearing.
In comparison, plotlines like the romantic travails of Joy, or the
separation of the sisters' parents seem hopelessly conventional and
bland.  The film establishes its own peculiar rhythm, but then
constantly loses it every time it trudges back to the mundane.
That said, even the interesting characters and plotlines here aren't for
everyone (if you couldn't tell just by the descriptions). Happiness is a
film that revels in depravity, and is definitely not a movie for the
easily offended (and perhaps many of the not-so-easily offended).
The movie is a mixed bag of unusual treats.  Some are quite good, some
are quite bad, but you can be assured that you've never seen an
assortment quite like this before.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for I Still Know What You Did Last Summer (1998)
You've got to love the slasher genre's amazing productivity, despite the
lack of imagination.  It's a little like a broken factory: it keeps
churning out faulty parts, but at least it does it efficiently. With the
latest slasher sequel, clumsily and inaccurately titled I Still Know
What You Did Last Summer, it proves that you don't need fresh ideas or
an innovative script to create a movie...as long as you're not hoping
for a good one.
Julie James (Jennifer Love Hewitt) is still recovering from the horrific
events of I Know What You Did Last Summer, when the evil Gorton's
Fisherman, aka Ben Willis (Muse Watson), stalked and killed several of
her friends for accidentally killing (or was it not killing) him the
summer before.
Now, Julie is attending college, and has a whole new set of fresh meat,
uh, er, friends.  The closest of which is Karla (Brandy), who has the
disturbing habit of creeping around in the dark and making scary noises.
Julie still maintains contact with Ray (Freddie Prinze Jr.), another
survivor of the previous film, but he's a link to her past...one she
would rather forget.
But someone still remembers...three guesses who...  Yep, that's right,
Ben Willis, back from the dead.  Yawn.  He's still as bland as in the
original film, but with even less of a motive this time.  His first
several victims lack even a tangential connection to the accident which
supposedly started his murderous rage for revenge.  (Speaking of that,
why don't any of these victims ever come back from the dead to haunt
Ben?) In any case, in the new film, each time he has a shot at finally
getting even with Julie James, he tries for revenge in rather unorthodox
ways (one scene has him cursing her with a really really bad tan).
This time, the sequel, with a larger budget, naturally takes place in
the Carribbean (where the Gorton's Fisherman doesn't look the least out
of place).  Julie and Karla have brought their respective boyfriends,
Will (Matthew Settle) and Tyrell (Mekhi Phifer), to this island paradise
right before a torrential hurricane hits.  So, naturally, aside from a
few cannon fodder hotel staff, the island is remote and deserted.  It's
the perfect place for a little mass murder.
The script for I Still Know What You Did Last Summer was written by Trey
Callaway rather than the original's overrated Kevin Williamson.  Though
it wouldn't take much to improve quality over the first, Callaway
doesn't give it any effort, turning in a script that lacks any spark of
originality and wit.
Don't count on the actors to carry this film, either.   The hotel's
eclectic staff are leagues more interesting than the central foursome,
and you certainly wouldn't want to spend an entire movie with them. At
least the cast looks good (presumably their only qualification)...but
you wonder why the four of them can't take on the feeble old Ben
Willis.  I mean, even one-on-one, one of the athletic teens would likely
succeed against the guy... four-on-one would be no contest.  I guess,
then there'd be no movie (but that would actually be a good thing.)
This one's for die-hard genre fans only.  And even then, it's only good
to snicker at the obvious cliches and overall predictability.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for True Crime (1999)
It is sad to see a movie like True Crime go so horribly, horribly wrong.
It has a good director and a very talented cast, all of whom are doing
their utmost to enliven the routine story.  But at each and every turn,
they are thwarted by a horrific screenplay.
Clint Eastwood directs and stars as reporter Steve Everett.  Steve is a
train wreck of a man with a penchant for cheating on his wife with very
young women (particularly those who are close relatives of his
employers). He's a recovering alcoholic with only one thing to rely on:
his nose for news.
On what may be the last story of his career, Steve is assigned a puff
piece detailing the last day of a man on death row.  The man, Frank
Beachum (Isaiah Washington), was convicted of killing a pregnant store
clerk over a minuscule debt.  He protested his innocence, but two
witnesses
But as Steve conducts the routine interviews, he gets one of his
trademark hunches:  Frank is an innocent man.  But there are fewer than
twelve hours until Frank's execution.  Is Steve right?  And, if he is,
how can he prevent Frank's death if he can't ever do anything right?
True Crime is a movie filled with great actors, and some good scenes.
But, even with those plusses, it is one heck of a terrible movie. The
problem is the screenplay, pure and simple.  It sets up one
jaw-droppingly bad situation after another.  Just when you think the
film can't get any more ridiculous, it manages to top itself yet again.
And it truly is a pity.  The interplay between Clint Eastwood and his
editor-in-chief (played with relish by James Woods) is a delight and
deserves to be in a much better movie than this.  In fact, nearly all
the actors in the film are able to deliver much more innovation than
their cardboard characters deserve.
In fact, the film is almost (I repeat, almost) watchable on the basis of
the actors alone.  But, every time when you are just about to forgive
the screenplay for its countless sins, it deposits out of the blue yet
another terrible line of dialogue, a completely ridiculous plot twist,
or a jarringly obvious cliche.
All of this wasted potential makes True Crime absolutely painful to
watch. Usually, movies this bad will numb you over time.  But, with True
Crime, you are always able to see the brilliant movie that is just out
of reach...and the experience is devastating.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Patch Adams (1998)
In Patch Adams, Robin Williams portrays a real-life doctor struggling to
reform the impersonal medical system with a human touch.  It's a good
premise, and Williams seems to be perfect for the role...perhaps a bit
too perfect. The film is nothing if not emotionally manipulative, and at
times it gets downright irritating to be pushed around so much.
Hunter Adams (Robin Williams) has been suicidally depressed.  The
pointlessness of his life has driven him to the brink, and he finally
checks himself into a mental hospital.  While there, he observes the
detached soulessness of the medical staff, and discovers a purpose for
his own life.
Sporting the new nickname, "Patch", he enrolls in med school.  He
desires nothing more than to connect with people in need, and to help
them out as best as he can.  To this end, he enlists the aid of fellow
students, Carin (Monica Potter) and Truman (Daniel London) to bring
humor and enjoyment into the lives of patients at the local hospital.
But, Patch's unique methods have their detractors.  Patch's study-minded
roommate Mitch (Philip Seymour Hoffman) is frustrated with his
anti-studious attitudes. But the biggest obstacle in Patch's way is Dean
Walcott (Bob Gunton), who sees his actions as a challenge to the medical
establishment, and is willing to prevent Patch from graduating in order
to protect that establishment.
The movie, Patch Adams, is shamelessly manipulative.  It trots out not
just one, but a whole hospital full of sick kids and adults to elicit
sympathy and tears from the audience, while Robin Williams' antic
schtick counterbalances it with laughter.  The ploy partially works:
the film is slightly moving, and slightly amusing.  But it might have
been more so it the manipulation weren't so blatant as to be
distracting.  By the time the film reaches its final "clown salute",
you're half-ready to strangle Robin Williams just to wrap it up!
The role of Patch Adams seems custom tailored for Robin Williams.  First
of all, he's given several moments for "improv" comedy (most of which
are too awkwardly staged to be more than mildly amusing).  Then, the
role has some dramatic heft, as Patch Adams is coping with his own
depression (as well as the depression of others).  Plus, the role is
brimming with plenty of touchy-feely "warm-and-fuzzies" (which Williams
has lately specialized in delivering).  And for the most part, Williams
plays it well.  However, "Patch Adams" is never fully realized as a
character... it's always Robin Williams playing a doctor.  He never
disappears into the role.
The supporting cast is colorful, and mostly enjoyable to watch. The
thorn in the works is Bob Gunton, whose Dean Walcott is so irrationally
mean and dour that he seems like a movie device, rather than a real
person.
All of this is not to say Patch Adams is a bad film.  It is merely one
that not only wears its heart on its sleeve, but has a prominent
exoskeleton too.  If you can overlook the obvious machinery churning
away to produce the next emotion filled "moment", the film can be
moving.  It just requires a lot of concentration to ignore all of that
grinding machinery.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Rage: Carrie 2, The (1999)
Most horror films are hesitant to trumpet their lack of originality.
That's not the case with The Rage: Carrie 2, which displays its copycat
plot proudly.  It has to...there's not much else which connects this
film with the original Carrie.  It's certainly nowhere near the dubious
quality of Brian DePalma's mid-70s teen horror film. Heck, even Stephen
King's name is no longer associated with this project (which should tell
you quite a lot).
The Rage can call itself a sequel to Carrie by the thinnest thread. Sue
Snell (Amy Irving), one of the tormenting teens of the original, is the
only returning character.  She has grown up into a school guidance
counselor, determined to prevent the type of telekenetic violence she
instigated twenty years earlier.
Emily Bergl stars as Rachel Lang, the teen you don't want to mess with
in this sequel.  Unlike the original Carrie, Rachel isn't a complete
outcast.  She's bonded with another white trash goth girl named Lisa
(Mena Suvari), who also has low self-esteem.  However, both girls are
about to run afoul of the "popular" crowd.
It seems that the local jocks have a game they've been playing: to
deflower and dump as many pathetic girls as possible.  Lisa's reaction
as a victim of this cruel game is predictable, but it really only serves
as a plot device to further isolate Rachel.
When sensitive jock Jesse (Jason London) befriends Rachel, are his
feelings true?  Or is he merely luring her into a cunning trap which
will unleash her psychic fury to kill?!?  (Seeing as this is a "Carrie"
movie, which do you think?)
In a strained attempt to link itself to the earlier film, The Rage
contains several "flashbacks" to the original Carrie (most of which are
quite a stretch).  It even goes so far as to replay the original's
"They're all going to laugh at you" line over and over again on the
soundtrack.  The effect seems more pathetic than frightening.  It's as
if the new film realizes it has failed to create anything even mildly
creepy, and must dredge up the memories of the past in an attempt to
shock.
The film is almost robotic in its mimicry of the original Carrie. At
least the first film had originality on its side.  With The Rage: Carrie
2, every step of the plot is irritatingly obvious, even to those who
never saw the first film.  You would at least think that, with such a
detailed blueprint, the film would move along at a decent pace. Wrong
again.  The film is painfully sluggish in creeping towards its
inevitable conclusion.
But, of course, the characters are completely oblivious of the utter
predictability of their situation.  No one even pays the  slightest heed
when windshields shatter without cause, and the  school lockers have the
darndest habit of exploding open at random times.  These things would
raise flags even in a town which hasn't had an entire senior class
slaughtered by telekinetic  violence.  The filmmakers behind The Rage:
Carrie 2 must be as oblivious as these students!
Certainly as an audience member, you wish you had their amazing powers
of ignorance, both during and after the movie.  As a horror film, The
Rage: Carrie 2 is more likely to elicit groans than shrieks.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Shuang long hui (1992)
In his latest rerelease, Jackie Chan uses a gimmick that Jean Claude
VanDamme aficionados know well.  It's a gimmick that goes something like
this: if one Jackie Chan is good, two must be better!  Unfortunately,
Twin Dragons proves that not to be the case.
Jackie plays a pair of twins, separated at birth.  One, John Ma, under
the guidance of his true parents, becomes a concert pianist,known the
world over.  The other, Boomer, is a mechanic and part time con artist,
with an instinctive knack for martial arts(wouldn't you know).
Raised on opposite corners of the globe, the twins are blissfully
unaware of each other's existence.  That is until fate places them both
in Hong Kong at the same time.  John Ma is there for a concert,but
spends most of his time avoiding the advances of a marriage-minded
woman, Tammy (Nina Li Chi).
Boomer, on the other hand, is in trouble.  An attempt to help his
diminutive friend Tyson (Teddy Robyn) win the love of a singer, Barbara
(Maggie Cheung), earns him the wrath of a local gangster.  But when the
gangsters mistake John Ma for Boomer, hilarity ensues...well, sort of.
Twin Dragons relies even more on comedy than the typical Jackie Chan
film. The mistaken identity gags wear out their welcome almost
immediately, yet the film just keeps them coming.  As is the case with
most of Jackie's rereleased films, Twin Dragons suffers from a horrible
dub, and the resulting sound mix certainly doesn't help the humor any.
Jackie Chan's films have never been praised for their complex plots.
The spectacular fight sequences are what draw the fans.  There's one
good one in Twin Dragons, a climactic battle in an automotive testing
factory. Yet, by the time it finally rolls around, it's a case of too
little, too late. And to top things off, the film doesn't even include
any of Jackie's trademark outtakes over the end credits.  This is a
rerelease sure to disappoint his fans.
Originally released in 1992, Twin Dragons' special effects already seem
cheap and dated.  Twin effects have been around for a very long time,
yet when Jackie and Jackie appear together onscreen it seems like a bad
episode of The Patty Duke Show.  The picture gets grainy, out of focus
in spots, and the dividing line between the actor and himself is so
visible, it's distracting.
If you're looking for a good Jackie Chan film, go rent a subtitled
version of Drunken Master II.   Twin Dragons was a waste of Jackie's
time...twice over.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Faculty, The (1998)
And another film rolls out of the teen-horror factory.  But, The Faculty
shows promise:  it has some decent talent attached, and seems to be a
change of pace from your run-of-the-mill serial killer stalking
teenagers film.  Is it any good?  Well, it's better than your standard
slasher fare, but hardly enjoyable enough to be called a "good" movie.
There's something odd about the faculty at Herrington High School. Not
only have they begun consuming large quantities of water, but they've
been acting...strangely.  Could it be that alien body snatchers are at
work?  Several students think so.
An unlikely band of students team up to try and stop the invasion. It
starts out with trendy cheerleader/newspaper editor Delilah (Jordana
Brewster) and the hopelessly nerdy photographer Casey (Elijah Wood).
But soon they've roped in Delilah's ex-boyfriend, the ex-quarterback
Stan (Shawn Wayne Hatosy), and the sci-fi obsessed gothic wannabe
lesbian Stokely (Clea DuVall).  Rounding out the group are the brilliant
loser, who peddles his own homemade drugs, Zeke (Josh Hartnett), and the
perky new girl, Marybeth (Laura Harris).
Armed only with their knowledge of body-snatcher cliches, these teens
must face down such fearsome foes as Coach Willis (Robert Patrick),
Nurse Harper (Salma Hayek), Miss Burke (Famke Janssen), Miss Olsen
(Piper Laurie), and the sinister Principal Drake (Bebe Neuwirth).
The script for The Faculty was written by the vastly overrated Kevin
Williamson, of Scream and I Know What You Did Last Summer fame. Once
again, he is good at pointing out cliches,  but displays little or no
originality of his own.  Williamson does give the characters knowledge
of those cliches (which raises him one rung above the average horror
film writer), but doesn't use that knowledge to go anywhere.  As a
result, the film simply revisits the same territory as Invasion of the
Body Snatchers, or The Thing, without any real surprises.
The characters, while all shallow archetypes, are at least well played.
Those in, or recently out of, high school will recognize at least a few
of the various types among the oversimplifications here.  On a purely
escapist revenge-seeking level, the film does work in a way.  The
every-teens here are able to wreak revenge upon the every-teachers who
have tormented them.
The special effects of the film include some potentially interesting
concepts, but they're hamstrung by flawed execution.  Many of the
effects, which are intended to look creepy, are goofy instead.  Even the
film's ultimate CGI creature looks rather unremarkable...  The novelty
of computer-generated monsters has worn off, and special effects artists
need to return to creating innovative designs.
Director Robert Rodriguez, who has successfully created tense and
suspenseful scenes in the past, has lost his touch here.  A few of the
scenes hint at his prior potential, but they're all hobbled in one way
or another.  There's rarely an feeling of true danger, and when there
is...you simply don't care.
Still, compared with the string of recent horror films, The Faculty is
one of the better entries in this struggling genre.  In may even be
worth a look when it arrives at your local rental store.  But,
particularly at this time of year, you can do much better than The
Faculty when at your local theater.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Buffalo '66 (1998)
Buffalo 66 is a quirky independent comedy that's heavy on the quirky and
independent, and light on the comedy.  Vincent Gallo's directoral debut,
the film is a meandering mess that almost comes together at the end.
Billy Brown (Gallo) has just got out of prison after serving time for a
crime (that he says) he didn't commit.  He has a few simple goals:  find
a bathroom, visit his folks (Anjelica Huston and Ben Gazzara), and kill
the one man he believes was responsible for ruining his life.
However, none of those three goals are as easy as they at first
seem...particularly his parental visit.  You see, he never told them he
had been in prison.  Instead, they believe he is a successful
businessman with a beautiful young wife.
To continue the deception, he enlists the help of Layla (Christina
Ricci), a young student he kidnaps from a tap dancing studio.  At first
she is an unwilling accomplice, but she soon warms to Billy, and, much
to his dismay, starts taking charge of the situation.
Billy Brown isn't a very likable character, and he's not interesting
enough to carry the film along with that flaw. Layla is a tad more
sympathetic, but she remains a complete question mark throughout the
movie.  Why is she desperate enough for love that she clings to her
kidnapper?  We never learn.
Billy's parents are amusing when they are first introduced, but they
quickly outlast their welcome.  Unfortunately, Buffalo 66 milks this gag
for much more than it's worth.  As a result, we get to spend extended
time with these one-note characters, and the film suffers almost as much
as the audience.
There are a couple of nearly-redemptive scenes toward the very end. We
start to get a sense of what the film might have been with a little
tighter direction by star Vincent Gallo.  Alas, it is too little, too
late.
With its off-key characters, unusual shooting styles and dialogue-heavy
script, Buffalo 66 seems like the quintessential "indie film".
Unfortunately, it's the type of indie film which gives "indie films" a
bad name:  style-heavy, pointless and just a tad pretentious.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Hush (1998)
One of the 90s' most unwelcome thriller trends returns from the grave:
it's the "___ from Hell" movie!  Starting in the early nineties, we were
subjected to nearly every conceivable combination of
relationships-from-Hell!  There were Boyfriends from Hell, Friendly
Neighborhood Cops from Hell, Nannies from Hell, and even Secretaries
from Hell.  But Hush has found an old standby that somehow was forgotten
in the rush:  The Mother-In-Law from Hell!!!!!
The mother-in-law in question is Martha, played by Jessica Lange. She
has been single-handedly running the family horse farm, Kilronan. Her
son, Jackson (Johnathon Schaech) and his girlfriend, Helen (Gwyneth
Paltrow), live in New York, and have no intention to move back down
south to the rural Kilronan.  But those intentions are about to change.
You see, Martha lives by manipulation.  She has used it in years past to
breed many championship horses.  Now, she believes she can use it to
breed herself a grandson.  Though at first, Helen finds Martha charming,
soon she is caught in the domineering Martha's web of deception.
It's hard to understand why nobody ever wises up to Martha' schemes. As
written, most of the characters in the film must be very slow witted.
But then, the film even treats the audience like idiots.  It tries to
get away with things (like leaving a critical piece of evidence in a
rather unlikely place) without even batting an eye.  Then again an
audience which accepts characters as shallow as these isn't one that's
likely to question details.
Jessica Lange's Martha is the only semi-developed character in the film,
and she applies her talents to redeem it as much as she can. A character
that could have been simply awful is merely groan-worthy. Gwyneth
Paltrow doesn't have much to build upon, as Helen's only character trait
seems to be "daughter-in-law".  Still, she fares better than Johnathon
Schaech, whose character is so nonexistent, he's inexplicably missing
for much of the film.
Still, there have been much worse "____ from Hell" films.  Even with its
paper-thin characters and ludicrous setups, Hush manages to create a few
thrills in a color-by-numbers fashion.  You know what's coming, but
occasionally the film will deliver a shock or two.  The old formulas are
around for a reason, but that doesn't mean they taste fresh.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Two Girls and a Guy (1997)
Two Girls and a Guy is an odd and pretentious character drama that can't
quite sustain interest beyond its first thirty minutes.  In fact,
reading the scandal sheets about its star, Robert Downey Jr, would
probably create a more lively experience.
The film opens with two women standing outside an apartment in New York
City. There's Carla (Heather Graham), who is seemingly quiet and
reserved. And there's Lou (Natasha Gregson Wagner), bounding with energy
and a non-stop talker.
After a little introductory chit-chat, the two discover that for the
past year they have been unknowingly sharing the same boyfriend, actor
Blake Allen (Downey Jr.).  Shocked and upset, the two decide to confront
Blake about his roguish activities.
But confrontation doesn't seem to be enough.  In the ensuing
argument/conversation that follows, the two girls try to discover the
reasoning behind his behavior.
The action of Two Girls and a Guy is confined to one set, Blake's
apartment, and, aside from a few minor roles at the very beginning, is
limited to the three main characters.  There's a lot of talking in the
movie, and its not very good (or even revealing) conversation.
The movie might stir some interesting comparisons between Robert Downey
Jr himself and the self-destructive character that he plays.  But that
is really the only interesting thing about his character.  The movie
never inspires the kind of curiosity about Blake that Carla and Lou
evince.
As for Carla and Lou, they don't quite hold their end of the show
either. Natasha Gregson Wagner fares the worst.  In the opening scenes,
she recites her lines with the liveliness of cue cards.  To be fair, she
gets somewhat better in subsequent scenes, but is never fully convincing
in the role.  Heather Graham does a better acting job, but is stuck with
the film's least interesting (and most perplexing) character.
Director James Tolback directed Downey Jr. once before in 1987's dull
The Pick-Up Artist. The second time's not the charm here.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Edtv (1999)
Instant fame is a dream of many, but at what cost does it come?
Director Ron Howard's latest film, Ed TV, takes a critical look at the
price of celebrity.  This comedy doesn't pack as hefty a punch as it
hopes for, but it is often funny enough that it doesn't matter.
TrueTV is a cable network in search of a gimmick, and, after a
brainstorm, programming executive Cynthia (Ellen DeGeneres) believes she
has found one. The network will broadcast the life of an average
American, live and uncut, 24 hours a day.
After a nationwide search, the lucky winner is Ed Pekurny (Matthew
McConaughey), a video store clerk in San Francisco.  Talked into the
gimmick by his brother Ray (Woody Harrelson), Ed thinks that gaining
instant fame will be fun.
But, after a while, the lack of privacy starts to sink home.  As Ed
becomes a celebrity, cracks begin to appear in his previously stable
family.  First, Ed begins an affair with Ray's girlfriend, Shari (Jenna
Elfman). Soon, long buried family secrets begin to surface, and Ed
desperately searches for a way out.
On first glance, Ed TV seems to sound an awful lot like last year's The
Truman Show.  Both films do feature 24-hour tv shows revolving around
the life of one man. In fact, both movies feature nearly the same
reaction shots of "typical" members of the television audience.
However, whereas The Truman Show was analyzing the boundaries between
reality and entertainment, Ed TV is more interested in examining the
culture of celebrity.
Though Ed TV's criticisms about the ultimate cost of fame ring true, the
underlying concept of a popular 24-hour channel devoted to Ed just
doesn't seem plausible.  An edited show, maybe...but in today's instant
gratification culture, it's hard to imagine a show where days or weeks
would pass before something actually happens.
But, with several months compressed into a two-hour film, there's hardly
a lack of activity in the movie, Ed TV.  In fact, it begins to seem odd
that so many big and important events occur in Ed's life during these
few months.  A few of the moments seem a bit too scripted (the cat
scene, for one), but nearly all are enjoyable.
Ed TV does certainly have a stellar cast.  In addition to those
mentioned above, Rob Reiner, Dennis Hopper, Elizabeth Hurley and Sally
Kirkland also star.  In the film's most enjoyable role, Martin Landau
shines as Al, Ed's stepfather.  He simply steals every scene he's in.
The conclusion of Ed TV feels a bit rushed.  The heretofore amiable
network all of a sudden is painted as pure evil.  But, even if the
wrapup lacks dramatic weight, the movie delivers quite a good time
getting there.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Replacement Killers, The (1998)
Hong Kong action star Chow Yun-Fat follows the lead set by Jackie Chan
and Hong Kong directors such as John Woo, Tsui Hark and Stanley Tong in
attempting to cross over to the American mainstream.  With The
Replacement Killers, he has a vehicle that captures the style of a Hong
Kong action-fest, but with none of the substance.
Chow Yun-Fat plays assassin John Lee.  He's indebted to a crimelord, Mr.
Wei (Kenneth Tsang), and must perform three hits or his mother and
sister will be killed back in China.  John performs two of his three
kills, but on the third the sight of a cop (Michael Rooker) playing with
his young son makes him reconsider, and he abandons his task.
This, of course, greatly angers Mr. Wei, who calls in replacement
killers to finish the job, and to finish Mr. Lee.  He, on the other
hand, has no intention on being rubbed out.  He sets off to return to
China, in order to save his family, but he needs forged papers to do
so.  To that end, he enlists the aid of rogue forger Meg Coburn (Mira
Sorvino), and when her lab is destroyed by Wei's henchmen, their fates
are intertwined. So, John and Meg set out to nullify the replacement
killers, protect their target, eliminate Mr. Wei, thereby saving Lee's
family.
The first problem with The Replacement Killers is with Yun-Fat.  His
hitman is a flimsy construct at best, and makes Clint Eastwood's Man
With No Name seem wordy.  We learn very little about him, but the worst
part is we don't want to know.  With less emotional range than The
Terminator, his hitman exists as merely a machine to expel bullets at
the bad guys. Mira Sorvino fares better, but only slightly.  She seems
out of place here, but at least she's given a meatier character than
Yun-Fat.
Director Antoine Fuqua applies plenty of stylistic touches to the action
sequences. Some of the setups, though, are too obvious.  When the camera
swoops majestically down a tile corridor and into some hybrid of a
warehouse and an automatic car wash, you just know that a gun battle is
going to take place on this terrain.  When the bullets unavoidably begin
flying, the resulting carnage is shot with relish. A wide variety of
angles, lighting and camera speeds are employed to enliven the action.
At some points, the technique works, but most of the time, the
overbearing style is layered on too thickly.  In the middle of an
exciting action sequence, you shouldn't be noticing the excellent use of
discrete surround channels or the appropriately mysterious lighting
used...those things should simply enhance the atmosphere. Here, they're
noticeable.
And the film is in serious trouble when it has to fall back on its plot
to redeem itself. I was hard pressed to fill two paragraphs above with a
plot summary.  There are no twists and/or turns.  Nothing unexpected
happens.  The plot is a vehicle to move from one shoot-out to another,
nothing more.
It's a pity.  The best Hong Kong action films have plots that put most
American actioners to shame.  It's not the most auspicious American
debut for Chow Yun-Fat, and he deserves much better than this.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Horse Whisperer, The (1998)
In what may be (and probably should be) Robert Redford's last romantic
leading role, he has chosen to adapt Nicholas Evan's popular pulp
romantic novel Yet, while the Horse Whisperer is a beautiful film to
watch, its romance never gets aflame.
After a riding accident in upstate New York, young Grace MacLean
(Scarlett Johansson) is seriously injured, and her horse, Pilgrim, is
wounded and crazed.  Grace's mother, Annie (Kristin Scott Thomas)
believes the horse is the key to rehabilitating her despondent
daughter.  If Pilgrim can recover, perhaps her daughter can as well.
To this end, Annie seeks out the country's best horse doctor.  She
discovers an article about Tom Booker (Robert Redford), a horse
whisperer who applies patience and an intuitive understanding to horses
and their problems.  Even though an initial contact with Tom proves
fruitless, Annie resolves to haul Grace and Pilgrim halfway across the
country to Tom's Montana ranch.
There, with her bullheaded ways, she convinces Tom to help retame
Pilgrim.  Over the weeks which follow, she gets to know Tom and his
family (brother Frank (Chris Cooper), and sister-in-law Diane (Dianne
Wiest)), and grows to appreciate the Montana countryside.  But can Annie
remain faithful to her husband, Robert (Sam Neill), and her cluttered
New York lifestyle, or will the charms of Tom and Montana be too great
to bear?
In the end, it doesn't matter much.  As a romance, The Horse Whisperer
is terribly flawed.  The problem rests on Kristen Scott Thomas'
shoulders. She does such a good job at portraying how stubborn and
domineering Annie is, that her character comes off as mean and
cold...two traits that aren't conducive to passionate romance.
Luckily, there's more to The Horse Whisperer, otherwise the film would
be a complete waste.  The film's parallel rehabilitation story of
Pilgrim and Grace works very well (especially in contrast to the
romance).  Redford works much better as a paternal than a romantic
interest in this film. And Scarlet Johansson handles her difficult role
excellently.
Then, of course, the film is extremely well photographed, as can be
expected for an outdoor film in Montana.  But the cinematography doesn't
end purely with the scenery.  The film is shot in two differing aspect
ratios (a confining one for the New York sequences, and then glorious
widescreen for Montana.)  The animal photography is very good as well,
particularly over the opening and closing credits.
Although The Horse Whisperer might not be romantic, it is moving... and
a good looking film to boot.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Baby Geniuses (1999)
Going in to the movie Baby Geniuses, I tried to reassure myself that the
movie couldn't nearly be as bad as its premise makes it seem.  After
all, some good talent (Kathleen Turner, Christopher Lloyd, Dom DeLuise)
is attached, and the idea of intelligent talking babies could be cute...
Boy, was I wrong!
Unbeknownst to the rest of the world, young babies are actually
geniuses. Children are born knowing all the secrets of the universe, and
communicate in their own "pre-language" (which sounds exactly like
babbling to grown-ups), though they can read and understand every other
spoken language.  At the age of two or so, the babies "cross over",
forgetting everything they once knew.
The evil day care scientist Elena (Kathleen Turner) suspects this,
mainly by stealing ideas from Dan (Peter MacNicol), the husband of her
niece, Robin (Kim Catrall).  Elena, with the help her henchman, Heep
(Christopher Lloyd), has been running secret tests on babies and
toddlers in the hopes of cultivating the world's next batch of geniuses.
As part of her evil plans, Elena has separated two identical twins: Sly
and Witt (played by Leo, Myles and Gerry Fitzgerald).  Sly has been
raised in her underground "Kinder" bunker with a batch of
proto-geniuses. Witt, on the other hand, is being raised by the
unwitting Robin and Dan. But Sly is difficult to keep in captivity.  The
smartest kid in the world, he is capable of building sophisticated
electronics out of the simplest legos, and before you know it, he is on
his way to explore the real world.
The technology used to make the children talk, perform karate, and so on
is actually fairly good...about the only good thing that exists the
movie. However, no matter how good the means are, there's no
justification for the ends.  The supposedly "intelligent" babies making
juvenile wisecracks is one thing...when they start disco dancing, you'll
start praying for that coma to strike.
The flimsy plot is merely an excuse to go from one overly "cute" scene
to another even more so.  I'll admit it, the first few giggling,
talking  babies are a little cute...but by giggling baby shot #503 the
prospect becomes simply terrifying.  An idea which would have been
excessively cloying in a mere television commercial is practically
numbing when seen on the big screen.  However, the experience is so
painful that you'll wish it provided full anesthesia.
Whatever happened to Kathleen Turner?  She hasn't made a decent film in
ten years...and Baby Geniuses is certainly no exception.  The only thing
she has going for her in this film is that she's the villain.  Any enemy
of those babies must be a friend, even if she's a friend with a one-note
monotonous performance.
This is a film so completely bankrupt of ideas that the last few minutes
are composed entirely of short clips from elsewhere in the  film...as if
anyone would want to relive this travesty, even in the form of
bite-sized none sequiturs.  Why couldn't they have simply ended the film
a bit earlier and given the unfortunate few who stayed during the whole
film a tiny bit of their lives back?
For those of you tempted to see this movie, just pop in your Ally McBeal
"Dancing Baby" videotape, and thank me later.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Krippendorf's Tribe (1998)
Krippendorf's Tribe is a formula comedy.  Done poorly, formulaic
comedies might seem to signify the downfall of American cinema.
However, every now and then, one emerges, like Krippendorf's Tribe, that
actually works.
Professor James Krippendorf (Richard Dreyfuss), the renowned
anthropologist, is in trouble.  His university gave him a hefty grant to
discover a lost tribe in New Guinea.  However, he found...nothing.  His
wife has recently died, and he has spent the remainder of the grant
money in raising his three kids: Shelly (Natasha Lyonne), Mickey
(Gregory Smith) and Edmund (Carl Michael Lidner).
Tonight, he is expected to lecture on his newfound tribe.  Rather than
break the news (and face the consequences of misusing his funds), he
invents a tribe: the Shelmikedmu (named after his kids).  However, one
lie begets another as he is not only required to deliver filmed proof of
the Shelmikedmu, but his research becomes a popular phenomenon.
Soon, Professor Krippendorf is caught up in an elaborate ruse in which
he films mockumentary footage starring his children as the Shelmikedmu
tribal members.  His efforts are hampered by the boasts of an over-eager
colleague, Veronica Micelli (Jenna Elfman), and the intense scrutiny of
a rival anthropologist, Ruth Allen (Lily Tomlin).
Krippendorf's Tribe does seem to require a little suspension of
disbelief. No one seems to question the way his field documentaries seem
to be shot with multiple cameras, or that his newly discovered tribesmen
have startlingly blue eyes.  Luckily, as the film builds momentum, that
suspension of disbelief is easy to come by.
Though there's some mild humor in the Krippendorf family trying to pass
themselves off as a lost tribe, the real humor of the film is in how
James gets trapped in his ever increasing snowball of lies. The double
meanings to many of the Shelmikedmu appearances are enjoyable, and the
comic timing required for some of the film's latter scenes is superb.
Richard Dreyfuss is terrific as the hapless professor who soon loses
control of his own imaginary tribe.  Jenna Elfman's position as a
romantic lead seems a bit forced at times, but she plays the part with
extreme affability.  Even the kids, who in films like this tend to be a
bit on the precocious side, are endearing and humorous.
Yes, the film does veer occasionally into some rather lowbrow humor, but
it has the best excuse of all:  it's funny.  It may not go down as an
all-time classic, but it certainly delivers what you expect from a
comedy: plenty of laughs.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for 8MM (1999)
Have you been dying to know just how sick, twisted and decayed the human
soul can become?  Well, look no further.  8MM is a prime example of
bleak vrit.  But, though it has bleakness in spades, 8MM lacks
anything worthwhile to be engaging.
Detective Tom Welles (Nicolas Cage) is in over his head.  He has been
hired by a rich widow (Myra Carter) who has discovered what she believes
to be a snuff film in her late husband's belongings.  Upset over the
atrocity, she wants Detective Welles to ascertain whether the film is
authentic or merely a disturbing hoax.
Stumbling upon one incredulously lucky break after another, Welles
follows the trail to Hollywood.  There, he meets up with Max
California(Joaquin Phoenix), an adult bookstore clerk who takes him on a
tour of the seamy world of illegal pornography.
As the depravities Welles encounters get worse and worse, his case turns
into a personal quest.  He needs to understand the pivotal question:
why?  Why is pure evil allowed to exist?  But will understanding the
answer to that question cost him his own sanity?
Many of the conclusions drawn by 8MM were also made by screenwriter
Andrew Kevin Walker's superior 1995 effort, Seven.  However, not only
does 8MM lack the earlier film's strong characterizations and sense of
structure, but 8MM director Joel Schumacher isn't able to create a
visual style anywhere near comparison.
Nicolas Cage has the misfortune to play an everyman character whose most
sympathetic trait is the fact that, well, he's being played by Nic
Cage.  He is never able to connect with the audience, even though he is
intended to be their guide to the underworld.
Joaquin Phoenix' Max California at least has a few character quirks that
he can play upon, whereas Cage is given only one (he pretends he doesn't
smoke, although he does).  But, then again, Phoenix exists primarily as
a way to take the movie deeper and deeper into the world of porn.
(Though it works structurally, it doesn't really make much sense in the
movie.  Since Detective Welles is looking for some highly illegal stuff,
why doesn't he simply start with the bottom dwellers instead of working
his way down?)
8MM is the type of movie that, though not particularly poorly made,
makes you seriously wonder, "why am I watching this?"  It's not merely
that the movie is depressing and/or sordid (though it is).  But there
has to be something that engages you among the depressive sordidness...
and that crucial part is missing from 8MM.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Major League: Back to the Minors (1998)
Well, you just can't keep a good franchise down...or a bad one from the
looks of it. Major League, a mildly amusing film that stretched for it's
first sequel now returns for a third try.  However, with most of the
original cast absent (most notably Charlie Sheen and Tom Berenger), the
Cleveland Indians nowhere in sight, and the shift of focus away from the
major league, it's a pretty big stretch to call this film a sequel.
Corbin Bernsen is the biggest name to return, as Roger Dorn. He helps to
run the Minnesota Twins, and needs a new manager for their AAA minor
league team, the Buzz.  He finds his man in worn-out pitcher Gus
Cantrell (Scott Bakula).
However, Gus finds the Buzz is full of misfits (surprise, surprise).
There's only one promising player, Downtown Anderson (Walt Goggis),
among the bunch.  Though Gus does recruit former Major League players
Pedor Cerrano (Dennis Haysbert) and Isuro Tanaka (Takaaki Ishibashi) for
his minor league team.  Let the wackiness ensue!!!
As you would expect, the Buzz starts out horribly, but then miraculously
turns into a good team.  So good, in fact, that Gus puts out a challenge
to his rival, Leonard Huff (Ted McGinley), manager of the Twins, to pit
the minor league Buzz vs. the major league Twins.
You know you're likely in trouble when a film can't even attract the
likes of Charlie Sheen or Tom Berenger to return, and when a pair of
out-of-work tv stars topline the movie, that trouble's almost certain.
To their credit, the filmmakers know their formula cold, but the film
doesn't even make the slightest effort to deviate from the norm.
The jokes they pile upon the film aren't as bad as they are simply
tired. (Hey!  A guy gets bonked in the head with a baseball!  Whoa!
Haven't seen that one before!) Some of the baseball commentary (by Bob
Uecker again) gets a chuckle or two, but it's not even up to the low
standards of the last Major League film.
As the lead, Scott Bakula has some talent, but I hope he's not trying to
showcase it here. He ran through this old formula once before in
Unnecessary Roughness (ok, that was football, but the bad-sports-team
concept still holds).  He doesn't uncover anything new this time out.
There are no real standouts among the rest of the cast.  Each player has
his quirk, and there's not much beyond that.  Hardly any of them even
rate a personality.
It's amazing that this one avoided going direct-to-video.  There's no
reason to see it on film...in fact, there are several reasons against
seeing it at all.  But, it isn't absolutely horrible, and could service
as a last-choice rental.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Very Bad Things (1998)
Peter Berg directs this messy (in more ways than one) black comedy.  But
while it certainly is dark and morbid...someone forgot the laughs in
this dreary film.
Very Bad Things tells the tale of a bachelor party that goes horribly
wrong.  Kyle Fisher (Jon Favreau) is preparing to marry the controlling
Laura Garrety (Cameron Diaz).  For his final fling, his pal Robert Boyd
(Christian Slater) has planned a fun-filled party in Vegas.
Along for the adventure are Kyle's quiet mechanic buddy, Charles (Leland
Orser), and two of his co-workers, Adam (Daniel Stern) and Michael
Berkow (Jeremy Piven).
Things begin to go bad when the stripper (Carla Scott) hired by Boyd
meets an unfortunate, accidental demise.  Rather than report the death,
the five men decide to cover it up...but their problems start to rapidly
escalate from there.
If you couldn't tell, this is a rather bleak comedy, and the situations
just keep getting bleaker.  Unfortunately, the comedy doesn't keep pace.
The film is obviously attempting to reach for some morbid laughs, but it
just doesn't get them.
Take the characters, for example.  They're all given little
idiosyncrasies, but rather than being comic, most of them are merely
annoying.  These aren't people you'd really care to spend any time with,
in or out of the theater.
The situation (normal guys in an abnormal situation) is familiar, yet
something just never clicks here.  Even the usually watchable Cameron
Diaz becomes mildly repulsive in this film.
Filmmakers should learn never to use words like "Very Bad" in the title
of their films.  It's too convenient a place for such an apt description
of the film.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Borrowers, The (1997)
Mary Norton's children's book series, The Borrowers, has been made into
several below-average television movies.  So, I wasn't too enthused as I
entered the theater for the big-screen debut of the minute clan.  But I
was in for a shock, The Borrowers is actually a thoroughly delightful
movie with plenty of good laughs and even some decent special effects.
The Lender family is being thrown out of their longtime home.  Their
aunt, who owned the property, never left a will.  Now, an unscrupulous
lawyer, Ocious Potter (John Goodman) plans to demolish the house and
replace it with an ultra-modern housing development.
But the Lenders are not alone in their house.  Living under the
floorboards is a family of Borrowers, 4 inch tall people who make their
living as scavengers from the human "beans" above.  The Clock family of
borrowers is as distressed as the Lenders, especially once they discover
the evil Potter actually has a copy of the will which leaves the home to
the Lenders.
So it is up to the Clocks (Pod (Jim Broadbent) and Homily (Celia Imrie),
along with their kids, Arrietty (Flora Newbigin) and Peagreen (Tom
Felton)) to recover the will and save the household.  But when Potter
learns of the tiny people, he enlists the skills of Exterminator Jeff
(Mark Williams) to kill off the clan.
There's plenty of attention to detail in The Borrowers, especially in
the furnishings of The Clock family house, made out of lost board game
parts and credit cards. The background details are nearly as rich as the
entertaining story.
The various predicaments of the Clock family are clever and thrilling.
Based on an original story, the screenwriters did a good job at
imagining all the potential and unusual perils that could exist for a
4-inch tall person.
As the villain, John Goodman's performance veers on the edge of being
over-the-top. But his performance suits the role well, and he does very
well in the film's many slapstick moments.
With a nearly seamless mix of oversized sets, bluescreen shots and CGI,
the special effects in The Borrowers are very well done.  There are a
few times when you can spot the effects at work, but none of them are so
jarring that you lose the suspension of disbelief.
Hopefully The Borrowers will surpass the curse of being labeled a
children-only movie, for it is surprisingly entertaining and fun to
watch.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Object of My Affection, The (1998)
What do you expect when the most romantic film relationship in 1997 was
between the straight Julia Roberts and the gay Rupert Everett in My Best
Friend's Wedding? The answer: The Object of My Affection, a romantic
drama that tries to show what happens when a straight woman and a gay
man become more than friends...
Jennifer Aniston stars as Nina Borowski, a social worker in a local
community center.  Her stepsister, Constance (Allison Janney), married
to a rich literary agent, Sidney Miller (Alan Alda), disapproves of
Nina's life and her lawyer boyfriend, Vince (John Pankow).
Enter George Hanson (Paul Rudd), the first grade teacher of Constance
and Sidney's little girl.  He has just broken up with his lover, Dr.
Robert Joley (Timothy Daly), and needs a place to stay.  Nina thinks he
would make a perfect apartment-mate...and sooner than you think, the two
are best of friends, even taking ballroom dancing lessons at the local
community center.
Needless to say, this unique arrangement doesn't sit well with Vince or
Constance.  And things only get worse when Nina starts falling in love
with George...a love he can't return.
The Object of My Affection straddles the gap between romantic comedy and
romantic drama.  Its non-traditional romance ends up being more cute
than funny, and the dramatic weight of the situation is undercut by one
too many romantic clichis.
The gay/straight romantic relationship was handled with much more
success in last year's superior Chasing Amy. This may be a more serious look at such a
relationship, but it lacks any depth, due in large part to its
stereotypical characters.
At the film's center, Jennifer Aniston and Paul Rudd make a cute couple,
but they're not much more than that.  Aniston is much more sympathetic
than she was in Picture Perfect, yet she doesn't quite seem up to the
dramatic challenges present in this role. Paul Rudd weathers the film
better, but is shackled by his bland, unimaginative character.
There are plenty of supporting roles in the film (perhaps a few too
many). Most notable are Steve Zahn, as George's womanizing brother,
Kevin Carroll as a kindly, but befuddled, cop, and Nigel Hawthorne,
delivering a tragically good performance as an elderly gay theater
critic who must cope with an unfaithful young lover.
The film covers quite a bit of territory, and at two hours in length, it
feels every bit like it.  We're rushed through the introductory scenes
just to get to...nowhere.  The middle third of the movie drags on and
on, but, thankfully, the film's delightful coda peps things up a bit.
The Object of My Affection does have its moments, but they are few and
far between.  Most of the time, the film simply drags along, searching
for meaning, but not finding any.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for U.S. Marshals (1998)
Whatever happened to the art of the sequel?  OK, I know that, with a few
exceptions, sequels have rarely been as good as their predecessors.  But
at least sequels used to be sequels.  These days, you're more likely to
get a simple, pale remake of the original.  Look at Home Alone 3, Blues
Brothers 2000, or Scream 2 for a few recent examples.  Or even more
currently, look at U.S. Marshals.
U.S. Marshals is a sequel (or, as the publicists are calling it, a
"spin-off") of The Fugitive.  Tommy Lee Jones is back in his Academy
Award winning role as U.S. Marshal Sam Gerard.  This time around, he's
on the trail of a fugitive who has escaped in a spectacular
transportation accident. The fugitive goes on the run to prove his
innocence while the methodical Gerard and his crackerjack team of agents
proceed to track him down. Sound familiar?  U.S. Marshals even goes as
to duplicate The Fugitive's signature surrender-or-jump to certain death
action scene.
But this time, instead of Harrison Ford, the fugitive is Wesley Snipes.
Instead of an emotionally involving crime, as we were given in The
Fugitive, Snipes is embroiled in a rather dry government conspiracy. All
of this adds up to a dry and pasty recreation of the original.
On the plus side, the film brings back Gerard's enjoyable team,
including Joe Pantoliano and Tom Wood.  In addition, his seasoned crew
is joined by a shady government agent of questionable ability, John
Royce (Robert Downey Jr.).
When it's not busy being overly derivative, U.S. Marshals does contain
several serviceable action sequences.  However, for the most part, they
lack an emotional core.  Hence, they're never as gripping or thrilling
as they try to be.
On the acting side, Jones is good, but doesn't add anything new to his
role of Sam Gerard.  Snipes suffers in comparison to Harrison Ford, but
on his own, he does a decent, if not outstanding job.  A talented
supporting cast, though, this time is misused.  The film adds two
unnecessary characters:  Kate Nelligan as Sam Gerard's boss, and Irene
Jacob as Wesley Snipes' girlfriend.  They're given little to do, and
reek heavily of filler.
Director Stuart Baird, who did an excellent job with his debut film,
Executive Decision, can't help but have his work be overshadowed by the
strong sense of deja vu that permeates this film.  The film's action
sequences are well handled, but the transitions are a bit jumpy and
confusing.
Rather than simply rehash The Fugitive, why not follow the title's cue
and put the focus on Sam Gerard and his band of merry men. The film
would have been much more interesting, and invited much less comparison
with its superior predecessor, if it had struck off into new territory,
rather than revisiting the wrongfully accused fugitive angle.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Permanent Midnight (1998)
David Veloz directs his adaptation of Jerry Stahl's autobiographical
portrait of a Hollywood writer succumbing to the downward spiral of drug
addiction. Despite some adequate performances, the film merely treads
water with nowhere to go, and nothing to say.
Ben Stiller portrays Stahl, who moves to Los Angeles in the mid-1980s to
get away from the drug scene in New York. However, his ploy doesn't
work... rooming with a fellow addict (Owen Wilson) doesn't help...and
soon Jerry is plunged even deeper into the world of drugs.
But not everything is a negative influence on Jerry.  His wife, Sandra
(Elizabeth Hurley), who married him for a green card, helps him get a
job writing for the puppet sitcom, Mr. Chompers (in real life, ALF). A
literary agent, Jana Farmer (Janeane Garofalo) is impressed by his work
and wants to represent him.
But all that matters to Jerry is the drugs.  He continues to sink deeper
and deeper, blowing off work, friends, family, and anything else which
might have once held some meaning for himself.  The fact that this story
is an autobiography (and that it's told in flashback) should let you
know that he doesn't completely self-destruct, but the question
remains:  how far will he drop.
Permanent Midnight is all over the map, and not in a good way.  Its
narrative is jerky, the flashbacks seem forced, and there's nary a
consistent tone to be found in the entire film.  Sometimes, a confusing
atmosphere can actually enhance a film about drug addiction (see:
Trainspotting), but here it is a serious distraction.
Ben Stiller does his best to lift Permanent Midnight out of the morass,
but can't quite do it on his own.  His dramatic performance here is one
of the best in his career, showing that he can do more than neurotic
comedy.  However, he is hamstrung by the script.  We are treated to one
dramatic scene about his family, but other than that there is never any
insight into what makes his character tick.  He's merely a junkie
writer, and that's it.
The plight of the junkie has been visited several times before in films.
Permanent Midnight delivers a few illustrations of the depths to which a
drug addict will sink, but little else.  You don't leave the film more
enlightened than when you entered, and not very much more entertained
either.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Apt Pupil (1998)
Apt Pupil is a very disturbing movie.  This cerebral thriller is very
much a monster movie. But, rather than the monsters being some
outlandishly implausible creature from the fringes of science fiction,
they are taken from the pages of history, and, indeed, from the very
streets around you.
>From the outside, Todd Bowden (Brad Renfro) seems to be the perfect
all-American kid. He's top in his class, and a good athlete to boot.
However, there's a part of him which he allows no one else to see.
After learning about the Holocaust in school, Todd becomes obsessed with
it.  Fed by an unknown hunger deep inside him, he devotes himself to
learning everything he can about Hitler's plan of genocide.
One day, Todd spots an old man, Kurt Dussander (Ian McKellan), riding
the bus. It takes a while, but Todd recognizes the man:  a Nazi war
criminal.  It seems that Kurt ran several concentration camps during
World War II, then vanished. Todd takes the information he has which can
prove Kurt's true identity, and then confronts him with it.  His intent
isn't to reveal the Nazi to the world, but to learn.
At first, Dussander is reluctant.  But the monster within him still
thrives, and as he recounts the horrors he inflicted to his young pupil,
it reawakens. At the same time, Todd's dark side is nurtured by
Dussander's tales.  He begins to shut out the world as the evil within
him grows.
On the surface, Apt Pupil may seem to be about the evils of the
Holocaust, or Nazism.  However, if you go in expecting the film to be
about either of those two, you'll be sorely disappointed.  Instead, the
film is an exploration of evil: evil in any form.
The two main characters are carefully concealed monsters.  They seem
perfectly normal: the kindly old man down the street, or the talented
young high schooler.  But in the right environment, they shed their
skins to reveal their true monstrous selves. Dussander found his element
among the horrors of Nazi Germany.  But the atmosphere doesn't have to
be that extreme...true evil can exist anywhere, even in our own
backyards.
Ian McKellan turns in a truly mesmerizing performance as the aging
Nazi.  He's almost likable, in a way, until you realize the depths of
evil in his soul:  the horrors he has committed before, and has the
potential to commit again.  Next to him, many actors would pale...but
Brad Renfro is able to stand his ground.  His Todd Bowden at first seems
rather flat, but there are layers to his character which are slowly
revealed as the film progresses.
This is director Bryan Singer's first film since the complex and
entertaining The Usual Suspects.  The storyline isn't as convoluted here
(which would have been a hard task), but he is able to create an eerily
distinctive mood.
Although based on a novella by Stephen King, this is not your typical
Stephen King movie. There is some violence (though toned down from the
book), but the horror is primarily psychological.  All in all, it makes
for an unsettlingly good film.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Orgazmo (1997)
Orgazmo is a movie that feels like one of those "before they were
famous" photos. Made by the creators of South Park, before that show
ever hit the air, this spoof of "adult" films and kung-fu movies shows
some comic potential, but it just misses the mark.
Elder Joe Young (Trey Parker) is the stereotypical clean-cut Mormon,
doing his mission work on the seedy side of L.A.  One day, he has the
misfortune to accidentally interrupt the shooting of a porno film.  The
director, Maxxx Orbison (Michael Dean Jacobs), sics his goons upon Joe.
But when Joe defends himself with some impressive kung-fu moves, Maxxx
hires him on the spot.
Now, Joe has a few moral issues with starring in a pornographic film.
But, since Joe desperately needs the money for his upcoming marriage to
his sweet fiancee Lisa (Robyn Lynne Raab), he is able to look past the
ethics (besides, it's only acting).  And so, Joe becomes the porn star,
Captain Orgazmo.
However, things begin to get strange when his real life identity and his
alter ego start to converge.  Ben (Dian Bachar), Captain Orgazmo's
sidekick Choda-Boy, is a closet genius, inventing all sorts of
techno-gadgets. When a group of thugs threaten Ben's friend G-Fresh
(Masao "Maki" San), Joe and Ben must become Captain Orgazmo and
Choda-Boy to thwart the evildoers and their evil scheme.
If all this sounds rather odd, and in poor taste, well, it is.  This IS
from the makers of South Park, after all.  However, few of the jokes
here seem inspired...most are blatantly obvious, and only a few are
funny.
Surprisingly, the best parts of the film are when it is spoofing the
kung fu genre, rather than its outlandish soft porn.  Simple gags, such
as Ben's mystical "hamster-style" martial arts provide much of the
film's humor.
But, unfortunately, it's not enough to support the whole film.  Even
with a relatively short running time, the film quickly gets repetitive.
This one might make a good midnight movie on cable...but it's not worth
the effort at your local movie theater.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Bride of Chucky (1998)
After a seven-year absence, Chucky, the killer doll, has returned.  Yes,
Chucky has been shot, stabbed, incinerated, melted, and chopped into
teeny-tiny bits, but each time he comes back.  The world probably
doesn't need another Child's Play sequel...but, if it did, Bride of
Chucky is at least better than the previous two.
Whereas in previous sequels, Chucky was literally remade from scratch,
this time out, he's stitched back together (in true Frankenstein
fashion) by Tiffany (Jennifer Tilly).  You see, Tiffany was the
girlfriend of Charles Lee Ray, the murderer who originally placed his
soul inside the Chucky doll via a voodoo chant in the original Child's
Play.  She wants to bring back her dead boyfriend...but it's not too
long before she finds herself trapped in a doll's body as well.  If you
couldn't tell by the title, she becomes... THE BRIDE OF CHUCKY!
Well, once that's done with, the two killer dolls come up with a plan to
return to human hosts.  Apparently (in a fact somehow ignored by all the
prior Child's Play films), a special magical amulet is needed to swap
souls with a living human.  So Chucky and Tiffany must travel cross
country, get the amulet, and find an unfortunate couple to possess.
As luck would have it, Tiffany's white trash neighbor, Jesse (Nick
Stabile) is just about to elope with his sweetheart, Jade (Katherine
Heigl).  The two teens are running away from Jade's domineering
chief-of-police uncle Warren (John Ritter). When Chucky and Tiffany
manage to hitch a ride, the unsuspecting couple leave a trail of murder
victims in their wake, and find themselves accused of being "multiple
murderers".
The appeal of the Child's Play films is a simple one:  the none-sequitur
high concept of a harmless child's toy springing to life as a foul
mouthed mass murderer.  It's the age-old charm of something familiar
doing something unexpected.  This time around, we also get to watch
Chucky do drugs, headbang, and, yes, even have sex.  Can't you feel the
irresistible draw to the movie theater right now?
The screenplay for Bride of Chucky is much more comic in tone and better
written than the previous sequels (not that it takes much talent to top
lines like "Don't f*** with the Chuck!") If anything, the film lays on
the humor a bit too broadly, with over-obvious homages to Friday the
13th, Halloween and even Hellraiser.
The film is definitely guilty of overkill.  This is the type of movie
where a person would die from a papercut:  by drowning.  Yep, this film
even features a nice exploding body (I guess his blood pressure was a
little high).
If the mere idea of yet another Chucky-the-killer-doll movie is already
making you pluck out your eyes to prevent the terror, you should
definitely trust your instincts. For the die-hard Chucky fan (is there
such a thing?), you can trust yours.  However, for most people, you're
probably best off ignoring Bride of Chucky until it airs late at night
on the USA network...you might get a chuckle or two then.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Great Expectations (1998)
I'll be the first to admit it.  When you mention the book Great
Expectations, I immediately begin experiencing flashbacks to junior high
English class, where I was confronted with a torturously boring book
filled with people with such nonsensical names as Pip and Magwitch.
Yes, it's a classic of literature, but it was a rather dry one, shoved
down my young throat like a spoonful of bitter medicine. Certainly, the
experience wasn't truly that bad, but, to quote Ethan Hawke in the
latest movie adaptation of said book, "I'm not going to tell the story
the way it happened...I'll gonna tell it the way I remember it." Anyway,
to return from nostalgia lane, and get back to the present, Hollywood,
in it's trendy attempt to modernize the classics, now presents an
updated film version of Great Expectations.
Instead of Pip, this time the central character is named Finn (played as
a boy by Jeremy Kissner, and by Ethan Hawke as an adult).  Finn is an
orphan being raised by his unfaithful sister Maggie, or should that be
Mrs. Joe, (Kim Dickens), and her boorish fisherman husband, Joe (Chris
Cooper).  The setting is the Florida coast during the mid-70s.  Finn is
a blooming artist, and spends his time running around the beach drawing
fish (one of his two favorite subjects).
During one of these escapades, he literally stumbles upon an escaped
criminal (Robert DeNiro). Borrowing a page from the superhuman Max Cady,
DeNiro's criminal has a seemingly limitless lung capacity, and favors
hiding on the ocean floor.  OK...maybe that's an exaggeration, but he
certainly beats any of Houdini's records in the opening scenes of the
film.  And that's nothing next to the fuel efficiency of Finn's
motorboat, but I digress.  Anyway, Finn does the convict a good deed,
just to show that he's a really swell guy. And then the plot moves on.
Enter Miss Havisham...or Ms. Dinsmoor here (Anne Bancroft).  Abandoned
at the altar some 26 years ago, Ms. Dinsmoor is the epitome of the crazy
rich old maid. With bizarre clothing, eccentric mannerisms and a few
pounds of makeup, Anne Bancroft seriously overacts in this role.
Although she ends up nowhere near a believable character, she does add
some humor to the film. Joe is hired to help with the gardening at her
unkempt manner, but the insane Ms. Dinsmoor soon hires Finn to be a
plaything for her niece, Estella (Raquel Beaudene as a young girl,
Gwyneth Paltrow as an adult).
For no apparent reason, other than to provide the main plot of the film,
Finn is instantly stricken for the Estella.  Perhaps it's her snooty
attitude or her utter disdain for his person, or maybe Finn has simply
never met a girl before. In any case, neither as children nor adults,
chemistry simply doesn't exist between the two, and yet Finn spends the
remainder of the film pining for her.
Even when, as an adult, Finn arrives in New York at the behest of a
mysterious benefactor, reacquaints himself with Estella, and draws her
portrait in the nude, there's nothing.  In fact, there is more sexual
tension between Helen Hunt and  Greg Kinnear's gay artist during a
similar scene in As Good As It Gets. At this point, the audience has
grown as cold and detached as Estella's character, and couldn't care
less about the two characters.
The bulk of the blame here falls upon Gwyneth Paltrow.  She fails to
imbue Estella, a remote character in the book, with even the vaguest
traces of humanity.  There's obviously something wrong when, watching
the film, you're more interested with how big her nose looks in
silhouette than you are about her character. Without a strong Estella,
Finn's obsession seems baseless. You wish he would just stop whining,
let Estella marry his rival, Walter Plane (an oddly subdued Hank
Azaria), and just get on with his life.
In fact, the two relationships that work in the film are purely
tangential to the main plot.  Finn's relationship with his
brother-in-law, Joe, is interesting, if a bit stereotypical.  What's
more fascinating are his interactions with DeNiro.  Although it's only a
bit part, it goes to show how much vitality a strong actor can create.
It is apparent that director Alfonso Cuarsn put a lot of work in
creating the imagery of the film.  Some of the shots work, but others
are too obviously staged (for example, both of the water fountain
scenes) to have any impact.  Finn's art (actually the creations of
Italian painter, Francesco Clemente) is used throughout the film, but it
mostly fails to have the intended effect.  We never see why Finn would
generate this style of art, which is simultaneously crude and
insightful.  As a result, it ends up as distant as the rest of the film.
Modernizing the classics is currently in vogue (just see William
Shakespeare's Romeo+Juliet).  Simply update the action to a modern
setting, and apply plenty of modern rock.  But such adornments do little
to perk up Great Expectations.  As much as I dreaded the novel when I
first read it, you'd probably be better off suffering though a reading
than watching this romanceless film.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 500 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Rugrats Movie, The (1998)
The Rugrats have made their way from Nickelodeon to the big screen, and
the result is, well, alarmingly similar to the television cartoon.
For those unfamiliar with the animated series, it is centered on the
point of view of several very young children (ranging in age from 1-2).
The leader of the pack is Tommy Pickles (E.G. Daily), a bald, but
fiesty, one year-old.  His best friend is Chuckie Finster (Christine
Cavanaugh).  Also along for the ride are twins Phil and Lil DeVille
(Kath Soucie), and obnoxiously precocious cousin Angelica (Cheryl
Chase).
The film features the arrival of a new member in the Pickles household.
Tommy gets a little brother, Dylan (aka Dill Pickles).  This, of course,
sets off a round of sibling rivalry, as Tommy must share the affections
of his parents with this loud newcomer.
In an attempt to solve the problem, Tommy's friends kidnap Dylan and
(with Tommy in tow), try to return him to the hospital.  Of course, the
five babies soon get lost in the wilderness (despite a high-tech dragon
wagon which provides their ride), and the film follows their attempts to
get back home.
Despite a few desperate pop-culture references, The Rugrats Movie is
strictly kids stuff.  From its incessant diaper humor to a series of
mispronunciations that only a Family Circus devotee could love, the film
is too obnoxious for younger kids, yet too juvenile for those much
older.
The animation style boasts a few computer-generated backgrounds, but
overall isn't that much more impressive than television quality.  In
fact, there's very little about this film that calls for seeing it on
the big screen.
The Rugrats Movie has the look and feel of a direct-to-video film.
Unless you're a hard-core Rugrats devotee, you can wait till then.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)
Blast From the Past is a cute one-joke comedy, without the cuteness.
Its elaborate premise quickly gets wearisome, and the few amusing
moments sprinkled here and there are well short of the amount needed to
carry this lump of a film.
In the films laboriously long setup, Calvin and Helen Webber
(Christopher Walken and Sissy Spacek) host a dinner party in 1962.
Calvin is a rich and brilliant, but paranoid, inventor.  When he hears
news of the Cuban Missile Crisis, he locks himself and his pregnant wife
in a luxurious underground fallout shelter...for 35 years.  The couple
has a son, Adam (Brendan Fraser), who lives his entire life in the
shelter.
Until 1997, when the locks open, and he has a chance to enter the real
world.  Sent out by his hesitant parents to seek supplies (and a wife),
Adam is very much a fish out of water in the 1990s.  Wide-eyed, innocent
and naive, Adam must confront a society that bears little resemblance to
the idyllic picture painted by his parents.
Enter Eve (Alicia Silverstone), a street-smart 90s woman.  At first,
she's not quite sure what to make of the overly-nice Adam...so, she
works out a business deal with him.  She helps him gather the supplies
the Webber family needs to last out another 35 years, but, in the
process, falls in love.
The film labors through an overly long setup.  Every single thing that
happens is an obvious attempt to lay the foundation for a future gag or
plot development. (For example, when Calvin gifts his son with
"worthless" stocks and baseball cards, you just know they'll pop up
again.)  Walken and Spacek may be game, but are painfully one-note as
the "perfect" '60s parents.
The humor in Blast From the Past is comparable to a bleak nuclear
landscape. Most of the jokes simply fizzle out before leaving the launch
pad. One of the few jokes that works involve the dimwitted owner of the
property above the fallout shelter, and his reaction to discovering the
Webber family. However, the film isn't content to leave well enough
alone, and the gag soon gets repetitive and tiring.
Brendan Fraser is seeming to make a career out of these stranger in a
strange world roles.  He certainly has the mannerisms down, and simply
radiates: "I'm a nice guy, even though I act goofy."  However, he did
the same schtick much better in George of the Jungle and Still
Breathing.
The film doesn't know quite how to handle Alicia Silverstone's Eve.
First, her introduction is hopelessly bungled.  Then, the film misfires
when it tries to add a subplot about her ex-boyfriend.  Neither of these
are written believably, and she becomes more of a plot contrivance than
an actual character.
Sometimes a one-joke comedy like Blast From the Past will surpass all
odds and actually work.  To achieve that amazing feat requires deft
comic writing, superb pacing, and tremendous performances all around.
Blast From the Past scores zero for three.  Leave this one in the
fallout shelter.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Your Friends & Neighbors (1998)
Those familiar with Neil LaBute's directoral debut, In the Company of
Men, know that he knows how to tap the baser instincts of mankind. His
second film, Your Friends and Neighbors, continues in the same spirit,
showing the depths of mental and sexual cruelty of which both men and
women are capable.
The film focuses on three men and three women, who, while not alone in
their world, are the only ones with speaking roles in the film.  There's
one married couple, one "together" couple, and two singles.
The married couple are Barry and Mary (Aaron Eckhart and Amy Brenneman),
who, behind a happy facade, are having marital troubles.  Mary simply
wants something different... and that may mean Barry's best friend Jerry
(Ben Stiller), who's having relationship problems of his own, with his
girlfriend Terri (Catherine Keener).
Now, Terri is unsatisfied in her relationship with Jerry, and in fact
seems to get more enjoyment out of her new friendship with an artist's
assistant named Cheri (Nastassja Kinski).  Meanwhile, the single
womanizer Cary (Jason Patric) is on the prowl...and may just be true
evil personified.
None of the characters have names in the film (until the end credits,
where the rhyming nominations seem a further exercise in anonymity).
This serves to put a more personal spin on the whole movie...after all,
they are "Your" Friends and Neighbors.
But they're not people you'd really like to get that close to.
Seemingly normal on the outside, each and every one is a flawed specimen
of humanity.  Or are they the status quo?  (Shudder.)  In either case,
you're simultaneously repulsed yet riveted to the screen.
Jason Patric and Catherine Keener are the standouts in a talented cast,
and also the creepiest of the bunch.  Of the six, only Nastassja
Kinski's character is never fully explored...and she actually turns out
to be the nicest one here.  Perhaps LaBute has problems writing for
normal people.
Your Friends and Neighbors is never as sharp as his In the Company of
Men, but it comes close, and is a more ambitious undertaking.  LaBute's
sophomore slump here is only slight.
This is not a date movie.  It is fascinating to watch, but does little
to enhance a harmonious relationship.  In fact, it is the type of movie
that makes you want to shun any and all human contact whatsoever.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Office Space (1999)
It was only a matter of time before a Dilbert-esque office comedy hit
the screens.  However, rather than coming from Dilbert creator Scott
Adams, Office Space is instead based on the work of another animator,
Mike Judge, creator of Beavis and Butthead and King of the Hill.  In his
live-action directoral debut, Judge aptly spoofs corporate culture.  The
story is certainly not very involved, but there is plenty of truth and
humor to fill the gaps.
Peter (Ron Livingston) is a programmer working at the Initech
corporation. Every day in his mundane life is worse than the one
before...in other words, every day is the worst day in his entire life.
He's stuck in a boring job with eight different supervisors, all
obsessed with administrative trivialities.  He's smitten with Joanna
(Jennifer Aniston), a local waitress, but hasn't the guts to even
introduce himself.  Everything has simply made him a complete, nervous
wreck.
But all of that changes when, after an unintentionally over-effective
visit to a hypnotherapist, Peter loses all of his inhibitions.  He
realizes his lifelong dream:  to do absolutely nothing.  He begins to
blatantly disregard the nonsensical instructions of his boss, Bill
Lumbergh (Gary Cole), doing whatever he feels like.
Peter's friends and co-workers, Samir (Ajay Naidu) and Michael Bolton
(David Herman)...no, not that Michael Bolton, are perplexed by their
friend's sudden change in attitude.  But, they have larger things to
worry about:  rumors about that Initech is about to begin downsizing...
As bleak as much of this sounds, let me assure you that Office Space is
a comedy, and quite a funny one.  Although it shares the same absurdist
office humor of the Dilbert comic strip, Office Space is actually based
loosely on the series of Milton cartoons which aired on Saturday Night
Life.  Each mundane detail, taken by itself, seems completely,
regrettably, plausible.  Yet, when combined into a whole, the picture
which results is absolutely surreal.
Ron Livingston tackles his role straight-faced, and becomes much funnier
because of it.  His character isn't simply being a clown lampooning
around the office, but rather seems possessed by a zen-like clarity. He
is operating on a higher plane, where everything suddenly makes sense,
and from this vantage point, he allows the audience to smirk at the
absurdities of life.
Anyone who has had to deal with the inefficiencies of corporate
bureaucracy, or who has ever been frustrated with the technology of
modern life, will recognize many of the characters and situations in the
film. In fact, in addition to being wildly humorous, the film may
actually prove to be cathartic.
The animated roots of Office Space show in the film's lack of
complexity. Most of the characters in the film can be quickly summarized
by a particular personality quirk.  One employee, Milton (Stephen Root),
is practically a flesh-and-blood cartoon.  However, despite their simple
nature, the characters still manage to be surprisingly funny.
It's not required to have a corporate background to enjoy this film
(though the situations may seem exceedingly far-fetched if you are
unfamiliar with just how close to reality they really are). The film is
flimsy and absurd, but also very funny.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Goodbye Lover (1999)
A complex plot is not nearly enough to make an interesting movie, a fact
which is clearly demonstrated by the film noir Goodbye Lover. With
enough plot twists to fill three other films, Goodbye Lover shows that a
ludicrous number of double-crosses can't compensate for the lack of
enjoyable characters and quality dialogue.
The film is populated by a plethora of amoral no-gooders. Sandra
(Patricia Arquette) is a real estate agent who gets kicks out of using
other people's houses for her torrid sexual fantasies. Ben (Don Johnson)
is a PR weasel, the slimy type who, when not covering up for a senator's
tawdry misbehavior, is having an affair in the back rooms of a church.
Jake (Dermot Mulroney) is a bitter alcoholic, who is self-destructing
and wants to take everyone down with him.  The nicest of the bunch would
have to be Peggy Blaine (Mary-Louise Parker), who merely seeks intimate
relationships with her co-workers.
The plot of Goodbye Lover is too convoluted to summarize here without
spoiling half the movie.  Suffice it to say that it involves sex, money,
greed, lust, affairs, murder, fraud, backstabbing, serial killing, and
The Sound of Music.
Thrown in the midst of everything is Detective Rita Pompano (Ellen
DeGeneres), an extremely cynical investigator who tries to make sense of
all this.  With her new partner always a half-step behind, Detective
Pompano slowly but surely begins to unravel the truth.
Ellen DeGeneres is the best thing Goodbye Lover has to offer, even if
she comes across as more of a droll comedienne than a police
investigator.  Her witty banter is actually a bright spot in this
otherwise dull movie.  And, even though she's primarily a tangential
character, she's the most interesting of the lot.
The plotting of Goodbye Lover feels more like a soap opera than film
noir, and an unconvincing one at that.  Relationships, twists and
surprises seem to crop up simply because they could be worked into the
script... not because they make sense.
Goodbye Lover is chock full of twist and turns.  However, the film
actually isn't that hard to follow...it just gives you no reason to
bother.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Perfect Murder, A (1998)
Andrew Davis directs this update of Frederick Knott's suspense play,
Dial M For Murder, previously made into a masterful Alfred Hitchcock
thriller. This time around, the technology and sensibilities have been
updated, but the key story remains exciting and suspenseful.
Michael Douglas plays Steven Hayes, a junk bond investor whose world is
collapsing.  His company is under investigation, his finances are shot,
and he recently discovered his wife is having an affair.
Emily (Gwyneth Paltrow), his rich wife, has been frequenting the company
of starving artist David Shaw (Viggo Mortensen).  Steven develops a
carefully constructed plan which could solve all his difficulties.  He
will hire a man to kill his wife, the he can use her trust fund money to
fix his monetary problems.
Fans of the Hitchcock movie, and the original play, will probably
already notice some differences.  The setup of the movie is roughly the
same, but, though a key piece of concluding evidence is the same, the
last half of the film is different in all but tone.
Although it is not a stretch, Michael Douglas fits his role perfectly.
Though it is nice to see him stretch now and then, and he can play the
modern rich white male in his sleep, he does such a good job at it that
he's fun just to watch.  His character here, as in Dial M for Murder, is
a planner.  We get to learn his meticulously crafted perfect murder
plan, then watch as he rapidly adjusts when things begin to go awry.
Michael plays his role in such a way that you hate and cheer for him at
the same time.
Gwyneth Paltrow has a beefier part here than Grace Kelly did in Dial M
for Murder, and she manages to do an admirable job with it.  Though not
without sin, she is the most sympathetic of the major three characters.
And even if she does make a few big leaps of logic here and there in the
film, she maintains credibility throughout.
As the third vertex of the triangle, Viggo Mortensen also has a bigger
role than before.  Of the three main cast members, he is the weakest,
and his motives are never 100% clear.  But, he does serve to add a
little extra mystery to the plot.
And the plot here is strong (what a welcome change).  The additions made
to A Perfect Murder enhance the violence of Dial M for Murder, but
maintain the same atmosphere.
The end result is about as good as you could hope for in a remake of a
Hitchcock classic.  It has some rough edges here and there which could
have used the master's touch, but, for the most part, A Perfect Murder
is an exciting and truly suspenseful thriller.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Pi (1998)
Darren Aronofsky makes his directoral debut with this uneven paranoid
thriller, Pi.  It's filled with plenty of new concepts and ideas, but
also with a healthy dose of pretension.
Max Cohen (Sean Gullette) is a brilliant mathematician on the borders of
madness.  He theorizes that since mathematics is the language of nature,
everything can be comprehended purely and completely on the basis of
numbers.  The key to understanding is to find the patterns that underlie
everything.
To confirm his theories, Max builds an archaic/state-of-the-art computer
system to crunch numbers on the stock market.  Once he discovers the
key, he should be able to predict stock prices at will.  But things
don't work out as smoothly as he plans.
He keeps running into a peculiar bug, one which may have caused his
mentor, Sol (Mark Margolis), to give up mathematics completely.  In
addition, he is being hounded by a rabid Wall Street exec (Pamela Hart),
as well as Lenny Meyer (Ben Shenkman), a man who believes Max's number
crunching can lead to the understanding of God.
Aronofsky has talent.  It's not every writer-director who could combine
topics as diverse as Fibbonacci numbers, phrenology, Kabalah, Chaos
Theory, numerology and Go into a single coherent (if not terribly
accurate) film. Plus, he is able to go a long way on a low budget,
producing some striking cinematography as he goes.
However, despite all of that, Pi fails as a film. There are two stories
in the film (Max and his theories, and Max and his descent into
madness), but neither one is satisfactory.  The former is implausible,
strains credibility, and is ultimately pointless.  The latter is more
interesting at times, but while it certainly gets disturbing at times,
it's all style and little substance.
Part of the problem rests with Sean Gullette.  As the lead character, he
is rather bland (particularly as a "mad mathematician").  None of the
actors in the film give stellar performances, but in an introspective
storyline, Gullette's performance is key, and not quite up to par.
Pi is stylistically interesting, but empty overall.  There's a thin line
between genius and incomprehensible madness. The film falls solidly in
the latter camp.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Man in the Iron Mask, The (1998)
Braveheart screenwriter Randall Wallace makes his directoral debut with
this adaptation of Alexandre Dumas' further adventures of the Three
Musketeers. While not as good as his earlier film, The Man in the Iron
Mask is entertaining.
The three musketeers have, at this time, retired and gone their separate
ways.  Aramis (Jeremy Irons) has returned to the priesthood, Porthos
(Gerard Depardieu) has devoted himself to earthly pleasures, and Athos
(John Malkovich) has contented himself with raising his son, Raoul
(Peter Sarsgaard).  Their protigi, D'Artagnan (Gabriel Byrne), remains
in the service of the King, Louis XIV (Leonardo DiCaprio).
King Louis is a young king, and not a very good one.  His people are
starving, his armies are fighting unjust wars, and he is more concerned
about chasing the skirts of Raoul's fiancee, Christine (Judith
Godreche). However, King Louis has a secret:  one whose very identity is
so threatening that he has been imprisoned deep within the Bastille and
forced to wear a mask of iron.
What's the one thing you expect out of any movie starring the Three
Musketeers? Swordplay!  But, for some reason, the movie's halfway over
before any true swashbuckling gets done.  When it finally arrives, it is
mostly chaotic, and makes you yearn for the better days of Fairbanks or
Flynn.
But, luckily there's more to the story than simple swordplay.  The drama
in the film is handled well, even though the themes are a bit broad.
The weakest part of Wallace's script is the dialogue, which starts out
very poorly, but, thankfully, does get better as the film progresses.
And the film is helped by a fine cast.  DiCaprio is in fine form here,
given more to do than he was in Titanic. The musketeers are also good,
with only Gerard Depardieu (strangely, the only true Frenchman among the
bunch) seeming out of place.  His Porthos is used primarily for comic
relief, which is mostly neither comical nor a relief.
There are a few moments when the film stutters, particularly in its
first hour, but as its dense plot is given a chance to unfold, the lure
of the story manages to capture its audience.  The Man in the Iron Mask
is far from being the great epic it strives to be, but it is ultimately
enjoyable, and delivers entertainment for the dollar.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Kissing a Fool (1998)
Doug Ellin wrote and directed Kissing a Fool, a hit-and-miss romantic
comedy, that, although humorous, is hampered by a bad structure and weak
characters.
The story of Kissing a Fool is framed in a flashback, in which a
publisher, Linda (Bonnie Hunt), while hosting a wedding at her house,
relates to two over-eager wedding guests the story of how the bride and
groom got together.
The bride in question is Sam (Mili Avital), an editor who works for
Linda. She's currently editing the novel of Jay (Jason Lee), whose best
friend is Chicago sportscaster Max Abbott (David Schwimmer).  Jay sets
up Sam and Max, and before you know it, the couple is engaged to be
married.
However, the womanizing Max has doubts about the loyalties of his
bride-to-be. He tries to get his pal Jay to seduce her as a test.  If
she bites, Max will call off the wedding...otherwise, he's found the
right girl.  Of course, Jay is reluctant, coming off a bad relationship
with Natasha (Vanessa Angel), but he soon finds himself falling in love
with Sam.
The heart of any romantic comedy is its characters, and Kissing the Fool
runs the gamut from good to not so good.  In the "good" category: Jason
Lee. His is the most developed character in the film, and he handles it
well. To top it off, he's funny, and gets most of the film's good lines.
Mili Avital sits somewhere in the middle of the road.  Her character is
nice, but flavorless.  We never learn that much about her, and she
doesn't express a strong presence that might transcend her mundane
character.
Playing out of type, and without much success, is David Schwimmer.  As
much as he tries, his suave sportscaster is never quite believable. He's
at his best during his "pathetic" moments, or, in other words, when he
seems to be in more familiar territory. It just goes to show that a
change of pace isn't necessarily good.
And then there's Bonnie Hunt.  She barely registers a presence as a
minor character throughout the flashbacks, but when she's the narrator,
you wish she would just go away.  It certainly doesn't help that the
entire awkward flashback structure kills the story (for some reason it
reveals the answers to the film's central questions right at the
beginning). But any time the film begins to gain momentum on its own,
WHAM! We're thrust back to Bonnie Hunt and her over-eager guests, and
everything falls apart.
The story itself is a bit light.  Even without the revealing framework,
you can see exactly where the film is going.  But the film's saving
graces are its humorous moments.  There are some wonderful exchanges
between characters, and plenty of amusingly awkward situations
throughout Kissing a Fool. However, while the humor makes Kissing a Fool
palatable, its many flaws keep it from being completely enjoyable.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Wrongfully Accused (1998)
Talk about beating a dead horse.  Leslie Nielsen is still trying to
squeeze the last drop of humor out of the spoof comedy.  Give up!  It's
bone-dry, as his latest comedic train wreck, Wrongfully Accused, can
attest.
The film roughly follows the plot of The Fugitive, but spoofs a variety
of films in-between, from The Empire Strikes Back to Titanic. Leslie
Nielsen's bumbling fool this time around is Ryan Harrison, master
violinist.  He's falsely accused of murder and must escape to find the
real killer:  a one armed, one legged, one eyed man (Aaron Pearl).
In the Tommy Lee Jones role here is Richard Crenna as Fergus Falls, the
U.S. Marshal assigned to track Harrison down.  You'd think that the
filmmakers would be able to get some mileage out of Tommy Lee Jones'
Oscar-winning role.  No such luck.  Crenna barks out orders in
Jones-style, but his character is so uninteresting that he goes missing
for most of the film's last third, and you never notice the difference.
And of course the film has to have some sort of love interest.  That job
is dually provided by Kelly LeBrock and Melinda McGraw.  One of these
women has Ryan's best interests at heart...the other wants to kill him.
But he doesn't know which is which, and the audience couldn't care less.
The film is packed with wall-to-wall non sequitur gags, but the film's
escape sequence is the only one which even mildly works, and it is
mostly successful only in comparison to the rest of the film.
One of the big problems with the humor here is the source material.
Rather than spoofing a genre, Wrongfully Accused decided to spoof one
specific film, The Fugitive. As all the comedic potential is tapped
early, the film grasps out for other sources of inspiration.  However,
the amalgamated hodgepodge of scenes are so desperately humorless that
it seems the filmmakers are simply playing a game of "Guess Which Film
We're Spoofing Now!"
There have been worse spoof comedys...but not many.  For the crime of
being unfunny, Wrongfully Accused is guilty, guilty, guilty.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Full Tilt Boogie (1997)
Most documentaries about the making of a movie are purely promotional
tools.  Occasionally, you'll run across a documentary such as Hearts of
Darkness, which breaks all the boundaries and reveals something beyond
the mundane techniques of the filmmaking process. Full Tilt Boogie lies
somewhere in-between, more than just a long advertisement, but never
quite as revealing as it could be.
Director Sarah Kelly takes us behind the scenes of the movie From Dusk
Till Dawn. The 1996 criminals-on-run-meet-vampires movie united writer
Quentin Tarantino with director Robert Rodriguez.  They added actors
George Clooney, Harvey Keitel, Juliette Lewis and Salma Hayek, and
created a unique, if only moderately successful horror film.
Unlike the traditional promotional film, we not only hobnob with the
"upper echelon" stars and director, but Full Tilt Boogie introduces us
to the assistants, the grips, the peons...the people who get things
done.  But the film never gets too much past the introductions. We never
really get to know these people.
There are times when the film seems to veer towards substance, such as
when it documents the union disputes over the film.  Rodriguez decided
to film From Dusk till Dawn with a non-union cast, a decision which did
not sit well with union leaders.  Threats of strikes and boycotts raged
on the periphery of the shoot.  Full Tilt Boogie documents some of
these, but merely skims the surface of the issues involved.
Fans of From Dusk Till Dawn may find parts of Full Tilt Boogie
interesting.  However, there's just not enough here to recommend it to
the general public.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Fifth Element, The (1997)
The best science fiction films manage to create a unique world,
populated with rich characters and coherent to its own logic.  The
Fifth Element only meets these goals part way.  It creates a visually
intriguing setting, but adds rudimentary characters and a fairly
standard action plot.
Three hundred years in the future, Earth faces a mysterious problem.
An unknown massive object has appeared in space, destroying all life it
touches.  When conventional weapons prove useless, one Father Cornelius
(Ian Holm) believes he may have the answer.  He has descended from an
order that has guarded a secret for 5000 years: a weapon of ultimate
good that can defeat the ultimate evil.  In order to use this weapon,
it is necessary to collect four stones (representing the four elements
of air, fire, earth and water), along with a mysterious "fifth
element".  However, gathering them may not be as easy as Father
Cornelius would hope, for there are other forces at work.
The industrialist Zorg (Gary Oldman) wants the stones for his own
nefarious purposes, and has the resources to get what he desires.
In the midst of this conflict is thrust Korben Dallas (Bruce Willis),
an ex-military man, now struggling as a hovercab driver.  Both fate and
his government draw him together with Leeluu (Milla Jovovich), a
strangely perfect humanoid alien who may hold the key to collecting and
using the elements.
The world that director Luc Besson has created is original and
breathtaking.  In fact, it is almost worth the admission for the
eye-candy alone.  Though cluttered, the sets makes firm strides away
from the gothic gloominess of Blade Runner, which has influenced nearly
every science fiction film in the last fifteen years.  The vibrant use
of color in the Fifth Element is refreshing (although you can't help
but compare Leeluu's bright orange hair with Korben's bright orange
tank top).  The costumes throughout are a bit over-the-top, but
interesting to look at, anyhow.  The film reaches its pinnacle with the
pure visual delight of its action pieces (the hovercar chase through
New York traffic is particularly spectacular).
However, once establishing so thrilling a setting, the remainder of the
film is somewhat of a letdown.  The Korben Dallas character is, well,
Bruce Willis.  Aside from the throwaway "my wife left me", there's not
much development there.  As Zorg, Gary Oldman gets to chew some
scenery, but he never really has much motive (other than just being
evil). Leeluu has some alluring enigma, but she remains shrouded in
mystery throughout the whole film, and is used more as a plot device
than a character.  And the characters used for comic relief
(particularly the shrill talk show host Rudy Rhod (Chris Tucker))
rarely have the effect desired.
As far as the movie's overall plot, you've got a MacGuffin to quest for
and some villains to provide obstacles, and a few throwaway morals
tacked onto the end.  Your basic action movie package...no insights
here.  Yet, as an action film, The Fifth Element is above normal,
owning many of the same stylistic touches that made Besson's earlier
works (La Femme Nikita and The Professional) such a treat to watch.
Sure, there are occasional inconsistencies, and the characters are
rather thin, but Luc Besson makes the best of the elements he has.
If you're hoping for a science fiction masterpiece, you won't get it in
the Fifth Element.  Go in expecting a decent action film with stunning
visuals, and you'll be sure to enjoy the ride.
Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 400 reviews, and information on over 500 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Jane Austen's Mafia! (1998)
Director Jim Abrahams was one of the original trio who ushered in the
nonstop-joke spoof genre with their seminal film Airplane!  However
after eighteen years and countless clones, the genre has lost its
luster.  Abrahams latest film, MAFIA!, isn't the worst, but doesn't add
any shine to a genre which should be put to rest.
The action mostly parallels the Godfather: Parts I and II.  From his
humble beginnings in Salmonella, Italy, Vincenzo Cortino (Lloyd Bridges)
rises to become an all-powerful (but still klutzy) mafia don.  He has
two sons to whom he could bequeath his empire of crime: psychopath Joey
(Billy Burke), and college-boy Anthony (Jay Mohr).
Following his good guy, bad guy double life, Anthony has two
girlfriends. There's Diane (Christina Applegate), a play on Diane Keaton
from The Godfather, and Pepper (Pamela Giley), based on Sharon Stone
from Casino.
If you can't tell already...most of the jokes in the movie are as
horribly dated as the genre itself.  There are a few nods to semi-recent
movies (Forrest Gump, Casino and The English Patient), but most of the
film is devoted to such fresh entrees as The Godfather, A Christmas
Carol, and Jaws.
The movie isn't as joke-free as several of Leslie Nielsen's latest
attempts. However, the chuckles are sparsely scattered.  This type of
film works best with out-of-the-blue rapid fire jokes, but MAFIA!
continues to bog itself down with lame jokes whose meager payoff isn't
worth the tedious setup.
Jay Mohr gives his role a valiant try, but it is the jokes which carry
(or drop) this type of movie.  And MAFIA! is a definite fumble.  It is
somewhat sad that this has to be Lloyd Bridges' last performance...it
won't be one he's remembered for.
If you're in a mood for a wacky comedy this summer that's genuinely
funny, go see There's Something About Mary.  Or, you could stay home and
watch Airplane! or The Naked Gun.  MAFIA! is just too little, too late.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Hard Rain (1998)
After stalling for nearly a year, Hard Rain finally makes it to the box
office.  Previously titled The Flood, the filmmakers quickly renamed it
after the deluge of disaster pics, so as not to have it drown in the
public's eye.  In a way, it's fitting, since the disaster portion of the
film is merely a backdrop, not the main focus.  The heart of the film is
a heist picture, albeit one with an ever present supply of water to
provide additional difficulties.  But all in all, the film is not a
disaster in itself.
The small town of Huntingburg is being flooded.  The sheriff (Randy
Quaid) is evacuating the citizenry, even though he lost the recent
election. He and his deputies, however, will be staying to protect the
town from looters, as the sheriff feels doing his job well is the best
revenge.
Also anticipating looters are the local banks.  An armored car, guarded
by Tom (Christian Slater) and Charlie (Ed Asner), is emptying the vaults
of banks up and down the river.
That truck is the target of a group of thieves (led by Morgan Freeman),
who are using the torrential rains to their unexpected advantage.
However, the heist doesn't go exactly as planned:  Tom escapes and
manages to hide the money.
Soon, the band of theives is after Tom to find the hidden money, and the
police don't know whether to trust Tom or lock him away as a potential
looter.
There is a good setup in Hard Rain, with the three sides (the thieves,
the cops, and the hero), each having its own idiosyncracies.  The ragtag
group of robbers is the most interesting, containing not only Freeman
but an ex-science teacher (Dan Florek), a trigger-happy bible-quoting
thug, and a nervous neophyte.
However, after this setup, the characterization goes nowhere.  Morgan
Freeman simply plays the part of "Morgan Freeman as a kindly but
desperate thief", and we're never given any hows or whys for his
character. The same goes for all the other characters as well, who offer
no real surprises (especially if you've seen the spoiler-filled
trailer).  Christian Slater and fellow flood victim Minnie Driver are
paired off, but there's no more depth to their relationship than to
their characters.
While we're on the subject of screenwriting, the dialogue isn't
particularly deep, either.  There are times that it's servicable for
fueling the bare minimums of an action picture, but others (particularly
the comic relief) are purely atrocious. One entire subplot, involving an
elderly civilian couple (Betty White and Richard Dysart) severely needed
to be axed.
But all that said, the movie does work, on its own terms.  This is
nothing that's going to win an Academy Award, but for thrills and
excitement, it will deliver bang for your (matinee) dollar.  A flood
might not be in the same class as volcanoes, twisters and earthquakes,
but after seeing this film you sure don't want to be in one.
The best advice is to watch this film without questioning too many of
the details.  (Such as...with all the shotgun blasts going on, why
doesn't anyone's boat get holed?)  But if you sit back and simply enjoy
the mindless peril, you'll have a decent time.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 500 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Paulie (1998)
In the wake of Babe, you would expect to be doused by a flood of talking
animal movies.  Paulie is the first of three we can expect this year
(the others including Dr. Dolittle and Babe 2).  If the others are as
good as Paulie, we'll be lucky.
The film opens with Misha (Tony Shalhoub), janitor at an animal research
company, discovering a parrot in the basement.  But this is no ordinary
parrot...this is Paulie (voiced by Jay Mohr), and he can talk.  Not just
mimicking like most parrots, but true intelligent speech.  Misha and
Paulie become friends, and Paulie tells his tale.
It all started when he was a hatchling.  He was bought as a present for
a young girl, Marie Allweather (Hallie Kate Eisenberg).  She has trouble
speaking and few other friends, but Paulie soon becomes her best friend
and teacher (helping her overcome her stutter).
But good things never last, and after being blamed for being a bad
influence, Paulie is sold.  He makes a vow to return to Marie any way he
can.  The film follows Paulie on his journey, as he meets a wide variety
of people. There's a kind old painter, Ivy (Gena Rowlands), a shifty
con-man, Buddy (Jay Mohr), a happy-go-lucky restaurateur, Ignacio
(Cheech Marin), and a scientist, Dr. Reingold (Bruce Davison).
Overall, the film is cute, and a little oversentimental.  The film it
most hearkens to is Babe.  However, it doesn't have as strong a sense of
magic as the talking pig flick...but Paulie packs a heftier sense of
humor.
What really sells the film is the character of Paulie, himself.  Many
animal films rely completely on the animal's cuteness to sell itself.
Although there are a couple of the requisite "awwww" scenes, the film
doesn't dwell on them.  Instead, we get to know and like this parrot as
a person.  In fact he's more interesting than the majority of characters
that we get to meet in many films today.
Plus, Paulie has quite a cast to back him up.  Tony Shalhoub in
particular does a noteworthy job as the kindred spirit who lends a
sympathetic ear to a talking bird.
There are a couple of cute parrot tricks in the film, particularly those
involving an ATM, but not as many as you might expect in a film of this
type.  The speech effects are convincing, but considering they involve
an immobile beak, they don't seem to have the same finesse as Babe.  A
minor complaint:  we never quite learn why Paulie is so unique.  We meet
several other animals (even other semi-talking Parrots), and none seem
quite so human as Paulie.
The cinematography is not quite as good as it tries to be.  For example,
there is a sunrise sequence which is supposed to be awe inspiring, but
comes off as particularly bland.
But that aside, Paulie is quite entertaining.  The film has a heart, and
a mind as well.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Babe: Pig in the City (1998)
I have to admit, I wasn't the biggest fan of the original movie, Babe.
The premise was cute, and the speaking-animal effects were well done,
but I still maintain that the original film was well over-praised.
Which brings us to Babe: Pig in the City, a sequel (of sorts) to Babe.
It's an unusual sequel in that it doesn't merely try to tell the same
story...but is actually markedly different. Unfortunately, different
doesn't always equate to better...
After an accident injures Farmer Hoggett (James Cromwell), the Hoggett
farm is in serious trouble.  Mrs. Hoggett (Magda Szubanski) gathers
their famous sheep-pig, Babe (voiced by E.G. Daily), to make a guest
appearance at a state fair (where a generous appearance fee will help to
save the farm).
Unfortunately, things don't go quite as planned, and Mrs. Hoggett and
Babe end up in the big city (an every-city, blending many world
locales). There, the pair are taken in by a kind landlady (Mary Stein),
who is kind to animals in a city that shuns them.
But the city is a tough place, and this animal-friendly hotel is no
exception. There's a floor devoted to a thieving clown (Mickey Rooney)
and his group of clothes-wearing circus monkeys.  There's a floor for
dogs, and a floor for cats.  Poor Babe is stuck in the attic, a
sheep-pig with no sheep to herd.
Fans of the first film may be pleased that both Ferdinand the Duck
(Danny Mann), and the inexplicable singing mice are back for return
appearances.  However, this time around, James Cromwell's
Oscar-nominated role of Farmer Hoggett is relegated to a mere cameo (as
are most of Babe's friends from the first film).
The new film instead focuses on a new coterie of animals, but few as
charming as the original.  And while a gangster-like pit bull is
entertaining (voiced by Stanley Ralph Ross), many of the new animals
lack the strong personalities of the originals.
The special effects have improved since the first film.  However, the
gimmick of talking animals has long since lost its freshness (having
been done to death in television commercials and other movies).  Talking
animals alone is no longer enough to sustain a movie.
The film's tone is rather dark and murky at times...but then, if you
recall, so was the original (in which the animals were constantly
worried about being eaten).  But gone is the sense of whimsy which
lightened up the first Babe. Instead, this sequel just leaves an
unpleasant aftertaste.
The film has its share of oddities, from the strange appearance of pig
people (who have apparently escaped from the Island of Dr. Moreau)
throughout the movie, to an unusual slapstick climax that doesn't quite
work.  The sum of these make the movie unusual and distinctive, but at
times the irregularities are borderline distracting.
Still, Babe: Pig in the City deserves some credit for at least trying
something new, rather than sticking to the exact same formula as the
original.  But, in the end, the sequel never lives up to the original,
and stands on very shaky ground on its own.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Dark City (1998)
Dark City is an intriguing mixture of science fiction and film noir.
Based on an original story by director Alex Proyas, the film has the
look and feel of a modern comic book adaptation, but with much more
substance.
Rufus Sewell stars as John Murdoch, a man who wakes up in a strange
hotel room with no memory.  His only clue to his former identity is a
sunny postcard from a locale about which it seems everyone has a fuzzy
memory.
However Mr. Murdoch's quest for his identity is hampered by two things:
he is wanted for a series of grisly murders by Inspector Bumstead
(William Hurt), and a mysterious group of pale bald men in trenchcoats
are hunting him down. For some reason, unknown to Murdoch, they want him
dead.
These men, called The Strangers, have the abilities to stop time and
alter reality, a process they call "tuning". Aided and abetted by one
human, Dr. Shreber (Kiefer Sutherland), their motives are mysterious and
unknown, but can certainly come to no good.
The film's gothic looks and hardcore science fiction elements are both a
weakness and a strength.  The bizarre atmosphere are likely to be very
off-putting to mainstream audiences, who will be missing a good film.
At the same time, however, those same traits give the film all the
earmarks of being a lasting "cult" hit.
While the film may be strange and out of the ordinary, the plot is by no
means hard to follow.  With several characters in the dark, the film
does a good job at slowly revealing itself to them and to the audience.
Still, there are plenty of questions left unresolved.  For example, why
isn't anybody ever accidentally harmed during the "tuning"? It also
seems that more people in the city should notice the discontinuities
that occur during the night.
Overall, the cast does a good job at evoking the appropriate atmosphere.
Rufus Sewell gives a decent, if understated, performance as the film's
everyman.  Jennifer Connelly and William Hurt are underused, but
enjoyable while they're onscreen.  Kiefer Sutherland's breathless
delivery is  more annoying than innovative.  As the lead Strangers, Ian
Richardson and Richard O'Brien are creepily effective.
You would think that the cinematography and special effects of Dark City
should be its strongest point.  But while they are good,  Dark City's
true strength is in it's story which thoughtfully examines the changing
facets of identity, memory and perception.
Don't be put off by the film's gothic imagery and bizarre themes. If you
do, you'll be missing an enjoyable, if strange, film.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Shakespeare in Love (1998)
Shakespeare in Love is a delightful romantic comedy with a literary
twist. A fictionalized account of a few months of Shakespeare's life,
the film manages to humanize the greatest English writer of all time,
and delivers a splendid time while doing it.
The film is set in 1593, when William Shakespeare (Joseph Fiennes) was
just a struggling playwright with a bad case of writer's block. The
debt-ridden owner of The Rose theater (Geoffrey Rush) has commissioned
his latest play, a romantic comedy entitled Romeo and Ethel, the
Pirate's Daughter...but Shakespeare is at a loss where to start.
Enter the dazzlingly beautiful and rich Viola (Gwyneth Paltrow), a young
lady who would much prefer the life of a player to her life as the
future wife of a pompous aristocrat, Lord Wessex (Colin Firth).  To
these ends, she disguises herself as a man (since women are forbidden to
take to the stage), and auditions for the part of Romeo in her favorite
poet Shakespeare's latest play.
Meanwhile, a chance encounter with the undisguised Viola sets
Shakespeare's heart all aflutter.  His infatuation gives him renewed
inspiration for writing his play, but it also may turn deadly, as Lord
Wessex wants no rivals for his wife-to-be...particularly not a low-born
playwright.
The screenplay of Shakespeare in Love, written by Marc Norman and Tom
Stoppard, is both literate and accessible.  The wordplay is absolutely
frantic, and even something the Shakespeare-illiterate will enjoy. From
Shakespearean allusions, to pure physical comedy, the film  incorporates
the same mixture of high-and-low humor as many of Shakespeare's plays.
There's something for everyone in this ingenious script.
Sure, there are a few anachronistic twists thrown in here and there, but
they only enhance the playful mood of the film.  The film is obviously
not striving to be mistaken for bland history.  But there are enough
historical details here and there to satisfy the amateur historian.
Joseph Fiennes is simply mesmerizing as Shakepeare, particularly when
delivering the tongue-twisting dialogue at a frenetic pace.  However,
the true marvel of the film is Gwyneth Paltrow, who radiantly shines as
Viola.  Here, she has a role which allows her a fiery mixture of
strength and passion. She makes it perfectly believable that a character
like hers could inspire one of the most inspired poets.
Not merely a period piece, Shakespeare in Love is the rival of many a
modern-day romantic comedy.  The solid acting and delightful screenplay
raise this one above the crowd to be the best romantic comedy of the
season.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Simple Plan, A (1998)
Crime doesn't pay.  Particularly in a world where the rule of Murphy's
Law is absolute.  That's the lesson learned by the characters in  the
well-acted, brilliantly written and intensely gripping drama, A Simple
Plan.
Hank Mitchell (Bill Paxton) has a good, if not perfect, life.  He has a
decent job, a loving wife (Bridget Fonda), and a baby on the way.  But
all of that is about to change.
One day Hank, his dimwitted brother, Jacob (Billy Bob Thornton), and
Jacob's dimwitted drinking buddy, Lou (Brent Briscoe), make an
interesting discovery in the woods:  a crashed plane containing over $4
million in presumably dirty money.
After some minor deliberation, the three men tentatively decide to keep
the money.  And, wouldn't you know it, things invariably start to go
wrong.  As the walls start to close in, the men must not only struggle
to keep their stories straight, but also face the pressures of greed and
doubt which tempt them to turn against one another.
Director Sam Raimi, best known for his Evil Dead films, at first seems
an unlikely choice to direct this much more traditional, character
oriented thriller.  However, here he shows a mastery of the subtle
touch.  He is able to create a tangible atmosphere of unease as what
seemed to be a simple plan grows more and more convoluted over time.
The story of A Simple Plan, adapted from Scott B. Smith's novel, is well
constructed.  The many twists and turns throughout the film are
reasonable, yet unexpected.  The characters are strongly written as
well.  You get the sense that all of the characters here are constantly
thinking (even though it's an activity that not all of them do well).
Billy Bob Thornton turns in yet another brilliant performance as the
pathetic Jacob.  Though there are some similarities between this role
and his performance of Karl in Slingblade, he manages to make Jacob a
unique creation that stands on his own. At first, Jacob is seemingly
just a dim bulb...but there's much more to this character than what
first appears.
Billy Bob Thornton isn't the only one here who can act...and this
picture is full of examples.  Bridget Fonda deserves kudos for her sharp
portrayal of perhaps the craftiest character in the film.  Bill Paxton
does an excellent job as the desperate everyman.  And Gary Cole delivers
a good turn as Baxter, an FBI agent who is hunting down the lost plane.
With a fascinating screenplay, masterful direction, and excellent
performances, A Simple Plan is a truly suspenseful drama,  and one of
the year's best films.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Misrables, Les (1998)
Modern audiences are more likely to be familiar with Les Misirables from
the pop-Broadway musical rather than Victor Hugo's original tome.
Adapted several times for the cinema, this latest effort does a superb
job of translating the characters, story, and heart of the novel to the
screen.
Liam Neeson stars as Jean Valjean.  As a young man, Valjean stole some
bread to satisfy his hunger...and he was sentenced to 19 years of hard
labor for his crimes.  Prison hardened him, and on his release he seems
doomed to a life of crime and squalor.  However, an unexpected act of
compassion changes his outlook on life, and he vows to become a better
man.
However, he runs up against one man who doesn't believe in reform.
Inspector Javert (Geoffrey Rush) is an obsessive law abider.  He has no
tolerance for anyone who breaks the rules, even with benign intentions.
He once served as a guard at the labor camp where Valjean served, and
after Valjean breaks his parole, Javert devotes himself to bringing him
to justice.
Two women also get caught up in the struggle.  Fantine (Uma Thurman) is
an unwed mother suffocating in an unforgiving society.  Her daughter,
Cosette (Mimi Newman, and later, Claire Danes), is her life, yet she
cannot afford to raise her.  Instead, Cosette is sent to live with a
cruel foster family which extorts money from Fantine, and forces Cosette
into a life little better than a slave.
Director Bille August manages to create a faithful adaptation of Victor
Hugo's novel, which, though omitting some of the political undertones,
remains true to the overall story and tone of the book.  Hopefully you
won't, as some clueless members of the audience did, wonder where all
the songs went. The movie manages to be completely engrossing without
the Andrew Lloyd Webber flourishes.
The experience is bolstered by strong performances throughout, though
Neeson and Rush deservedly take center stage with their core roles.
Neeson in particular deserves kudos for his portrayal of a man trying to
do good, but continually haunted by his past.
The supporting cast is also extraordinary.  The only actor who dims in
comparison is Hans Matheson, playing the revolutionary, Marius.  The
film slightly loses its luster during his brief love affair, but it is
transitory, and truly only distracting when contrasted with the rest of
the film.
The novel Les Misirables is, by any account, an epic, both in its scope
and in its length.  While it would be nearly impossible to cram
everything from its pages into a two hour movie, this latest attempt
does an admirable job at the translation.  It, too, is an epic...and one
worth seeing.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Deep End of the Ocean, The (1999)
The Deep End of the Ocean is the type of tragic drama that is most often
seen as a TV movie-of-the-week.  Based on Jacquelyn Mitchard's novel, it
paints a stark, depressing picture, and adds a glimmer of hope
intermingled with a tough moral decision.  The result is choppy at
times, moving at others, yet never offers anything mandating a trip to
the theater.
In 1988, Beth and Pat (Michelle Pfieffer and Treat Williams) had a
seemingly "perfect" life.  However, that life crumbles down around them
in an instant.  In a crowded hotel lobby, Beth loses track of her three
year old son, Ben...and he is gone.
In the nine years which follow, their entire family must learn to cope
with the grief.  Beth is the most obviously pain-stricken, but her older
son, Vincent (played by Cory Buck and Jonathan Jackson) is extremely
hard hit, retreating into a shell of rebelliousness.
And then, a miracle occurs...or does it?  Beth notices that a neighbor
boy, Sam Karras (Ryan Merriman), looks an awful lot like her missing
son.  But his single father, George (John Kapelos), doesn't seem to be a
kidnapper.  Is she mistaken about one, or both, of them?  If she is
right, what should be done?
The pacing of The Deep End of the Ocean feels obviously condensed. Each
scene is connected, but rarely seems to flow with the ones fore and
aft.  The experience is not unlike reading every other chapter in a
book.  The gist of the story is there, but so is a feeling that
something is missing.
The film paints its way straight into a corner.  The moral morass
demands that, whatever the outcome, it won't be a happy one.  And yet,
impossibly, and implausibly, the film tidies things up too neatly.
The performances are good throughout, although Whoopi Goldberg seems to
be misused as a police investigator.  The strongest performance in the
film comes from John Kapelos, as Sam's father. In a few simple scenes,
he is able to create a character both sympathetic and memorable.
The Deep End of the Ocean does have its emotional moments. What film
about losing a child would be complete without them? But, you expect a
little bit more from a film at the cinema. Truth be told, The Deep End
of the Ocean is not much different from the run-of-the-mill crisis-bound
tearjerker that you'll find every week  on television.  This one will
wait for video.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Big Lebowski, The (1998)
The Coen Brothers have consistently released a string of quirky,
offbeat, but highly entertaining films with only one minor stumble
(Miller's Crossing). While The Big Lebowski delivers more of their
typical oddball characters and situations, it is an unfortunate
disappointment.  This time, they have all the parts together, but
someone forgot the glue.
Jeff Bridges stars as "The Dude" Jeff Lebowski, but not The Big
Lebowski. That appellation belongs to a millionaire (David Huddleston)
who happens to have the same name as The Dude, but much bigger enemies.
Or at least his trophy wife, Bunny (Tara Reid), does.  But it doesn't
matter much to The Dude when those enemies, in a mix-up, come knocking
on his door.
The Dude, you see, is a relic from the 60s.  His hippie lifestyle has
devolved over time into an endless haze of smoking marijuana, drinking
White Russians, and bowling.  His bowling partners don't have much of a
life either. There's Walter (John Goodman), an obsessed Vietnam vet with
a hair trigger, and an irrational devotion to his ex-wife.  And then
there's the wimpish Donny (Steve Buscemi), who's the team's best bowler,
but gets no recognition and little respect from his teammates.
So, as the Dude gets entangled in the plot, through no fault of his own,
he meets a plethora of unusual characters.  Julianne Moore appears as an
uber-feministic artist.  Peter Stormare is a German nihilist with an
attack ferret.  Coen regular John Turturro has a cameo as Jesus, a
bowler with strange predilections.  There's even a cowboy, Sam Elliott,
who narrates the tale.
However, the sensation this time around is like a bunch of jigsaw pieces
from different puzzles hammered together.  The Coen's better work, such
as Raising Arizona or Barton Fink, each had the same menagerie of
bizarre characters, but in those films there was some sort of common
thread that linked them all together.  They all seemed to belong in the
same world...something that's not true of The Big Lebowski.
Taken on an individual basis, the characters are funny.  Jeff Bridges
does another superb turn in the film's central role, enhancing his
character with a seemingly effortless comic touch.  Goodman's outbursts
are amusing, but they seem staged. Many of the other characters are
overshadowed by their own quirks.
Visually, the film is a treat, particularly in the film's elaborately
staged dream sequences.  They serve no narrative purpose in the film
(like many other things), but they're a hoot to watch.
The central problem with the film seems to be on the script level.
There are plenty of good concepts and interesting characters, but the
end result seems more like a scrapbook than a screenplay.
The Big Lebowski is a failure.  But, on the bright side, it's a Coen
Brothers failure, so, even if the film has little point and even less
cohesion, you've got quirky characters and strange situations to divert
you.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for My Favorite Martian (1999)
Another day, another nostalgic sitcom movie adaptation.  But, with My
Favorite Martian, Hollywood is truly scraping the bottom of the barrel.
(Well, one could argue that the barrel scraping started with Car 54,
Where Are You? and McHale's Navy, but let's not quibble, shall we?)  The
headache-inducing My Favorite Martian has little to offer but empty
special effects and a vacant sense of humor.
Jeff Daniels stars as Tim O'Hara, a struggling television journalist.
He spends his time chasing pointless news stories while lusting after
the boss's sexy reporter daughter, Brace Channing (Elizabeth Hurley),
and completely ignoring his production assistant, Lizzie (Daryl Hannah).
Tim's entire life is turned upside down when he witnesses a UFO crash.
Before he knows it, the alien inside has donned human form, and moves in
with him, posing as his "Uncle Martin" (Christopher Lloyd).  As if
living with an alien with magical powers wasn't enough, Tim also has to
put up with Martin's self-animated talking spacesuit, named Zoot.  (Zoot
was apparently added to demonstrate special effects technology and
provide comic relief...neither of which he does very well.)
In addition to repairing his spaceship, Martin must evade the
governmental men in black who are hunting him down.  Led by the obsessed
scientist, Dr. E. Coleye (Wallace Shawn), and accompanied by the
enigmatic Armitan (Ray Walston), the government agents will stop at
nothing to capture a live Martian specimen.
This is the type of film whose most inspired scene is its very first (in
which the Mars Pathfinder somehow misses evidence of a thriving
futuristic alien society on Mars).  It's a scene almost worthy of a
laugh, and everything is all downhill from there.
Borrowing a page from Flubber, My Favorite Martian subscribes to the
theory that frantic special effects action simply must be humorous.  The
idea is that if there's enough commotion on the screen, your mind will
simply stop trying to find humor, and just assume that things must be
funny.  Granted, small children and the easily amused might actually
fall for that ploy, but most people will simply get annoyed.
Christopher Lloyd's spaced out spaceman is simply a variation on his
familiar wild and eccentric characters.  Martin could easily be Back to
the Future's Doc Brown with antennae (if only he were more amusing).
Jeff Daniels once again  plays the exasperated straight man.  You would
think he would be able to find better material than this by now.
Young children and others who don't know better might pretend to find
some sense of amusement in My Favorite Martian.  But don't be
fooled...this film is even more desolate than the arid Martian
landscape.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for He Got Game (1998)
Spike Lee tackles the subject of basketball in his new movie, He Got
Game. However, this isn't your traditional basketball movie (in fact,
aside from short clips, the game is only played once during the movie).
Instead, the film works best as a relationship drama...detailing the
estrangement between father and son.
Jake Shuttlesworth (Denzel Washington) has been imprisoned for the last
six years, when the warden (Ned Beatty) offers him a deal which could
grant him a pardon.  It seems that Jake's son, appropriately named Jesus
(Ray Allen), has become the country's top basketball prospect.  If Jake
can convince Jesus to enroll in the governor's alma mater, Big State,
the governor might find it in his heart to cut Jake's time in prison
short.
The problem is Jake and Jesus haven't been on talking terms since Jake
killed Jesus' mother.  Jesus has raised himself and his sister Mary
(Zelda Harris), and wants nothing further to do with his father.  Jake
has one week to reconcile with his son before the NCAA deadline...and it
won't be an easy task.
With the deadline looming, everyone wants a piece of Jesus.  His family,
his coach, his schoolmates, and even his girlfriend all have angles, and
there's seemingly no one that Jesus can trust.  It's not a good time for
a reconciliation.
The pressures of basketball have been explored several times before, but
He Got Game does an adequate job at showing the temptations and dangers
involved.  However the more interesting story here is the family
relationship between father and son.
But the film is easily sidetracked, offering up plenty of boring
subplots that add little to the story.  As a prime example, take Jake's
romantic involvement with Dakota (Milla Jovovich), a hooker with a heart
of gold. What does this add to the movie?  Another stereotypical
character and an unexploited chance for Denzel's acting skills (which
could have been put to better use by furthering the story).
Denzel Washington delivers the strong performance he is known for, but
the wildcard in the movie is Ray Allen.  He performs better than your
typical athlete-turned-actor, but (a fact which is particularly obvious
when he's paired up with someone of Denzel's caliber) his talents truly
reside on the court rather than the set.  Spike Lee would have done his
movie a favor if he hired an actor rather than an athlete.
The central plot of He Got Game, however, is still compelling enough to
recommend the movie purely on its own merits.  As a Spike Lee movie it
is a little disappointing.  It's not among his best work, but neither is
it down among his worst.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Bulworth (1998)
After a longer than usual absence from the big screen, Warren Beatty has
returned in a chancy political comedy.  And while it's not bad when he's
aiming for laughs, the movie switches gears halfway through, attempting
to be an earnest political drama...a move that just doesn't fly.
California Senator Jay Billingston Bulworth (Warren Beatty) is suffering
a nervous breakdown during the last weekend before the Democratic
primary.  He has lost the idealism of his youth, and is jaded by the
flood of politically correct sound bytes which monopolize his life.  His
depression gets deep enough that he hires a hitman to assassinate him
before the primary.
His final weekend is a liberating one for him.  No future means no
political repercussions, and Senator Bulworth decides to finally speak
his mind.  No topic is safe as he bluntly expresses his filter-free
views on race relations, socialism, the entertainment industry, and
corporate campaign contributions.
At this point, the movie is on a roll...and at this point, it falters.
Rather than sticking with the funny concept of a politician finally
speaking his mind, the film gets high minded, and he begins speaking the
"truth" (or at least Warren Beatty's version of it).  By the time the
film trots out the eternally wise homeless man (Amiri Baraka) and the
soft-hearted drug dealer (Don Cheadle), you know it's gone down the
wrong path.
Until then, the film does have several good barbs, and Beatty gives a
mostly amusing performance.  This time around, he takes a
"warts-and-all" approach to filmmaking (obviously sensitive to the soft
lighting criticisms he received for Love Affair).  However, he still
can't resist placing a romantic angle in this unromantic film.  This
time around, Halle Berry plays his love interest, a campaign volunteer
with an agenda of her own, in a subplot that just doesn't float with the
rest of the movie.
Even though the romance doesn't quite fit, Berry does a decent job with
her role.  As do most of the supporting cast, including talents such as
Paul Sorvino, Jack Warden and Isaiah Washington.  However, the standout
here is Oliver Platt, as Bulworth's frazzled campaign manager, trying to
make some sort of sense of his boss' new enlightenment.
For a political comedy to work, it either needs to forswear any
political message, or at least make it subservient to the humor.
Bulworth doesn't follow this advice (or not for long, anyway), and
crashes and burns just when it should be hitting new heights.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Never Been Kissed (1999)
Never Been Kissed is a film about second chances.  Similar in ways to
Peggy Sue Got Married, the film gives its lead character a chance to
relive her not-so-glorious days of high school (albeit without the  time
travel twist).  Never Been Kissed is fluff...but it's likable fluff.
The hopelessly geeky Josie Geller (Drew Barrymore) has become the
youngest copy editor at the Chicago Sun-Times, and is assigned her first
undercover reporting assignment:  to go back to high school, and gain an
understanding of kids today.  An easy assignment, or so it seems, until
Josie finds herself reliving her tormented high school past.
Spurned by the popular set, Josie finds refuge with a friendly girl,
Aldys (Leelee Sobieski) and her nerd clique, the Denominators. But she
still desperately longs to be popular, and to be noticed by the cute,
popular guy, Guy (Jeremy Jordan), or her cute English teacher Sam
(Michael Vartan).
Josie's primary confidante is her slacker brother, Rob (David Arquette).
Cheated out of a baseball scholarship by an ill-timed attack of mono,
Rob now spends his life working at a Hawaiian-themed copy shop. But,
inspired by Josie, he sees an opportunity for a second chance. He, too,
returns to high school with the hopes of being spotted by a minor league
baseball scout.
None of this is breathtaking stuff, nor does it try to be.  Never Been
Kissed sets its sights on being slight and enjoyable, and there it
succeeds.  It has a little romance, some nostalgia, and plenty of wish
fulfillment to round out the corners.
Drew Barrymore surprisingly does quite well in the role of a hopeless
geek, and David Arquette is appropriately humorous as her brother.  Both
are able to carry the film through its sluggish spots.  The film sets up
a romantic triangle (between Barrymore, Jordan and Vartan), but then
fails to follow through...likely because one of the arms is much
stronger than the other.
The biggest letdown of the movie is the supporting cast at the Chicago
Sun-Times (including Molly Shannon, Garry Marshall and John C. Reilly).
Most of their jokes just don't pay off. Luckily, when Josie gets back to
high school, the cast there shines.  Leelee Sobieski, in particular,
does an outstanding job as the nerd determined to carve her own path.
Never Been Kissed is never that deep, meaningful or even very
believable.  However, as light entertainment it certainly makes the
grade.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for 10 Things I Hate About You (1999)
Ten Things I Hate About 10 Things I Hate About You:
10. The Downsizing of Shakespeare.  Poor William Shakespeare.  Who'd
have thought his plays could sink so low.  10 Things I Hate About You is
loosely (very loosely) based upon his play, The Taming of the Shrew.
Updated to a modern high school setting, the movie strips away virtually
all of the dialogue, characterizations and plot.  What's left?  Some
vaguely recognizable names: instead of Katharina, we are given Kat
(Julia Stiles); instead of Petruchio, the film gives us Patrick (Heath
Ledger); and, in place of Lucentio, we get the plain Cameron (Joseph
Gordon-Levitt).  And, well, that's about it.  In place of Shakespeare's
finely crafted comic plot, we get:
9. The Plot That Wouldn't Die.  You may remember it most recently from
She's All That, and from countless other films.  In short, Patrick is
dared (or in this case paid) to date the shrewish Kat.  Along the way,
the two fall in love...but eventually his terrible secret must come
out.  When it does, the couple is driven apart, only to realize their
true love for each other and come back together.  Fade to black.  Whew!
8. Whiplash Relationships.  10 Things I Hate About You must have decided
that one hot-and-cold relationship wasn't enough for a film.  So, in
addition to the maelstrom of Patrick and Kat, we have the sweet-and-sour
relationship of Kat and her sister Bianca (Larisa Oleynik).  Then
there's the affections of Cameron for Bianca that range from love to
indifference and back again.  Now, throw in another student, Joey
(Andrew Keegan), who has love and hate relationships with both Bianca
and Kat.  And we haven't even started to look at the secondary
characters!  You need a scorecard to keep track of who's hating whom at
every moment of the film.
7. Teen cliches.  Luckily, if you're completely confused by the ever
changing character allegiances, there's one thing you can count on:  the
omnipresent cliches.  10 Things I Hate About You doesn't just present
them and move on, no, it revels in every predictable detail.  From
absolutely cartoonish archetypical students, to the "standard" events in
any teen movie (including not only a wild party, but even the prom),
this film has them all.  It handles itself better than other recent teen
flicks, but not by much.
6. A Horrendous Lack of Pacing.  Have you ever seen a comic with
absolutely no sense of timing?  That's the same feeling you get when
watching this movie, which leaves a pregnant pause after every other
line of dialogue.  What little humor there is doesn't take that long to
digest, nor is it inclined to provoke plot obscuring bouts of laughter.
5. The Interaction Between Patrick and Kat.  The two characters have
perhaps the best dialogue exchanges in the movie.  However, it not only
pales in comparison to Shakespeare's original wordplay, but makes the
rest of the movie's dialogue look terrible in comparison.  Rather than
being sharp, cruel and biting, most of the screenplay's wit is rather
limp.
4. An Overwhelming Sense of Falseness.  Whether the film is trying to be
spontaneous, happy or sad, the film's scenes just don't quite ring true.
You're always aware that these are actors reading from a script; you
never get lost in the characters.  Nowhere is it more evident than in
the acting of...
3. Julia Stiles.  She's able to display emotions, but she never truly
expresses them (a fact that is particularly evident during one of her
final speeches). Stiles never seems to fit her part...whether she's
being shrewish or sweet, it all seems to be an act.  It further
distances us from the movie.
2. The Scarcity of Larry Miller, as the father of Kat and Bianca.  His
scenes provide the few genuine moments of humor present in the whole
movie. 10 Things I Hate About You certainly could have used more of him,
or at least more characters as entertaining as him.  The film tries to
spice things up with a romance novel-writing guidance counselor (Allison
Janney), and a hip-hop English teacher (Daryl "Chill" Mitchell)...but
fails, miserably.
And, the thing I hated most about 10 Things I Hate About You:  1. The
Fact That It Inspired Me To Write My Review In This Ridiculous Format.
Enough said.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Virus (1999)
You always have to be careful with the initial releases of any calendar
year. January is a traditional dumping ground in which the studios
release films that they don't believe are good enough to even merit a
shot at getting awards, nor entertaining enough to benefit from the
high-traffic holiday box office.  Such a film this year is Virus, a high
tech zombie movie that resembles, in more ways than one, last year's
January-release: Deep Rising.  Both are sci-fi thrillers set aboard a
boat.  And both deserve to be sunk as quickly as possible.
In Virus, Jamie Lee Curtis stars as Kelly Foster, the navigator of the
Sea Star, a tugboat under the command of Captain Everton (Donald
Sutherland), who (at some point before the movie starts) has gone
completely mad.  It's up to Foster and the ship's engineer Steve Baker
(William Baldwin) to keep the tug in one piece. Everton has led the ship
into the middle of a typhoon, where they encounter something
mysterious:  an abandoned Russian scientific vessel.
Upon exploring the derelict ship, the crew of the Sea Star discover
plenty of unusual phenomena.  The entire Russian crew is missing (except
for plenty of bloodstains here and there), there is evidence of gunfire
throughout the ship, and many systems have been smashed or otherwise
destroyed.
But that is only the beginning, as the crew of the Sea Star are about to
find out.  An energy-based life form from outer space has inhabited the
ship's computers.  It controls all the ship's systems, and is building
cyborg robots to further its control.  The alien considers human life to
be a noxious virus that must be eliminated (though in a way that will
provide plenty of spare parts for the next cyborg...).
It is in this way that, you can be certain, everyone who dies will be
back as a bad guy later in the film.  The film never explains why the
alien life form even bothers creating these cyborgs.  It is not as if
they are more powerful than the purely robotic creations.  Nor do they
seem more efficient or more intelligent.  Perhaps they were created out
of boredom (there's certainly enough of that in this movie).
Virus falls into the same trap as many sci-fi horror films.  It's full
of seemingly smart characters who do extremely stupid things.  (Hmmm...
an abandoned ship in the middle of a typhoon, filled with blood and
signs of violence?  Let's split up and wander aimlessly through the dark
corridors...)
The actors in Virus aren't given much to work with, and they don't give
a lot in return.  Donald Sutherland's campy performance (with a
mumble-mouthed on-again, off-again accent) may qualify as the worst in
the film...but at least he was trying something different.  Jamie Lee
Curtis and William Baldwin simply stroll through the film with nary an
ounce of effort.
The robot designs in Virus are halfway interesting, and the high point
of the film.  But, they're hardly worth wading through the rest of the
film just to see.  Very few things would be...
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Avengers, The (1998)
With Hollywood's fascination with television series remakes, it is
surprising that no one has tackled The Avengers before.  The comically
cool spy adventure series seems like just the type of "franchise"
material usually sought by the studios.  However, franchise hopes are
likely to fade with the premiere of this awkward adaptation.
The Avengers for this big screen adaptation are the prim and proper John
Steed (Ralph Fiennes), who's as impeccable in his manners as he is
deadly in his combat. And then there's the brilliant, seductive and
dangerous Mrs. Emma Peel (Uma Thurman).
The film chronicles the meeting of the two Avengers.  Mr. Steed is
already part of the Ministry, a top secret British spy organization.
When England's weather-defense systems are sabotaged, Mrs. Peel is the
chief expert, and also the chief suspect in the crime.  She is paired up
with Steed to prove her guilt or innocence.
The villain in the film is played with relish by Sean Connery.  He
finally gets to play a Bond-ish villain in Sir August DeWynter, a
megalomaniacal Scottish lord with designs on controlling the weather.
Anyone familiar with The Avengers should know that the show had a
particular brand of humor, but the proceedings in the film are extremely
tongue-in-cheek, and at times get downright silly.  For instance, the
traditional villain-to-henchmen speech for anonymity's sake is here
played with all participants in giant teddy bear costumes.  It doesn't
make much sense, and the goofy antics are certain to displease anyone
expecting a straightforward adventure story.
The film seriously suffers from some horrendous editing.  Clocking in at
under ninety minutes, it seems that most of the expository material has
been cut, as well as many transitions.  The result is certainly fast
moving, but confusing and off-putting as well.
In the plus column, however, are the main actors.  All are guilty of
slightly (but appropriate) hammy acting, but they all seem to fit nicely
into their roles as well.  The supporting cast don't quite fare as well.
As leaders of The Ministry, Jim Broadbent and Fiona Shaw never quite
settle into their roles.  Eddie Izzard is never fully developed as Sir
August's Clockwork Orangish henchman.
There are plenty of moments in The Avengers which have a delightfully
surreal quality.  However, there are just as many scenes which go a bit
too far in their outlandishness.  At the same time, some very crucial
plot points breeze by, imperceptible in the clutter.
The Avengers is likely a little too bizarre for those expecting the
standard spy adventure.  It's not a horrible adaptation, but definitely
a flawed one.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Disturbing Behavior (1998)
There's a nugget of a good thriller hidden deep inside Disturbing
Behavior, just waiting to get out.  Unfortunately, it never gets a
chance, and is instead buried in pseudo-thrilling moments mostly
borrowed from bad horror films.
Retreating from troublesome family issues, the Clark family moves to the
seemingly peaceful town of Cradle Bay.  There, eldest son Steve (James
Mardsen) is expected to fit in with his classmates in high school.
However, there's something strange going on under the surface.
Even though he doesn't seem to fit in with them, Steve is immediately
initiated by the paranoid druggies.  His tour guide is Gavin Strick
(Nick Stahl), who, along with his albino buddy U.V. (Chad E. Donella),
is convinced that the preponderance of "perfect" students in the school
is the result of some sort of conspiracy.
You see, the letter-jacket wearing "popular" crowd are all part of a
program called the "blue-ribbons".  It's a goody-two-shoes study group,
in which the members gather at the local yogurt shoppe, listen to a
little Wayne Newton, and study for those Straight-As.  Oh yes, if that
weren't unnatural enough, they are occasionally beset by "toxic jock
syndrome", wherein they suddenly fly into an unexpected homicidal rage.
The strange thing is, most of the "blue-ribbons" were once perfectly
normal misfits, just like Gavin.
Steve isn't quite convinced, nor is token girlfriend Rachel (Katie
Holmes), whose role it is to look rebellious, but fall head over heels
for Steve anyway. However, to add further suspicions, Steve also has
encounters with the  overly slick school psychiatrist Dr. Caldicott
(Bruce Greenwood) and the delightfully mad janitor Newberry (William
Sadler).
Disturbing Behavior is at its best when analyzing the differences
between the various archetypical high school social groups, but at its
worst when it devolves into an oh-so-typical horror yarn.  A more
interesting movie would have played up the paranoia inherent between
school cliques, and possibly eliminated the homicidal angle altogether.
What if we weren't so sure from the first moments of the film that there
is a conspiracy at work here?  Well, we'll never know, as the film takes
the easy way out, by extinguishing intriguing ideas with a douse of
nonsensical horror blather.
Many of the "shocks" in the film aren't really shocking at all, when you
stop and think about them.  However, the film does have a suitably
creepy atmosphere going for it.  Even if there are no true thrills, it
feels as if one may be lurking around the corner.  Too bad it never
comes.
James Mardsen seems, well, too "blue-ribbon" to fill the role of the
outsider. Nick Stahl does a much better job, and should have been given
the lead here. Katie Holmes is spunky enough in a punk-goth way, despite
the fact she doesn't have much of a character.
Disturbing Behavior isn't as bad as it could have been, but it wastes
plenty of potential as well.  Creepy, but never scary (unless you count
some horrid dialogue snippets), the film just doesn't leave a lasting
impression.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for City of Angels (1998)
Angels are a hot pop-culture item right now.  So it was only a matter of
time before someone got around to making an adaptation of Wim Wenders'
film Wings of Desire, about an angel who falls in love with a mortal.
Although not a perfect film, City of Angels is perhaps the best
Hollywood could do with the story.
Seth (Nicholas Cage) is an angel.  He spends his days wandering the
earth, with his other angelic kin (including Cassiel, played by Andre
Braugher), observing humanity unseen, and helping to comfort mankind.
One of the duties of the angels is to accompany the recently deceased to
heaven.  Obviously, a popular haunt for the angels then are hospitals,
and it is there where Seth meets Maggie.
Maggie (Meg Ryan) is a heart surgeon, struggling with the concept of
mortality.  Even if she does everything right...sometimes she still
loses her patients.  She begins to lose hope...
But then Seth decides to make himself seen to Maggie.  He finds himself
falling in love with her, and must decide whether or not to make the
ultimate sacrifice:  give up being an angel for the brief passion of
being human.
Only loosely based on Wings of Desire, City of Angels has a stronger
emotional core, but can't hope to match the former film's superb visual
style.  Still, though, City of Angels does create some interesting
visuals, but some of them are unintentionally creepy. The legions of
black clad angels can't help but to recall the strangers of Dark City.
But perhaps the biggest difference between the film is the
schlock-factor. The film's new age attitudes range from cute to cuter.
Towards the end, the film struggles to grasp some important topics...but
the film has never attained the weight needed to deal with anything of
substance.
City of Angels also suffers from occasional bouts of misdirection (from
director Brad Silberling).  The most notable example occurs in its final
act, where a critical error treats the audience contemptibly. A crucial
twist is grossly mishandled and becomes ridiculous.  As a result the
emotional climax of the film is muted and loses its depth of meaning.
Still, the point of the movie is made, if a bit heavy-handedly.
Nicolas Cage plays most of the film with blinkless moist eyes, but is
given a chance to stretch near the end of the film.  Meg Ryan's role is
very familiar.  Her Maggie is a minor variation on her staple "romantic
comedy character", seen in everything from When Harry Met Sally to
Sleepless in Seattle.  But the film never quite explains a central
question:  Why does Maggie fall for Seth?  His initial appearances seem
rather eerie and disturbing...perhaps a little more development would
have been able to explain things.
The supporting cast does a good job here.  Andre Braugher does a good
job as Seth's angelic partner.  But the true scene stealer here is
Dennis Franz as Nathaniel Messenger, one of Maggie's patients who has
keen insights into how the world really works.
City of Angels is far from subtle, hitting you over the head with
everything from passion to pathos.  You may not respond as strongly as
the film intends you to, but it does have its moments.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Next Stop Wonderland (1998)
Next Stop Wonderland is a nice little independent gem hidden in the
post-Summer, pre-Fall film wasteland.  A quirky and enjoyable romantic
comedy, the film provides refreshing characterizations and plenty of
humor.
Erin Castleton (Hope Davis) is hopelessly single.  Her last boyfriend,
Sean (Philip Seymour Hoffman), a radical environmentalist, has just
ditched her...again.  Erin feels despondent that she never seems to meet
the right guy.
But wait...the perfect man for Erin seems to be always right around the
corner.  He's Alan Monteiro (Alan Gelfant), a part-time plumber with a
passion for marine biology.  But, although their paths keep crossing,
Alan and Erin never quite meet.
So, Erin's mother (Holland Taylor) brews up a scheme to get her daughter
safely married off.  She places an ad in the personals section for Erin
(without her knowledge).  Erin is left to cope with the 64 various
replies to her mother's slightly exaggerated ad.
In most romantic comedies, the leads meet cute, but don't get together
until the end.  Next Stop Wonderland takes the tack of Sleepless in
Seattle, or Til There Was You in which the leads don't even MEET until
the end. However, this actually works well... As usual, you know the
couple is a perfect match, but the film doesn't have to introduce
countless false obstacles to keep the characters from recognizing that
fact.
However, the film has to do something to pass the time before "the
meeting". Next Stop Wonderland handles the problem deftly...not only is
the personal ad situation amusing, but it underscores the wonderful
personalities involved all throughout the film.
Hope Davis dominates the film with her winning performance.  She even
overshadows her romantic costar, Alan Gelfant...mainly because she has
the film's most engaging subplot.  However, that's not to discount
Gelfant's performance, which is good, but simply outshone.
The conversations and characters throughout Next Stop Wonderland would
make it worth watching, even without the romance.  The romantic elements
of the film are simply icing on the cake.  Seek out this little gem.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Air Bud: Golden Receiver (1998)
In just a year since the original Air Bud hit the movie theaters, a
sequel has hurriedly been made.  This despite the fact that the titular
star of the original died shortly after the premiere.  But don't let the
hurried production fool you into thinking they may have had a great
story idea on their hands.  Air Bud: Golden Receiver is just as idealess
as the original.
Apparently, Air Bud's basketball-shooting trick isn't such a difficult
one after all.  In under a year since the original Air Bud, a
replacement dog has been found and trained to duplicate the original
Buddy's basketball shooting feat.  In addition, this new Buddy is also
able to catch a football...making him a two-trick puppy.
Air Bud's pal Josh (Kevin Zegers) is back, and manages to make the
basketball-to-football transition along with his pet pooch.  But Josh
also has some more family problems to deal with in this installment. His
mother (now played by Cynthia Stevenson) has begun to date for the first
time since the death of Josh's dad.  And even though she finds the
perfect man (a vet, no less), played by Gregory Harrison, Josh still
can't conceive of anyone replacing his father.
And Buddy is in more trouble this time around (though in a completely
ridiculous and completely unrelated subplot).  In the original Air Bud,
he was targeted by an evil clown.  For the sequel, the baddies are
Russian animal circus owner Natalya (Nora Dunn) and her inept sidekick
Popov (Perry Anzilotti).
People (and children) who for some reason enjoyed the first Air Bud will
find more of the same here.  The rest of us will only find more tedium,
more repetition, and more sheer annoyance.
The main problem with this film, as well as the original, is that it is
completely based upon a dog trick.  In this case, the dog trick isn't
all that unusual.  You don't see a basketball shooting dog every day,
but ball-catching ones are a dime a dozen.
At least the family subplot in this one holds a bit more substance, if
not any spontaneity.  But the entire circus-plot should have been axed.
Nora Dunn's atrocious Russian accent is nearly enough to make you run
screaming from the theater.  Add in chimpanzee, skunk and llama hijinks
and you're definitely brewing up trouble. (What the heck is a skunk
doing in an animal circus anyway?)
The only bright spot in the movie is the fact that the dog is cute,
which may certainly be enough for children.  However, there are plenty
of better kids films out there than this one
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Return to Paradise (1998)
Return to Paradise is a drama based entirely on a key ethical dilemma.
The dilemma itself is a potentially fascinating one, but the film
doesn't fully live up to its potential.
Sheriff, Tony and Lewis (Vince Vaughn, David Conrad and Joaquin Phoenix)
are casual acquaintances.  They met two years before while vacationing
in Malaysia.  Their days and nights were filled with rum, women and
hashish.  After their weeks in paradise, the three parted ways and lost
contact.
Flash forward to the present day, when lawyer Beth Eastern (Anne Heche)
arrives in New York to pay a visit on Sheriff and Tony.  It seems that
after the two of them left Malaysia, Lewis was apprehended with the
remaining 104 grams of hashish, just enough to be classified as a drug
dealer, and to be sentenced to death.
Beth is in New York to convince Sheriff and Tony to return with her to
Malaysia. If they do, each man will be sentenced to three years in the
Malaysian prison system. If they refuse, Lewis will be hanged in eight
days...
Return to Paradise poses an intriguing ethical dilemma.  Unfortunately,
the way the film poses it leaves little doubt as to what the eventual
resolution will be.  It simply becomes a matter of waiting for the
characters to come around to the film's point of view.
Another of the film's stumbling blocks is with the film's lead
character, Sheriff.  Though he's given a few minor introductory scenes
in Malaysia, we are introduced to his character primarily through the
moral dilemma. Vince Vaughn plays Sheriff with great ambivalence.  Since
we have no neutral ground with which to view his character, we never
know what he's really thinking.
David Conrad is mostly ignored as Tony, so we're given even less insight
into his character than Sheriff's.  Redeeming the cast, however, are
Anne Heche and Joaquin Phoenix.  Both give passionate, moving
performances that show the heights to which Return to Paradise might
have risen.
Still, there are some interesting ideas sprinkled around Return to
Paradise. One subplot, involving Jada Pinkett Smith as a journalist who
is investigating the story, ties in nicely with the overall theme of
responsibility vs. self-interest.  There is plenty of material
throughout to spark an after-the-movie "what would you do" conversation.
Return to Paradise isn't a bad film.  It's just one that doesn't live up
to its potential.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Palmetto (1998)
An attempt at Florida film noir, Palmetto fails at the most fundamental
levels. It's slow moving, uninvolving, and plain just uninteresting.
Harry Barber (Woody Harrelson) is an ex-newspaper man, just out of jail
after being framed for a crime.  His luck hasn't been the best, but
things are looking up when a mysterious woman, Rhea Malroux (Elisabeth
Shue), approaches him with a proposition.  She wants Harry to help her
and her stepdaughter, Odette (Chloe Sevigny), pull off a fake kidnapping
scheme to get $500,000 out of her stingy, but rich, husband Felix (Rolf
Hoppe).
At first, all Harry is expected to do is provide a threatening voice on
the phone, and to collect the money (of which he gets to keep 10%).
But, as the deed is carried out, things are not what they seem, and
Harry gets caught in the ensuing storm.
Palmetto pulls out all the stops to achieve a film noir film, but the
effect never quite comes together.  It's got the sultry Florida heat,
seductive women, and even curvier plot twists, but the whole thing
smells of paint-by-numbers. Sure, the right ingredients are there, but
the end result is much too artificial.
A lot of the problems lie with the script, which, though providing some
genuine surprises, is packed full of leaden dialogue and bland
situations. Even the plot twists don't seem to flow well with the rest
of the story. Some of them, for example, come from so far afield that
they seemingly only make sense because the writer needed a twist (for
example: Harry's spontaneous job offer, or the whole typewriter
situation).
The characters are mostly lifeless, played to type, but not much more.
Woody Harrelson plays Harry with such imbecilic thick-headedness that
it's hard to even picture him as an ex-journalist.  Elisabeth Shue vamps
it up, but doesn't add anything special to the role.  Chloe Sevigny
gives a terrible performance, trying to be a sexy 17-year old, but she
just leaves a bad taste in your mouth.  Some of the supporting cast
(notably Gina Gershon and Michael Rapaport) give stronger, but, in the
end, meaningless performances.
And to top it off, the pacing of the film is much too slow.  As the
movie grinds to a halt, you're given too much time to wonder why you're
wasting it watching Palmetto. If you're in the mood for this type of
movie, you'd be much better off going out and renting some classic film
noir.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Rushmore (1998)
No, this is not a film about the famous South Dakota presidential
monument. Rather, Rushmore is a unique comedy about two somewhat
obnoxious, but endearing, characters and their quest for happiness.
Max Fischer (Jason Schwartzman) is one of the most outgoing students at
Rushmore Academy.  He is involved in every club and group that the
school offers, and has single-handedly established many more.  However,
despite his astounding extra-curricular efforts, academically he is also
one  of the worst students in Rushmore's history.
Max's latest project involves a new first grade teacher at Rushmore
Academy, Miss Cross (Olivia Williams).  Max is instantly smitten with
her and, ignoring the age difference, sets out to woo her with all his
resources.
To help out, Max enlists the aid of both his young protg (Mason
Gamble) and a kindred spirit, the tycoon Herman Blume (Bill Murray).
Herman, despite having amassed a great fortune, is surrounded by
unhappiness.  He has an unloving relationship with his wife, and he
detests his two obnoxious sons (who happen to be classmate of Max).
Max's unbridled enthusiasm and determination makes Herman feel alive
again.  And the presence of Miss Cross stirs up other, long-dormant,
emotions within him...emotions which may run contrary to Max's plans.
It is rare for a film to create a character as unique and unexpected as
Max Fischer.  A lesser movie would have simply pegged Max as a
misunderstood genius or a goofball loser.  However, screenwriters Wes
Anderson and Owen Wilson never let us forget Max's central incompetence,
yet all the while endowing him with a degree of chutzpah rarely glimpsed
before.
Jason Schwartzman is a welcome new face, and tackles the role of Max
Fischer with gusto.  He's able to go toe to toe with any of the more
established actors in the film, and always comes away the winner.
In a more familiar role, Bill Murray is right at home as the unusual
millionaire.  He never devolves into all-out wackiness, but rather
delivers a much more focused performance than he has in years.
As the woman who comes between these two, Olivia Williams has a much
more passive role.  She simply doesn't have much to do, other than be
the object of desire.  However, it is a role which she plays well,
limited as it is.
With its unique characters and unusual plot, Rushmore is a truly
distinctive comedy. It never becomes the sort of film that will have you
convulsing with laughter, but it certainly will keep you smiling the
whole way through.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Mrs. Dalloway (1997)
Marleen Gorris directs this timid adaptation of Virginia Woolf's novel,
Mrs. Dalloway.  There's probably a point to be made, but the film lacks
the confidence to make it.
Vanessa Redgrave plays the title role of Mrs. Clarissa Dalloway, wife of
a successful politician.  The film takes place primarily in London after
WWI.  Mrs. Dalloway is planning a party, but her life is thrown in
disarray when she receives a visit from Peter Walsh (Michael Kitchen), a
man who once loved her.  She has come to think of herself purely in
terms of her husband, so such a return of individuality is a shock to
her.
There are several flashbacks to when they were young adults.  Clarissa
(here played by Natascha McElhone) is being wooed by both the wild Peter
(Alan Cox) and the stiff Richard Dalloway (Robert Portal).  Should she
choose security or danger?  Judging from the title, it's not that
surprising a decision.
Intercut with the action is a completely unrelated story of a
shellshocked WWI soldier.  Septimus Smith (Rupert Graves) has been
mentally troubled since the war.  His suicidal tendencies have baffled
his wife, Rezia (Amelia Bullmore), who reluctantly seeks help.
The connection between these two stories is tenuous at best.  The
strongest parallel I could draw was that Mrs. Dalloway had been
shellshocked in her own way, but coped with it differently. However, if
that was the intended message, it is awfully muffled here.
In fact, the film flirts with several ideas, but it is much too
tentative in its approach.  For example, there's a possible romantic
interest between Clarissa and her friend Sally (Lena Headey), but it is
unclear if this exists, or if there's much thought behind it at all.
As the film progresses, it slowly gains confidence.  By the time we
reach Mrs. Dalloway's party, everything finally clicks.  With a swirling
combination of Mrs. Dalloway's mental commentary and some dizzying
camerawork, the film sweeps us into a delightful stream-of-consciousness
narrative.
But, overall, the film has difficulty overcoming its rather dry tone. If
it proceeded with some early experimentation, some sort of energy might
have brought it to life.  But in the end, like its title character, the
film chose the safe and timid way out...at the cost of its identity.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Mercury Rising (1998)
Bruce Willis needs to stay away from straightforward action pictures.
Mercury Rising adds to a growing list (including such stinkers as The
Jackal, Last Man Standing, Striking Distance and The Last Boy Scout) of
stale actioners he has headlined. And though Mercury Rising tries to
spice things up by throwing an autistic kid in the mix, it is every bit
as stale.
Art Jeffries (Bruce Willis) is your typical tormented FBI agent.  You
know the type, haunted by his job, yet so good at what he does that even
physically assaulting another agent merely gets him a slap on the wrist.
Enter Simon (Miko Hughes), an autistic boy, who, like Rain Man and all
other autistic people, is a savant.  He can merely gaze at a
super-encrypted message, and, while little computer beeps go off in his
head, he can understand what it says.
Naturally, this talent has brought him to the attention of the federal
government.  Lt. Col. Nicholas Kudrow (Alec Baldwin), an NSA official
bubbling over with evil, has spent countless time and money implementing
the newest "unbreakable" code, Mercury.  However, when two of his
underlings (Robert Stanton and Bodhi Pine Elfman) publish a
Mercury-encrypted message in a puzzle magazine as a final test of its
effectiveness, Simon cracks the code.  Naturally, this infuriates
Kudrow, who sends a terminator-like hitman (L.L. Ginter) to eliminate
the security hazard.
And that's where Art Jeffries comes in.  For some reason that's never
explained in the film, the FBI is called in to help, and through a
series of intricate machinations, Art becomes the sole protector of the
young autistic boy.  In a few unrealistic sequences, he enlists the aid
of a stranger, Stacey (Kim Dickens), to help out, but she is given very
little to do overall.
The central concept behind Mercury Rising is ludicrous. Why bother
trying to kill the kid...I mean, who would know? It's not like the kid
(or anyone else for that matter) knew he was cracking a government
super-cypher.  And even if he is eliminated, what does that help?  He's
already proven that Mercury can be broken. There's always the chance
that someone else would crack it...but I guess without a kid in
jeopardy, there's not much of a movie here.
For all its faults, the film actually starts relatively well (once you
pass the painfully familiar teaser).  The film flirts with developing
real characters, and a semblance of a plot...then Mr. Terminator the
hitman appears and everything begins going downhill...quickly.
Miko Hughes does a decent job, for his age, at creating a touching
performance.  However, don't go to this film looking for any new
insights into autism (not that many people will).  Instead he merely
becomes the latest unique partner in a routine buddy-cop movie (think
Cop and a Half...with a twist!)
Willis and Baldwin are just overplaying to type. Rather than creating a
nuanced character, Baldwin simply oozes sliminess. And for Willis' part,
he simply recycles the stock role of the loner cop/FBI agent (which he
has honed in the Die Hard series).  As almost an afterthought, about
halfway through, the film carelessly gives him a character trait (an
addiction), and then drops it in the next scene.
But the biggest problem with Mercury Rising is the screenplay.  This
film wasn't well thought out at all.  The film goes to extraordinary
lengths to pad in as many convenient coincidences as possible. The
carbon paper scene alone is unworthy of the most gullible audience
member. At first the bad scenes just trickle in, but by the gruesomely
bad finale they're a veritable flood.
The film's few decent moments come in the form of bad jokes (mainly from
the geeks who developed the supercode).  But they're not nearly enough
to make the film worthwhile. Mercury Rising is a thriller that you're
more likely to groan at than cheer.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Civil Action, A (1998)
Not your typical legal drama, A Civil Action eschews  grandiose
cinematic gestures in favor of a slightly more grounded (and definitely
more cynical) interpretation of the legal process.   It provides an
always interesting, and sometimes fascinating, glimpse inside the
workings of our courts.
Jan Schlichtmann (John Travolta) is your typical personal-injury lawyer.
He begins the film by coldly describing the monetary value of various
types of clients.  Matter-of-factly, he explains the rules you must
follow to win lawsuits.  One of those rules is to never, ever, start
truly caring about your clients.  That is the rule Jan breaks one day,
and A Civil Action is a movie about the consequences.
In the small town of Woburn, Massachusetts, several children have died
from leukemia, all within a few short years.  The parents blame the
town's drinking water, which has been found to contain traces of the
toxic chemical TCE.  Who is the cause of this pollution?  All traces
point to two local companies...owned by much larger ones with very deep
pockets:  W.R. Grace & Co. and Beatrice Foods.
Though at first hesitant, Jan's small firm takes the case out of hopes
of a quick, rich settlement.  However, when Jan becomes emotionally
involved, he dares to do something he never should:  take the case to
trial.  There, he bets his entire firm in his quest to find the truth
and to get justice...but is it a gamble he can win?
The best parts of A Civil Action are the nuggets of lawyerly truths
spouted by both Jan, and Jerome Facher (Robert Duvall), an eccentric
elder defense attorney who knows all the rules of the game.  Depending
on your viewpoint, these details may seem either cynical or realistic...
but they certainly are thought-provoking.
At first, the film looks like it might boil down into your typical
Grisham-esque legal potboiler.  However, the film is a bit more complex
than that.  Based on an actual case, A Civil Action tries to be more
realistic with its depiction of the legal system.  But, that leads to
the question:  does the film sacrifice entertainment for the sake of
accuracy?
When looking at the film from the fact that there are no grand cinematic
gestures (such as secret witnesses or courtroom brawls), you might
conclude that the answer is "yes".  But, A Civil Action finds its
entertainment in the details of how the legal process actually works,
and in the coterie of fine performances that fill the film.
Regarding those performances, the standouts are the always good Duvall,
and William H. Macy (as the accountant at Jan's firm who tries in vain
to keep the rising costs from becoming overwhelming).  Duvall gets the
plum role, though.  He's a defense lawyer, so you might think at first
that he's one of the bad guys...but the film never sinks to that level
of simplicity.  Instead, he is a fully fleshed out character, and
perhaps the only one in the film who knows where everything is heading.
A Civil Action has its faults.  At times the film's pacing begins to
drag, and the film's one caricature (a buffoonish defense lawyer) sticks
out like a sore thumb amid the more realistic proceedings.  But those
only minimally detract from the film.  The insightfulness of A Civil
Action combined with the strong performances therein make this one worth
your time.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Halloween H20: Twenty Years Later (1998)
Michael Myers is back (yawn), and, oooh, aren't we scared. This seventh
entry into the Halloween series has eschewed its traditional numeral in
favor of the more cryptic H20 (it's been 20 years since the original
Halloween...get it?)  However, don't let the moniker change fool you,
Halloween H20 is every bit as moldy and dull as the seventh film in a
series is likely to be.
For those unfamiliar with the series, Michael Myers is the bogeyman
personified.  As a child, he killed his older sister with a big knife on
Halloween.  Fifteen years later, he escaped from his mental institution,
donned a bleached out William Shatner mask and resumed his mass
murdering streak.  His target of choice was babysitter Laurie Strode
(Jamie Lee Curtis), who had unknown ties to Michael.
Twenty years after that rampage (and a little additional mayhem from
Halloween 2), Laurie Strode has gone into hiding.  She is now known as
Keri Tate, a teacher at a private school in Northern California. She has
tried to put her trauma behind her, even raising a son, John (Josh
Hartnett), and striking up a relationship with fellow teacher Will
Brennan (Adam Arkin).  But every year on October 31st, she gets chills.
Little does she suspect that Michael is still hunting her after all
these years.  Where has Michael been, and what has he been doing over
all this time?  Who knows?  The film blatantly forgets the events of the
past four sequels, but never accounts for Michael's doings over that
time.  The film just doesn't bother with trivialities like that.  Simply
take discomfort from the knowledge that he's back in the saddle again,
twenty years later.
The film makes a big hoopla over the return of Jamie Lee Curtis, but it
still provides several teen victims.  Along with John, there's his
girlfriend Molly (Michelle Williams), his best friend Charlie (Adam
Hann-Byrd), and Charlie's main squeeze Sarah (Jodi Lyn O'Keefe).  Good
luck in finding anything out about these characters.  The most complex
of them has a character description of "generic teen victim".  It's even
a chore to discover their names (which were probably tacked on as a mere
afterthought).
Halloween H20 suffers from an overly prolonged setup.  Aside from a
brief pre-credits teaser, nothing at all happens for the first hour of
the film.  With an 85-minute running time, that's saying quite a lot.
As a placeholder, the film packs in the false alarms.  They occur with
such frequency that they quickly lose their shock value.  Maybe the
first five are even slightly heart-quickening but when the number
reaches ten, and twenty, and beyond, you're more likely to be checking
your watch.
And throughout all this, very little is actually accomplished. The setup
is simple:  an isolated group of people are stalked by a killer.
Countless of other horror films (even countless other Halloween sequels)
have used the same premise, but established it with much more
efficiency. When the final conflict occurs, it's a mere flash in the
pan, bright, quick and substanceless.
The entire experience of Halloween H20 leaves you feeling cheated.
However, anyone going into the seventh entry of a horror series
shouldn't expect much.  Don't be deceived.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Dirty Work (1998)
Like so many other former Saturday Night Live-ers before him, Norm
Macdonald attempts to make the jump to feature films...and falls flat on
his face. Dirty Work is an embarrassingly bland comic failure.
Macdonald stars as Mitch Weaver, a pathetic loser who can't hold a
steady job or even a girlfriend.  He has only one good friend, Sam
(Artie Lange), whose father (Jack Warden) is in desperate need of a
$50,000 heart transplant... money that neither Sam nor Mitch have.
All looks bleak until Mitch discovers a way to make money from his one
true talent:  creating elaborate revenge schemes.  He and Sam start up
Dirty Work, a revenge-for-hire business.  They help people to get
even...from little old ladies to billionaire Travis Cole (Christopher
McDonald). But will they be able to make enough money in time?  And will
anyone stay in the theater long enough to find out?
The film boasts a wide variety of cameos.  Chevy Chase, Don Rickles,
Chris Farley, Adam Sandler, John Goodman, and even Gary Coleman all
appear at one time or another. But aside from simple shock value, they
have very little to add.
Norm Macdonald doesn't have much of a repertoire here.  His one smug
tone might make him a good straight man...but it doesn't work well when
he's supposed to be the comic center of the film.  The film simply hops
from one oddly bland revenge gag to another with little humor in
between.
There are slight glimmers here and there of moments of humor trying to
break free in the film's darker moments.  When Dirty Work unknowingly
pulls a revenge prank on a bunch of murderous drug lords, for example,
the movie skates eerily close to humor.  Alas, what could have been a
quirky dark comedy quickly collapses back into the dull, stale routine.
There may be a good film lurking in the heart of Norm Macdonald...but
Dirty Work shows that it's buried deep.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Twilight (1998)
Robert Benton has assembled a stellar, mature cast for his latest
feature, Twilight, a film noir mystery set amid the fading stars of
Hollywood.
Paul Newman stars as retired detective Harry Ross.  Harry has spent the
last couple of years doing odd jobs for Jack and Catherine Ames (Gene
Hackman and Susan Sarandon), a pair of married actors who have fallen
from the limelight.
When Jack sends him on a routine delivery job, however, the old
instincts kick in.  Soon, Harry is wading through a mystery where
friendships and lives are on the line, and he no longer knows who to
trust.
There are plenty of familiar faces throughout Twilight, in addition to
Newman, Hackman and Sarandon.  James Garner plays Raymond Hope, a former
cop and one of Harry's best friends.  Stockard Channing plays Verna,
Harry's former partner, and possibly a former love interest.  Reese
Witherspoon is Mel, the distrustful daughter of the Ames', and Liev
Schrieber is her scuzzy boyfriend.  Giancarlo Esposito appears as
Harry's bumbling detective protigi, and John Spencer is a suspicious
police captain.
With a cast like that, it's almost worth watching Twilight just to
stargaze. Luckily, there's more to the film than some sort of actor's
recognition ceremony. Twilight has a solid film noir-ish plot.  It may
not have as many twists and turns as some of the classics, but it has
much more than a lot of what passes for film these days.
The major cast members all deliver strong performances, as can be
expected of their caliber.  However, none of them have that little extra
oomph which would make them memorable.  The supporting cast is
enjoyable, if a little underdrawn.  Stockard Channing's character, in
particular, is a cipher.  There's more to her character than the film
takes the time to describe. It's a minor, but irritating, flaw.
With a solid cast, and a good plot, there's a lot to recommend about
Twilight. It's biggest flaw is actually its short running time.  At a
slim 94 minutes, there's a lot of stuff that's packed into an awfully
small package.  Still, the chance to see Newman, Sarandon and Hackman
working together is worth a cramp or two.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Jack Frost (1998)
It's hard to imagine the idea even looked good on paper.  Mixing a live
action Frosty-the-snowman adventure with a tragic father and son bonding
story, Jack Frost is even more unappealing on screen.
Michael Keaton plays a blues musician by the unlikely name of Jack
Frost.  Jack selfishly places his career ahead of his wife, Gabby (Kelly
Preston), and child, Charlie (Joseph Cross).  But before this neglectful
father has a chance to repent, he dies in a tragic Christmas Eve car
crash.
One year later, young Charlie still hasn't recovered from the loss of
his dad.  His fervent Christmas wish is to spend one more Christmas with
his father.  And, strangely enough, Charlie's wish is granted.
But Jack doesn't return to earth in the same form in which he left it.
Instead, due to some cosmic comic streak, he returns as a walking,
talking, magical snowman.  But, any second chance is better than none,
right?
The living snowman effects are handled with a mixture of puppets and
computer animation.  The result is much less than satisfactory.  Too
often, the snowman appears to be made of felt and styrofoam rather than
snow.  But even when the snowman is semi-realistic the result is an
unintentionally creepy character, much more disturbing than lovable.
Michael Keaton, whose role is mainly devoted to voice-over work,  at
least tries to give the snowman as much life as possible. But, even
Keaton can't give life to Jack Frost's frozen dialogue.
The plot somehow manages to include just about every snow-and-ice bound
activity imaginable (excepting the luge).  There are more snowball
fights, snow forts, snow skiing, hockey games, ice skating,
snowboarding, etc., than you'd likely see at the Winter Olympics.  The
trouble is, very little of these activities add anything of import to
the plot.
One thing the film never quite gets around to explaining is why Jack is
forced to return as a snowman.  Is it some sort of karmic punishment for
being a poor father?  A cruel twist of nature? A bad joke?  It was
probably just a lazy screenwriter.
It's difficult to comprehend the intended target audience for Jack
Frost.  Those old enough not to be terrified by its title creature are
likely already too sophisticated for a movie of this caliber.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Playing by Heart (1998)
Playing by Heart is a film that would like to think of itself as an
intricate puzzle, whose pieces smoothly slide into place as the film
progresses. However, as a puzzle, Playing By Heart is fairly simple.
Luckily, observing the artwork of the individual pieces is more than
enough reward.
Playing by Heart interweaves six distinct storylines.  At first, there
seems to be no connection between them, except for involving people,
love, and relationships.  Yet, as the film progresses, it is obvious
that all six storylines are going to intertwine by the end.  The matter
of how becomes relatively obvious well before the final act.
Hugh (Dennis Quaid) has a penchant for wandering forlornly into bars and
unraveling his depressing life story to a complete stranger. Gracie
(Madeleine Stowe) and Roger (Anthony Edwards) have a fulfilling sex
life.  Too bad they're both married to other people. Paul (Sean Connery)
and Hannah (Gena Rowlands) are a long-married couple facing a
troublesome future, and an even more troublesome past. Joan (Angelina
Jolie) is on the relationship rebound, and is determined to win the
affections of Keenan (Ryan Phillippe), a self-obsessed boy who doesn't
date. Mark (Jay Mohr) is dying of AIDS, and has only his mother Mildred
(Ellen Burstyn) for comfort.  And finally, Meredith (Gillian Anderson)
has been burned before, and wants nothing more to do with men.  However,
that doesn't stop the friendly Trent (Jon Stewart) from trying.
Even with six plotlines in the air, Playing By Heart never lets one
drop.  Whenever one plotline starts to sag, another deftly steps in to
take its place.  And yet, even with all the switching and swapping, the
film is never confusing.  And, somehow, Playing By Heart avoids the
pitfall of other films with ensemble storylines:  making a few of the
plots much more interesting than the others. Even the film's weakest
plot (the languid affair between Madeleine Stowe and Anthony Edwards)
never gets completely boring.
The movie is not as skillful, however, when trying to be spontaneous.
Every move of Playing By Heart seems carefully calculated, and when it
tries to surprise the audience, the effort just falls flat.  Nowhere is
this more true than at the film's finale, when everything just happens
to neatly fall together.
The pair with the best chemistry in the film is easily Connery and
Rowlands.  They settle so deeply in their roles, that it truly seems
they've been together for a long time. Anjelina Jolie and Ryan Phillippe
are a close second, and certainly have the plotline with the most
energy.  Throughout the whole film, there's nary a poor performance to
be seen.
Though at times it borders on being contrived, on the whole, Playing By
Heart is a  touching rumination on the various flavors of love.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Can't Hardly Wait (1998)
Remember the glut of mid-80s teen angst films?  Well, apparently every
generation needs its own, and Can't Hardly Wait has picked up the
gauntlet. Unfortunately, beyond broad stereotypes and patently obvious
social observations, Can't Hardly Wait has very little to offer.
It's the night after graduation, and the entire senior class of
Huntington High has gathered together for one final party.  Although all
the usual archetypes are present, the film focuses primarily on six
teens: the most popular guy and girl in school, Mike Dexter (Peter
Facinelli) and Amanda Beckett (Jennifer Love Hewitt), who have recently
broken up.  Ordinary Preston Meyers (Ethan Embry), who spends his time
pining for the beautiful Amanda.  Uber-nerd William Lichter (Charlie
Korsmo), who spends his time pining for revenge against bully Mike.
Antisocial Denise Fleming (Lauren Ambrose), dragged to the party by her
friend Preston.  And then there's Kenny Fisher (Seth Green), a white kid
who wants to be black, and who's come to the party to score.
The film's setup is tedious at best, and much too lengthy.  I mean, the
characters are all merely caricatures, and the prolonged introduction
only serves to point out their shallowness.
The closest the film comes to an interesting character is Preston
Meyers, whose appeal is due more to the talents of Ethan Embry than
strong writing.  As a character, he is completely defined by his
attraction to Amanda. But Embry's engaging mannerisms make the character
more endearing than he was written.
As the object of his affection, Jennifer Love Hewitt takes a flat role
and leaves it lifeless.  Korsmo and Facinelli play their stereotypes to
the hilt, but without any interesting touches.  Lauren Ambrose wanders
through the film looking for a personality, and Seth Green, looking like
Bulworth Jr., is never quite as funny as he tries to be.  He's actually
better in his quieter moments.  The few sparks from the supporting cast
are actually delivered in cameos (by Jenna Elfman and Jerry O'Connell).
The humor in the film is scarce, though it does get slightly better as
the film rolls along.  The script (by directors Deborah Kaplan and Harry
Elfont) offers few surprises (beyond the fact that they can still build
an entire film out of these hoary old clichs).
Teens might get a kick out of the film's obvious humor, but this entry
is far from being a credit to the genre.  Recently, Clueless and even
the Scream series have had more insight into teen culture.  Don't
believe the title...you can wait for this one...a long, long time.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
Armageddon, the second of this year's death-from-above thrillers (the
first being Deep Impact), has entered our atmosphere.  And though it
hardly fizzles out in the atmosphere, it is far from being a global
killer.
Just to give you an example of the differing paces of Deep Impact and
Armageddon, the former film detected the incoming comet with a roomy two
years to spare...in Armageddon, the asteroid is detected with only 18
days to impact.  To counter the threat, NASA creates a plan, gathers a
crew, trains the crew, readies not one, but two Space Shuttles for the
mission, and launches them all within that narrow window.  You can tell
realism is not the object here.
NASA head honcho Dan Truman (Billy Bob Thorton) realizes he needs a
drilling team to plant a mega-nuke inside the asteroid's belly.  For
some reason, even though the  asteroid is "as big as Texas", they only
need to drill 800 feet to get to the very center. But in any case, they
need a master driller to head the operation.  Enter Harry S. Stamper
(Bruce Willis) and his team of overly colorful roughnecks.
Of course, where would the dramatic tension be without a pointless
romantic subplot.  This is provided by Harry's daughter, Grace (Liv
Tyler), who's in love with Harry's right-hand-man A.J. (Ben Affleck).
Now, I have yet to become a fan of Liv Tyler, and have yet found no
proof that she can actually act.  This film gives no exception.
The one thing the film does have going for it is its special effects.
The destructive shots as mini-showers pelt major cities are spectacular.
Comparatively, the space scenes are nothing special, and even border on
bland. The filmmakers seem to recognize this however, and periodically
throughout the film they treat us to an intermission of another city
being leveled.  (Though, you begin to wonder why the asteroids only
target urban areas.)
Director Michael Bay has been previously criticized for his
music-videoesque directing style of constant motion and quick cuts.
However, while not an appropriate style for all films, it certainly fits
the action thriller.  However, in Armageddon, the effects are a little
more disorienting than in, say, The Rock.  Particularly once you reach
the asteroid where everything is gray and spiky, and everyone is wearing
identical spacesuits.  It simply gets difficult to identify the
characters in the quick shots (a frustrating thing when death is
involved).
The action sequences are exciting at times, though the film is hampered
when it attempts to find a human villain.  The military subplot that's
thrown in is just plain ludicrous.  The action sequences never quite
leave you completely satisfied, but you're never bored either.
The acting in the film is par for the course.   Most of the characters
are one-dimensional quip machines...but they're funny one-dimensional
quip machines. Billy Bob Thornton strives for, but never quite reaches
the level of Ed Harris' similar role in Apollo 13. Bruce Willis handles
himself capably, yet again, as an action lead, though this is far from
his best character-driven work.
The wafer thin plot of Armageddon can't hold up to any scrutiny
whatsoever. Deep Impact may have been shallow at times, but at least it
covered more of the bases.
Still, with its pleasing eye candy and the occasional moment of humor,
Armageddon is not a total disaster.  But then again, it doesn't rank up
with the best of escapist fare either.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Dance with Me (1998)
In Dance With Me, you get just what you expect.  A dance film, with a
little romance thrown in to spice things up, and not much more.
However, the sizzling dances make up for what the plot lacks in
imagination.
After the death of his mother, Rafael Infante (Chayanne) decides to
journey from Cuba to Texas.  An old friend of his mother, John Burnette
(Kris Kristofferson), owns a dance studio there, and is willing to give
him a job and a place to stay.
Working as a handyman at the studio, Rafael meets Ruby (Vanessa L.
Williams), an instructor and professional dancer (specializing in the
Latin dances). She's split from her former partner/boyfriend Julian
(Rick Valenzuela), and is now struggling to climb back to the top.
As the deadline to the National Finals looms closer, hints of romance
begin to bloom between Rafael and Ruby.  But she's got no time or use
for love, and Rafael struggles to prove differently...
As a dance film, Dance With Me falls into a predictable pattern visited
before in such films as Strictly Ballroom, and Shall We Dance?. There
are few surprises here.
But, there is dancing.  And most of it is quite good.  Vanessa Williams
gets a chance to show her moves, and she's got plenty.  Chayanne is no
slouch here, but it is clear that Williams is the star.
The emerging romance between Rafael and Ruby isn't handled poorly, but
it's far from the high point in the film.  Part of the problem is that
the interaction of the couple can't quite compete with the passion of
the dancing...so the romance gets left in the cold.
The subplots in Dance With Me vary in quality.  Rafael's search for his
father is a little predictable, and mostly diverting from the rest of
the film.  However, the antics of the studio's various dance students
(including an unlikely Joan Plowright) are slightly amusing.
On the whole, Dance With Me is enjoyable simply for its dancing scenes.
The surrounding clutter neither enhances nor detracts from the simple
pleasures of the movie.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Niagara, Niagara (1997)
Niagara Niagara is a road movie that shouldn't be one.  Telling the
story of two loners tossed together by fate, the film survives only on
the basis of one strong performance.
Seth (Henry Thomas) and Marcy (Robin Tunney) are shy outcasts.  They
come from different worlds (Seth is poor, Marcy rich), but neither has
felt love.  The two loners literally run into each other while
shoplifting at the same store, and immediately hit it off.  Before they
know it, the couple begin a road trip to Canada in search of an elusive
black Bobbi head.
Marcy isn't like other girls, however.  She has Tourette's Syndrome. At
first she tries to restrain her tics and unintentional vocal outbursts,
and Seth is too timid to ask her about it.  But eventually, she informs
him about her condition.  It turns out there is a prescription drug
which could help her, but she left her prescription at home.  Rather
than simply contacting her doctor, or getting a new prescription, she
and Seth decide to try every pharmacy the run across during their road
trip.  Surely some nice pharmacist will give her the drugs, no questions
asked.
Robin Tunney delivers a good performance, even if the premise is a bit
forced. She delivers the various tics and idiosyncrasies with natural
ease, making them seem to emerge from the character, rather than the
actor.
Yet, the movie seems trapped by its own conventions.  What might have
been a touching love story is shackled by being forced to conform to its
preconceived "road movie" standards.  The movie is pointlessly filled
with bizarre characters, such as the psycho druggist, or Walter (Michael
Parks), the chicken-obsessed tow-truck driver.  None of these characters
seemto flow with the story.  Rather, they are artificial constructions
which are meant for amusement, but only serve to disappoint.
At any time when the relationship between Seth and Marcy seems to get
interesting, all of a sudden the movie's MacGuffin raises its ugly head
(or Bobbi head as the case may be).  The goal of the pair's quest is
only interesting to the audience to the extent that it motivates the
action and reveals the characters.  In Niagara Niagara, the trip is more
about the trip than Seth and Marcy.
Overall, the only reason to see this film is the performance by  Robin
Tunney.  It definitely fails as a road movie, a crime spree, or even as
much of a romance.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Out of Sight (1998)
Elmore Leonard has quickly become one of Hollywood's favorite authors.
Out of four film adaptations in as many years, the witty and inventive
Out of Sight gives Get Shorty a run for its money as the best Leonard
adaptation around.
George Clooney stars as Jack Foley, a nice bank robber...you know the
type, he uses his charm and his wits rather than a gun.  But even
charming guys end up unlucky, and Jack ends up in jail.  But not for
long.  He plots an escape with the help of his best friend, and fellow
robber, Buddy Bragg (Ving Rhames), and their slow-witted pothead
associate, Glenn Michaels (Steve Zahn).
But Jack didn't count on U.S. Marshal Karen Sisco (Jennifer Lopez).
Appearing at the right place at the wrong time, Karen gets involved in
Foley's escape attempt and the subsequent manhunt to bring him in.
However, Karen develops a rapport with Jack Foley, and finds that she
begrudgingly likes the guy. But, can love prosper on opposite sides of
the law?  Or can Karen straighten out Jack before he goes too far in
pursuit of just one last crime.
Clooney, who has had a string of solid, but never stellar, film roles,
delivers his best performance to date.  He blends into his role here
perfectly as the risk taking Jack Foley, who's willing to gamble
everything on the chance that Karen Sisco might be his true love.
Jennifer Lopez does an excellent job as well.  She actually has a
trickier role than Clooney, as a woman who has to balance her emotions
with her sense of duty.  She and Clooney develop good chemistry
together.
The film boasts a superb ensemble.  Steve Zahn gives a hilarious
performance, and steals nearly every scene he's in.  Don Cheadle is
appropriately sinister as a violent ex-con who may or may not be teaming
up with Foley.  Albert Brooks is enjoyable as a white collar criminal
who talks too much for his own good.  Out of the cast, only Dennis
Farina seems underused as Karen's ex-lawman father.
Steven Soderbergh gives the film sharp and stylistic direction.  With an
affectation for freeze frames, he delivers a unique take on the film's
action and love scenes that places Out of Sight a notch above routine
crime films.
A recurring series of flashbacks makes the film seem more complex than
it actually is.  Devoid of its bells and whistles, Out of Sight is
actually a fairly straightforward crime story.  However, there are only
a few spots in the film that seem bare, and they pass quickly.
With smart dialogue, good characters, and an excellent cast, Out of
Sight easily smoothes over the rough spots in the plot and delivers on
both the action and romantic fronts.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Wing Commander (1999)
Just ask anyone who's seen Super Mario Brothers, the Movie, making
worthy film adaptations of computer games is a difficult business.  Most
computer games are light on plot and characterization to provide maximum
interactivity.  Film adaptations strip away that interactivity, and
leave very little in its place. Such is the case with Wing Commander, a
Star Wars wannabe that makes even Super Mario start to look good...
The plot of the Wing Commander movie tackles the Kilrathi war, which was
the subject of the first three Wing Commander computer games. The
Kilrathi are an evil alien race, bent to conquer the galaxy.  In the
games, they were furry and tigerlike...here they're more like shell-free
turtles, but it doesn't really matter.  They're never given more
definition than "the enemy", so they could be microscopic guinea pigs,
for all it matters.
The Kilrathi have stolen a key piece of Terran technology which is,
essentially, a map to Earth.  The foolish Earthlings have pooled their
entire starfleet in the farthest corner of the galaxy, and their fleet
will arrive to defend earth a mere two hours too late. There's only one
hope for the future of Earth:  a lone carrier, the T.C.S. Tiger's Claw,
can attempt to delay the entire Kilrathi battle fleet at a key
navigational jump point, or die trying.
The Tiger's Claw's orders are relayed by two rookie pilots, Blair
(Freddie Prinze Jr.) and Maniac (Matthew Lillard), and one mysterious
pilot (Tcheky Karyo).  Blair has a peculiar cross to bear (literally).
His mother was a "pilgrim", an advanced race of human beings who
eschewed humanity to take to the stars.  Normal humans, including most
of the crew of the Tiger's Claw, don't really care for his presence.
However, that doesn't stop him from striking up a relationship with his
wing commander, "Angel" Devereaux (Saffron Burrows).
Those familiar with the computer game series will know that it has
always been highly cinematic in its presentation.  It's no surprise,
then, that it was chosen for a movie adaptation.  What is surprising,
however, is how horrible this adaptation has turned out.
Rather than present a rousing space-bound action adventure, the
filmmakers instead chose to present Wing Commander as a WWII war film.
An entire sequence is even cribbed from Das Boot as the Tiger's Claw
plays submarine, beached in an asteroid crater while a Kilrathi
"destroyer" pings up above.  They've even enlisted Jurgen Prochnow to
play the worried commander of the ship.  The film would have been better
off without obviously drawing the comparison to a much better piece of
cinema.
Despite several attempts, Wing Commander is never able to create a sense
of tension or even consequence in any of its battle sequences.  Even the
computer game's battles seemed of more import than these glossy FX
compilations. Virtually every battle is extremely lopsided, with the
heroes slaughtering every Kilrathi ship in sight, while suffering nearly
no casualties themselves.  When they do, the tragedy is horridly
overplayed.
Freddie Prinze Jr. is a mostly featureless and dull hero, making you
long for the fine thespian stylings of Mark Hamill (who played the role
in the computer games). He's certainly not helped by the film's inane
script, which constantly feeds him pointless dialogue.  But even in his
silent moments, his wooden acting is composed primarily of a slack face
and mooning eyes.  At least co-star Matthew Lillard attempts to add some
energy to his role, even if he is playing the same "wild-and-crazy" bit
that he's done in all his prior films.
The special effects of Wing Commander aren't.  The opening shows
promise, but quickly the monotonous space battles prove to be a dark and
murky jumble of flashing lights and bland shadows.  But the outer space
special effects positively shine when compared with the puppetry of the
Kilrathi, who look like rejects from Dr. Who.
There was a brief time when Wing Commander was nearly destined to go
direct-to-video. That may have been a more fitting place, though I would
recommend avoiding this cosmic accident even in the video bargain bins.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Deep Rising (1998)
The formula is simple.  Trap a varied group of people on an isolated
location, then pop in a seemingly unstoppable monster to kill them one
by one.  These have been the successful ingredients for many good films
(The Thing, Alien, Aliens, and Tremors to name a few).  So, why is it
that so many films following this recipe end up pathetically bad?  (See
The Relic for a particularly putrid example.)  Perhaps it is simply too
easy to forget the necessary binding ingredient: effort and ideas.  Deep
Rising meets these two requirements part way, but not enough to salvage
the film.
Treat Williams is Finnegan, the leader of a small boat crew who hire out
their services (and their boat) for any activity...no questions asked.
This time, however, they may have gone too far.  Their passengers, led
by the ominous Wes Studi, are the type of multi-national terrorist
squads usually only seen in Die Hard films.  And their cargo...let's
just say it has very high explosive potential.
What is the target of these thieves?  Why, the Argonauticus, of course,
a high tech luxury cruise yacht on its maiden voyage. But something else
is hunting the Argonauticus...something ancient and deadly.  By the time
the thieves arrive, nearly everyone on board the  ship has been killed.
And now the creature senses fresh meat!
So, you have the thieves and their mercenary boat crew, joining forces
with the surviving passengers (including the ship owner Canton (Anthony
Heald), and a thief with less lofty goals, Trillian (Famke Janssen))
against the terror from the deep.  And the monster gets to pick them off
one by one.
Fortunately for the creature, this particular band of criminals happens
to be the dumbest the world can offer.  Why else would they indulge in
petty squabbling while they watch their friends become fish food.  If
there's a more clarion call for unity, I don't know what it might be.
It's pretty easy to guess who will get killed off when.  There are no
surprises in that the most interesting characters seem to last until the
end.  For the most part, the watery tentacles seem to be acting on the
audience's impulses to get rid of the most boring characters first.
(Although I wonder if the filmmakers might have extended Djimon
Hounsou's life a bit if they knew this would be released so soon after
his acclaim for Amistad.)
Treat Williams is a passable hero, and Famke Janssen does her best Julia
Roberts impersonation.  But while Wes Studi and Anthony Heald are
particularly slimy, very little of the rest of the company stand out in
any way.
The biggest treat in the film, however, has to be Pantucci, Kevin J.
O'Connor's whining engine-boy, under Finnegan's employ.  His constant
quips may be a bit over-written, but they manage to capture the same
vein of nerve-addled humor that Bill Paxton delivered as Hudson in
Aliens (or Todd Graff as Hippie in The Abyss, for that matter).  It's
just a stock part (the comic-relief character), but it almost makes this
tired Alien clone bearable.
As far as the monster goes, although the CGI is done well, the creature
has no logical consistency.  Think back to the great (or even just good)
movie monsters. They all had a set of "rules" about what they could do,
and how and why they would do it. Part of the joy of those films was
slowly discovering, along with the heroes, just what those rules are.
The tentacle monster in Deep Rising doesn't have a set of rules... or if
it does, not a very good one.  It merely eats (or drinks, as the case
may be), and there is no rhyme or reason for what it does in order to do
so.  The film never explains why the Argonauticus is attacked in the
first place.  It simply happens.
The action scenes are decent, but few are noteworthy.  The film
definitely does suffer from its proximity to Titanic.  Deep Rising's
peril in the water scenes pale next to Cameron's (but can you really
blame them).  Unfortunately, Deep Rising's efforts are more on par with
Speed 2.
On the plus side, however, the film's closing image shows some promise
for a potentially interesting (but unlikely) sequel.  Perhaps you'd be
better off waiting for that one.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Vampires (1998)
Hot on the heels of Blade, we are treated to another vampire-slayer
tale, this time from director John Carpenter.  While not one of his best
directoral efforts, there are enough scares in John Carpenter's Vampires
to please the casual moviegoer.
The hero of John Carpenter's Vampires is Jack Crow (James Woods), a
"slayer", raised by the Catholic church, who leads a team of mercenaries
to find and destroy vampiric infestations throughout the world.  His
current stomping grounds are in New Mexico, which also happens to be the
current home of one Valek (Thomas Ian Griffith), a master vampire who
may be the very first one.
The only link Crow, and his chief sidekick Montoya (Daniel Baldwin),
have to find Valek is a prostitute named Katrina (Sheryl Lee). Katrina
was bitten by Valek, and has a telepathic link to her new master.  The
trouble is, in just a few days, Katrina will become a vampire herself.
So, Crow and Montoya, teaming with a novice Vatican scholar, Father
Giovanni (Gregory Sierra), have little time to track down their most
powerful foe ever.  Meanwhile, Valek has plans of his own, both for Jack
Crow, and his own personal quest for invulnerability.
Unlike in Blade, where vampires were easier to kill than ants with a
magnifying glass...the pests in John Carpenter's Vampires are stubborn
little suckers.  There's probably one too many scenes of a human
repeatedly pounding a stake into a vampire's chest, shouting "Die! Die!
Die!", but at least there's a sense of accomplishment.
Carpenter is able to whip up a few good scares and a couple suspenseful
sequences (most of which involve entering sleeping vampire nests).  But,
most of the time, there's a sense of overkill.  By the time the film's
implausible climax rolls around, you've definitely had your fill of
flashing teeth, wooden stakes, and vampires bursting into flames.
The characters in John Carpenter's Vampires are predictably shallow.
Still, James Woods is cast as the right type as the tough talking, tough
acting hero.  Daniel Baldwin isn't as lucky, stuck as the stupidly
foolish sidekick.  At least Sheryl Lee gets to show a little range,
displaying the gamut of emotions from ecstasy to rage to terror and back
again.
The plot of the film holds little mystery.  (If you can't figure out all
the crucial plot questions by the end of the first reel, you haven't
seen many movies.)  Still, it gets you from site A to site B with a
minimum of fuss.  And, since the strength of this movie is in its
"hunting" scenes, the less between them, the better.
For sheer entertainment, Blade still holds a considerable edge over John
Carpenter's Vampires.  However, if you're just looking for a few good
thrills, this one is certainly better than many recent horror films out
there.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Antz (1998)
In what seems to be the most unusual film trend of late, two studios are
offering competing computer-animated-bug films.  The first one out of
the gate is Antz, the first animated film from Dreamworks SKG.  Although
not up to the high standards of Toy Story, it poses a strong challenge
to this Thanksgiving's A Bug's Life.
Antz follows the life of a single ant, Z (Woody Allen), who is
dissatisfied with colony life.  As with many animated heroes, he yearns
for something different...he wants to be an individual, instead of part
of the collective.
He spots his chance when he meets the beautiful Princess Bala (Sharon
Stone), who is "slumming it" with the worker ants to get a taste of life
before her impending marriage to the ruthless General Mandible (Gene
Hackman). Although their meeting is brief, Z believes they've formed a
connection, and now has a goal for his dreams.
He enlists the aid of his soldier friend Weaver (Sylvester Stallone) in
an effort to meet her again.  However, when things don't go as planned,
Z finds himself the target of Mandible's wrath.
This is only the second fully computer-animated film, but somehow the
sense of awe and wonder that was present in Toy Story is missing.  The
water animation here is very realistic, but overall the animation fails
to be impressive.
None of the characters are particularly charming by themselves. It's the
voices that truly bring them to life, and Antz has attracted a
first-rate cast for the job.  In addition to the voices credited above,
the film features the talents of Christopher Walken, Danny Glover, Anne
Bancroft, Jennifer Lopez, Dan Aykroyd and Jane Curtin. The vocal
performances are all top-notch, and truly bring a spark of life to the
film.
There's plenty of humor here...but most of it is likely to sail
completely over the heads of children.  Socio-political commentary is
rare in animation, but it seems to fit in well here.
Humorous and enjoyable, Antz is able to overcome its limitations and is
a rather good cartoon.  Younger children might not understand many of
the jokes, and might be frightened by some of the battle scenes...but
older kids and adults will have a jolly good time.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Impostors, The (1998)
Following the art house success Big Night, Stanley Tucci has set his
sights on making a screwball comedy.  With a top notch cast, and plenty
of good humor, The Impostors is warmly reminiscent of the great
screwball comedies of old.
Arthur and Maurice (Stanley Tucci and Oliver Platt) are two struggling
actors in the 1930s. Desperate for work, they perform impromptu live
performances in the middle of an unsuspecting sidewalk cafe.  They've
also been known to attempt the occasional con or two in order to get
food on their meager plates.
Through a convoluted series of events, the bumbling pair mistakenly stow
away aboard a cruise ship.  There, they disguise themselves as stewards
and mingle with a zany variety of vacationers, including an arrogant
actor out for their blood (Alfred Molina), and a man's man tennis pro
(Billy Connolly) who's after them for very different reasons.
The crew of the ship isn't too helpful to the pair.  Although they do
find a sympathetic ear in Lily (Lili Taylor), they find the fascistic
head steward Meistrich (Campbell Scott) has no tolerance for stowaways.
A suicidal entertainer (Steve Buscemi) and a first mate with a secret
agenda (Tony Shalhoub) simply add to the already bizarre mix.
Writer-director Stanley Tucci was apparently aiming to recreate a  good
ol'-fashioned screwball comedy...and he mostly succeeds. Even when a few
of the far-fetched setups don't quite work...the actors seem to be
having such a good time that the frantically festive mood begins to rub
off.
Tucci and Platt enjoy a hearty comradery from right off the bat, a fact
crucial to making the film work.  The pair are introduced in a hilarious
silent bit, and we get to know the characters before even a word is
uttered.
The title of The Impostors doesn't just represent the main characters.
Virtually everyone in the film is an impostor of one sort or another,
pretending to be something he or she isn't.  The various plots and
intersections of the characters provide much of the film's humor.
When the film actually gets to the ship and introduces us to its
whirlwind of characters, the introductions are swiftly and deftly
handled without confusion.  The supporting ensemble deliver terrific
performances all around, and are a delight to behold.
There are a few misfired gags here and there, but the film has plenty of
good gags to spare.  While it won't rank up with the all-time screwball
classics, The Impostors is still a wonderful little comedy.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Clay Pigeons (1998)
Clay Pigeons is the sort of wacky dark comedy that tries to be
irreverent right off the bat.  But, unfortunately, it's about halfway
through before it settles into a good comedic groove.  Luckily, if you
stick it out, there's something worth waiting for.
In a small Montana town, there's trouble brewing.  And poor Clay
(Joaquin Phoenix) finds himself in the center of it.  He gets into the
unfortunate habit of discovering dead bodies.  Soon, Sheriff Mooney
(Scott Wilson) begins to suspect Clay of murder.
Clay's acquaintances don't help things out.  His best friend, Earl
(Gregory Sporleder) has gone a little gun crazy.  It doesn't help that
Clay is having an affair with Earl's oversexed wife, Amanda (Georgina
Cates).  But it's the new guy in town, Lester Long (Vince Vaughn) who
offers the most help to Clay...but can anyone who prides himself on the
nickname "Lester the Molester" truly be trusted???
As Clay finds himself deeper and deeper in trouble, soon the FBI is
called in to investigate.  Under the thorough scrutiny of Agent Shelby
(Janeane Garofalo), certainly the FBI will find the truth.  Or has Clay
simply been set up as a clay pigeon in a target shoot?
This dark comedy takes a little while to warm up.  It's not until you've
gotten past the first couple of twists that things start to ignite. The
first character who gets things started is Vince Vaughn's Lester Long.
His presence in the film enlivens the atmosphere with is bizarrely
idiosyncratic ways.
Another welcome presence is Janeane Garofalo.  Though her FBI character
is hardly unique, she brings a breath of fresh air to the proceedings.
An efficient outsider, she easily represents the audience as a person
incredulous to the happenings in this small town.
Joaquin Phoenix does a good job at playing the hapless everyman. But he
can't compare to the other, better written characters.  When he's on the
screen, you're constantly hoping one of the other actors will appear to
spice things up.
The plot of Clay Pigeons tends to stretch credulity, even when viewed as
a comedy.  The endless string of dead body "discoveries" seems a little
forced.  It's not until Lester Long pops up that you're distracted
enough to take everything in stride.
In short, it's more the cast that makes things work in Clay Pigeons than
the story.  It certainly could have been a stronger picture, but it's
one that grows on you.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Opposite of Sex, The (1998)
At first glance, The Opposite of Sex may seem to be merely a standard
dysfunctional-family comedy.  However, with a handful of excellent
performances and a very witty screenplay make this one rise above the
crowd.
DeDee Truitt (Christina Ricci) is the film's narrator, and isn't ashamed
of the fact that she's not a very nice person.  At the age of sixteen,
after her stepfather's death, she runs away from home to move in with
her half-brother Bill (Martin Donovan).  She's uninvited, but DeDee
always gets what she wants...one way or another.
Bill is a gay high school teacher, rich from the inheritance of a former
lover.  His current boyfriend is Matt Mateo (Ivan Sergei), a brainless
dolt whom DeDee immediately tries to seduce.  Within days, Bill's entire
life is reduced to shambles.
Among the people who get caught in DeDee's wake are Lucia (Lisa Kudrow),
the bitter sister of Bill's dead former lover, and Carl (Lyle Lovett),
the kindly local sheriff who always seems to be in the right place at
the right time.
But the black twisted heart of the story is DeDee.  Her sharp and witty
narration is worth the price of admission alone.  She knows she's in a
movie and tweaks filmmaking conventions in a way other
"self-referential" films (such as Scream) never dared.  Her choice
comments are biting and cruel, but hilarious.
Christina Ricci has finally found a role she can sink her teeth into.
She has finally risen out of her mediocre phase in films such as Casper
or That Darn Cat, and here shows the talent that was evident in the
Addams Family films.
She's backed up by a talented supporting cast.  Surprisingly, the
strongest secondary character her is the against-type Lisa Kudrow. Only
Martin Donovan falters a bit, but that is because his gay character is
the straight man in the film.
Screenwriter Don Roos makes his directorial debut with this film, which
also happens to feature his best script.  He takes a few chances with
his direction, and, for the most part, they are successful.
The Opposite of Sex is not a fall-down funny comedy, but it's full of
moments which will bring a wicked little smile to your face.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for At First Sight (1999)
Oliver Sacks' story To See and Not See, a true account regarding
restoring sight to the blind must have seemed like the perfect idea for
a movie. Not only does an actor get to stretch his chops as a blind man,
but the "miracle cure" would be, by definition, an uplifting moment.
Both of these are true of At First Sight, but the film isn't happy to
leave good enough alone.  Instead, the film is saddled with a romantic
subplot that proves unmoving and distracting.
Virgil Adamson (Val Kilmer) lost his sight between the ages of 1 and 3
due to congenital cataracts.  Since then, under the protective wing of
his elder sister Jennie (Kelly McGillis), he has made a life for himself
as a massage therapist at a local resort.
However, everything is about to change when Amy Benic (Mira Sorvino)
enters his life.  She's an architect from New York who comes to the
resort for a weekend getaway.  She goes in for a massage, and winds up
falling in love.
Back in New York, Amy discovers Dr. Charles Aaron (Bruce Davison), a
surgeon with some radical ideas which just might be able to restore
Virgil's sight.  But, after living all his life without vision, will
Virgil be able to relearn everything he knows about the world in order
to see?
The medical drama of At First Sight, based on a true story, is easily
the film's most compelling element.  Though the premise at first feels a
bit gimmicky, it is handled competently and with a good deal of
thoughtfulness.
But At First Sight is hesitant to rely on the medical drama alone.
Rather, it supplements the story with a romantic angle, and here is
where it falters.  The chemistry-free relationship between Mira Sorvino
and Val Kilmer feels very artificial and lifeless.
Mira Sorvino is the prime culprit here.  Her bland character is simply
unappealing.  Val Kilmer has the heftier role, and can always fall back
on his character's visual dilemma for drama.  Sorvino only has the
romance to work with, and that's not a solid structure here at all.
In a delightful supporting turn, Nathan Lane briefly appears as a visual
therapist.  His few scenes in the film are such a welcome relief that it
leaves you wondering how much better the film would have been without
the overstressed romantic angle.
In the end, At First Sight is still worth watching...but there are
plenty of better things to see.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
Mention a science fiction film starring Keanu Reeves and Laurence
Fishburne and you might conjure up frightening images of Johnny Mnemonic
or Event Horizon.  However, their new film, The Matrix, is a dazzling
and unique work that will certainly put those horrible nightmares to
rest.
Thomas Anderson (Keanu Reeves) is a normal guy living a boring life in
1999.  All his life he has felt something is not quite right. One
question inexplicably burns in his mind:  What Is The Matrix?
To escape the dull routines of daily life, Thomas lives a double life.
By day, he's a software programmer at a monolithic corporation. At
night, he becomes a computer hacker, using the alias Neo, desperately
searching for the answer to the question that plagues him.
He comes close to getting his answer when he is contacted by an elite
group of hackers, including Trinity (Carrie-Anne Moss), Cypher (Joe
Pantoliano), and led by the enigmatic Morpheus (Laurence Fishburne). Neo
doesn't have long to decide whether to trust this ragtag bunch. When a
mysterious government agent (Hugo Weaving) beings pursuing him, he finds
himself forced to make a decision upon which rides the fate of his
entire existence.
Writer-directors Larry and Andy Wachowski have crafted a stunning fusion
of a Hong Kong action film and a cyberpunk graphic novel. The special
effects are impressive, particularly when they are seamlessly integrated
into the film's action sequences.  The film transitions from regular
speed to slow motion and back again in the middle of several stunts,
offering plenty of eye candy.
The Matrix is rife with symbolic imagery, so much so that it makes you
wonder if the entire film is a religious allegory of some sort. From
names (Trinity, Zion, The Oracle, Nebuchadnezzar, etc.) to religious
themes (faith, enlightenment, the chosen one, miracles, resurrection,
and so forth), there's a little bit of everything in The Matrix.  It is
not cohesive enough to make sense alone, but it does add an interesting
flavor to the scenes.
As with any science fiction film, you have to be willing to suspend
disbelief long enough to accept the premise.  At least, with The Matrix,
the premise is worth disbelieving for.  The film starts up in the middle
of the action, and it isn't until about halfway through that everything
starts falling into place.  Once you see the pattern emerge, it becomes
apparent that there was much thought put into the screenplay.
If the film has a weak link, it is with the characterizations. It's
surprising, since the writers were responsible for the multilayered
characters in Bound.  But, the characters in The Matrix are, for the
most part, flat and unchanging.
The idea behind The Matrix is not a brand new concept in science
fiction, however, it is one never before put so vividly upon the movie
screen. Action lovers, science fiction fans, and even those who just
crave a decent story will all find what they're looking for in The
Matrix.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Cube (1997)
Vincenzo Natali directs this science fiction thriller with an intriguing
premise.  Unfortunately, there's little to Cube besides that premise and
some creative filmmaking techniques.
The plot of Cube seems to have fallen right out of the Twilight Zone.
Six complete strangers (well, there's a seventh...but he's a goner
pre-credits) awaken in a strange place.  They're stuck in a series of
identical cubic rooms.  Each room has a door in the center of each wall,
in the floor and in the ceiling.  Each door leads to another identical
room.  Well, not quite identical...the rooms vary in color and many of
the rooms contain elaborate deathtraps.
Quick to take charge of the situation is Quentin (Maurice Dean Wint), a
cop who believes they can conquer the situation with teamwork and strong
leadership.  Rennes (Wayne Robson) has a different idea. He's a master
escape artist, confident he can escape this bizarre prison.
Holloway (Nicky Guadagni) is a bleeding-heart doctor who's wary of
anyone wanting to take charge.  Worth (David Hewlett) seems to know more
than he lets on.  Leaven (Nicole de Boer), a math student, has no idea
why she is here, and Kazan (Andrew Miller) is an autistic man who
doesn't seem to be of any help at all.
Can these six people survive the deathtraps and one another to discover
the purpose of (and escape from) this cube-maze?  Can they survive one
another?
Any film which essentially drops its six actors into a box for its
duration is obviously going to need strong characters and dialog.
Unfortunately, that is exactly what Cube lacks.  The characters are mere
archetypes (including one who inexplicably switches as the film goes
on).  Their interactions are forced and uninteresting. Nicole de Boer
displays a little charisma as the most likable prisoner.  But after the
first hour, even she begins to wear thin.
What are Cube's strengths?  Well, it does have an ingenious set design.
Only one cube-room was actually designed and used to represent the
entire structure.  The special effects are also particularly good (if a
bit gruesome)...you can't tell the film had a shoestring budget.
But an interesting premise and an interesting design can't change the
fact that while watching Cube, you feel like you're in your own
deathtrap cube room.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Zero Effect (1998)
Jake Kasdan, son of one of the best screenwriters around, breaks into
filmmaking by writing and directing this hard-to-categorize detective
story: part mystery, part comedy, part character study and part
romance.  For the most part, Kasdan manages to combine the genres
successfully and create a captivating film.
Daryl Zero (Bill Pullman) is a modern day Sherlock Holmes.  The parallel
is present down to his love of music (though Zero plays the guitar
rather than the violin), and his addiction to drugs (amphetamines,
rather than morphine). He even titles his cases with such Sherlockian
epigrams as The Case of the Mismatched Shoelaces, The Case About the Man
Who Lied About His Age, or The Case of the Hired Gun Who Made Way Way
Too Many Mistakes.
However Zero's observance of the fine art of detachment, though it makes
him a brilliant private investigator, makes him somewhat of a
self-imposed outcast in society. He could do nothing without the legwork
of his trusty assistant Dr. Watson, I mean Steve Arlo (Ben Stiller).
Arlo is not happy with his job.  He is thrilled to be around Zero's
brilliance, but his bizarre behavior, and strange requests, are
frustrating to the former lawyer. And they're even more so to his
girlfriend, Jess (Angela Featherstone), who is fed up that her
boyfriend's boss means more to Arlo than her.
This is the situation when a new case comes knocking.  Gregory Stark
(Ryan O'Neill) hires Zero to find his lost keys.  It seems that he kept
a safety deposit box key on the ring, and the box apparently contains
some incriminating evidence. Now, Stark is being blackmailed, and needs
to reclaim his key before the nightmare can end.
To solve this case, Zero reluctantly crawls out of his shell.  However,
this is when he is vulnerable...and this time he falls for charms of a
wily paramedic, Gloria Sullivan (Kim Dickens), who may be involved in
the blackmail scheme.  For the first time, Zero has to question his own
objectivity, as he finds his client less and less sympathetic.
Zero Effect is weakest in its obviously "wacky" scenes depicting Daryl
Zero's odd behavior. Such scenes might be appropriate in an out-and-out
satire, making Zero an Ace Ventura-ish character.  However, there's a
much meatier movie in here...it just takes a while to get out.
That's not to say that there's not a place for humor in this film.  In
fact, some of the best scenes are Ben Stiller's wonderfully underplayed
comic moments of absolute disgust and frustration with his employer.
However, the over-the-top scenes never quite gel with the rest of the
film, and they aren't funny enough to stand on their own.
Once the investigation is underway, however, Zero's brilliance really
begins to shine. His lightning quick inferences are as fascinating as
many of Sherlock's own.  As the mystery begins to unfold, Zero's
deductions lead the plot in interesting directions, but never lose the
viewer.
Zero Effect works well during its romantic scenes as well. Zero's
relationship with Gloria is low-key, but it hits all the right notes.
However, we are always kept distant from Gloria's character.  She's
given plenty of development, but we never understand what she is
thinking.  Perhaps that may be intentional: to place the audience in
Zero's zone of detachment.  But, on the whole, it is frustrating.
Bill Pullman, when he's not spacing out, creates a vibrant character in
Daryl Zero. There's one moment when Zero briefly connects to the world
which he has managed to detach from for many years, and it is shockingly
moving...expressing a seriousness that heretofore was unassociated with
the character, but one which fits in well. And, although it is sometimes
hard to take a detective called "Zero" seriously, it is at this moment
that the viewer understands the meaning behind the name.
Although Zero Effect is a bit awkward in places, it is a strong debut
for Kasdan, and shows great promise.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Sliding Doors (1998)
Chaos mathematicians have studied a phenomena called "the butterfly
effect", in which a single butterfly flapping its wings can cause
tremendous shifts of weather half a world away.  The unpredictable
effects of a relatively minor change are also explored in Sliding Doors,
which shows how a seemingly insignificant event can have drastic
effects.
Helen (Gwyneth Paltrow) is a public relations executive whose life is
starting to fall apart on one fateful day.  She just lost her job, and,
on her way back home, she narrowly misses catching her train in the
London underground...or does she.
At this point, the movie splits in two, alternating back and forth
between two different worlds:  one in which Helen caught the train, and
the other in which she narrowly missed it.  It's one minor difference,
but the effects spiral away in completely different directions.
In the world where she catches the train, she arrives home in time to
catch her boyfriend, Gerry (John Lynch), in the middle of an affair with
another woman (Jeanne Tripplehorn).  Yet, as traumatic as this seems at
first, it makes her a stronger woman, as she pursues a new career, and a
new life with a new love, James (John Hannah).
However, when she missed the train, her life turns out radically
different. Gerry continues his affair with Lydia, unbeknownst to Helen,
who, in the meantime, is forced to work multiple menial jobs to support
the two of them.
Although the parallel storylines might seem somewhat confusing at first,
especially to someone who is unprepared for the premise of the film, the
filmmakers do an admirable job at reducing the inherent confusion. Each
Helen is marked in an identifiable way (first with a bandage, and then
later with differing hairstyles) so the confusion is kept to a happy
minimum.
Once confusion is laid to rest, the biggest problem with running
parallel storylines like this is that one of the storylines might easily
overpower the other.  This is somewhat the case here, but it never
becomes an outright disaster.  The "catches-the-train" Helen has the
more vibrant of the two plots, and though the other Helen might get more
pity, there's no question of which one we'd like to spend the time
with.  The trouble is each storyline gets roughly equal time, which
means you spend half the movie waiting for the other half.
Paltrow manages the double role well, proving that her recent doldrum
has been the result of poor material rather than a lack of talent.  Of
the two male leads, John Lynch actually comes out on top (even though
he's playing the shadier of the two men). John Hannah just doesn't have
that much to work with, playing a Mr. Right.
Sliding Doors deserves points for being original.  However, an
unfortunate side effect of its split perspective is repetition.  One
crucial plot point actually happens four separate times (nearly becoming
an unintentional running gag).  And (magical musical chimes aside)
there's never an explanation for the parallel stories.  Perhaps it's
just a mental exercise for the audience...anyhow, an ending revelation
nearly makes the whole thing pointless.
Still, the movie is enjoyable, and what more do you want from a romantic
comedy?
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Woo (1998)
Daisy v.S. Mayer directs this blind date comedy that's more
uncomfortable than a bad date.  Boring, uninteresting and pointless, the
film wastes both its talent and your time.
Woo is the name given to Jada Pinkett Smith's free-spirited character.
Beautiful and smart, she's also a handful...so much so that her cousin
Claudette (Paula Jai Parker), with whom she's staying, schemes to get
her out of the apartment for one night.  She asks her husband Lenny
(Dave Chappelle) to set up a blind date between his friend Tim (Tommy
Davidson) and Woo.
Tim is a legal assistant studying for the bar, and a very nice guy.  Too
nice, or so his friends think.  His last girlfriend used and abused him,
and now, on the rebound, he reluctantly agrees to the blind date.
Of course, the blind date turns into the disastrous date from hell. But
it's not all bad...at least they didn't have to sit though a movie like
Woo. Woo is never groundbreakingly awful.  Well, ok...the chicken sex
fetishist was disturbingly bad, but the movie is more bland than
horrible.  The film is packed with endless unfunny setups that lead
nowhere. You're sure that there's going to be a payoff soon...but it
just never comes.
Jada Pinkett Smith deserves a better film than this one.  Her role here
has some substance, but it is lost in the morass of the film's bungled
attempts at humor.  Tommy Davidson fills the needs of his role:  nice
but boring. There's not much to be said for the supporting cast.  Tim's
trio of buffoonish friends particularly suffer from the film's lack of
humor.
The film is not "Run Away!" bad, but it is bad...and not one which I
would recommend to anyone besides an insomniac.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for October Sky (1999)
October Sky is a rare oddity in cinema:  a self-proclaimed "uplifting"
film that is actually uplifting!  Based on the autobiographical book by
Homer Hickam, Rocket Boys, October Sky tells the struggle of four boys
reaching for their dream.
It's 1957, and for the boys of Coalwood, West Virginia, there's not much
hope of a rosy future.  Coalwood is a coal mining town, and, except for
the few lucky ones who manage to escape on a football scholarship, most
of Coalwood's boys are destined to work in the mine. But, in October
1957, an event happens that sparks one boy to dream. The launch of the
Soviet satellite Sputnik sets Homer Hickam (Jake Gyllenhaal) to dream a
future of rocketry and space travel.
Of course, Homer's parents (Chris Cooper and Natalie Canderday) aren't
quite sure what to make of their son's unusual interests.  Homer gets
his strongest encouragement from Miss Riley (Laura Dern), a teacher in
his school who also informs him about the scholarships offered to the
winners of a national science fair.
And so, with stars in his eyes, and thoughts of scholarships in his
head, Homer enlists the help of three other boys (William Lee Scott,
Chad Lindberg and Chris Owen) and begins to build a rocket.  But, do
these four backwoods boys even have the slightest hope of escaping their
destiny?
There is a lot that could have gone wrong with October Sky.  Nearly
every sequence flirts with becoming syrupy and cliched.  However,
miraculously, October Sky avoids nearly all of these pitfalls, making
the exact right moves at the exact right times.  A film emerges which
manages to be powerful and moving without slipping into the gauzy haze
of nostalgia or sliding down the sugarry slope of sappiness.
Jake Gyllenhaal is outstanding as the kid at the center of this film.
>From the outset of the film, he is immediately likable, and never seems
too corny or brainy as to alienate the audience. Unfortunately, while
October Sky focuses on Homer, the other three kids get the short end of
the stick.  They remain little more than placeholders reading "insert
friend here".
Of the adults in the film, Chris Cooper is the most fully realized
character.  The film never paints him as merely the villainous parent
standing in the way of his child's dreams, but, instead, shows the
multihued portrait of a man who wants the best for his family and town,
but is too stubborn to realize what that is.
Director Joe Johnson deserves much credit for successfully navigating
the many obstacles that October Sky manages to dodge. However, there are
still a few occasions when he allows things to proceed just a step too
far.  Scenes which were natural and inspiring start to become contrived
and artificial.  However, these lapses are minimal, and Johnson quickly
steers the movie back on course.
The problem with many so-called "uplifting" films is that they attempt
to force their mediciney goodness down your throat.  October Sky never
resorts to that level, and yet, manages to become a truly uplifting film
purely on its own merits.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas (1998)
This is not a movie for everyone.  Its intense surrealistic drug imagery
is at once intriguing and revolting.  The film doesn't have a strong
point, but it tells it vividly and with an intense visual flair.
Johnny Depp stars as journalist Hunter S. Thompson (going under the
alias Raoul Duke).  In early 1971, he is given an assignment to travel
to Las Vegas and cover the Mint 400, a motorcycle race in the desert. He
hooks up with his attorney, Oscar Acosta (Benicio Del Toro) aka Dr.
Gonzo, and together they plan to visit Vegas on one of the most intense
drug and booze benders the world has ever seen.
Riding in a fire apple red convertible at top speed across the desert,
and with a trunk full of nearly every dangerous illegal drug imaginable,
the pair enter Las Vegas, where possession of mere marijuana carries a
20-year prison term.  But they don't let little things like laws or
societal norms stand in the way of hitting their psychedelic highs.
If the film has a statement, it is a portrayal of the aftermath of the
60s.  Raoul Duke and Dr. Gonzo are no longer heroes of a people's
revolution, but merely the distorted and discarded flotsam and jetsam of
time.  The purpose of the sixties had reached its final resting place:
the ultimate indulgence of self-gratification.
The film doesn't quite have a plot.  The shreds of one are lost in the
haze of the protagonists' drug induced stupor.  Instead, the film plays
as a series of vignettes detailing the steady descent from normality
into utter depravity.
More of a surreal experience than a movie, the film does manage to
capture the stream-of-consciousness feeling of Thompson's book. Whether
or not that is a good thing depends on your own particular tolerances.
A few of the sequences in the movie drag on a bit long, and the film
treads a thin line with its humor.  That humor comes in two varieties:
watching the hallucinating fools do foolish things, and observing the
clash between the normal Vegas folk and the drug fiends.  The former is
amusing at first, but quickly wears out its welcome...however, there's
enough of the latter to prop up the movie in its weak spots.
Johnny Depp is playing a broad caricature here, but he manages to make
the character interesting.  Benicio Del Toro goes deep into character...
so deep that he's hardly recognizable in the film. The rest of the film
is flooded with cameos by everyone from Cameron Diaz and Christina Ricci
to Ellen Barkin and Gary Busey. Even Penn Jilette and Lyle Lovett pop up
here and there.
If you enjoyed the book, you'll find the movie about as good an
adaptation as you could hope for.  If the description in this review
didn't sound the slightest bit intriguing...this film is not for you.
Whatever the case, if you see the film, you'll never look at hotel
carpeting the same way again.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Firestorm (1998)
You always have to be careful with the first official studio release out
of the gate each year.  They're obviously films for which the studios
have no great hopes (having missed both the deadline for  Academy Award
eligibility and the big box-office holiday season).  Combine that with
Howie Long's first starring action role, and you've got a doozy of a
movie that, while not as bad as it could have been, isn't a very good
film.
Howie stars as an ace smokejumper (a firefighter who parachutes into
forest fires unreachable from the ground).  In the slightly contrived
opening scenes, we witness his heroism in action, as he, and his mentor
(played by Scott Glenn) attempt to rescue a small girl and her dog from
an oncoming forest fire.
William Forsythe plays the bad guy, a mass murderer who has several
million dollars tucked away to help fund his jailbreak.  He (and five
convict cohorts) manages to get selected for firefighting duty when a
woodland blaze just happens to ignite nearby. His escape plan bets a lot
on the laxity of the guards, but (since there must be a movie) luck is
with him.  Soon the now-escaped convicts are masquerading as Canadian
firefighters. Why Canadian?  Who knows, eh?  Along the way they pick up
a pretty birdwatcher (Suzy Amis) to be their hostage.
Enter Howie Long.  He's called in to help fight the blaze, and when he
spots the group of "ground pounders", apparently lost, he parachutes in
to help.  When he discovers their true identity, he is the only thing
standing between them and escape, and the only hope of help for the
hostage.
Long's acting talents are above those of, say, Steven Seagal, but not by
much. Although his delivery is mostly flat and wooden, he's a likeable
hero, and there are some hints here and there that he may get better.
The script doesn't help him out any, however.  All too often, it veers
into the realm of the unintentionally funny.  The dialogue is strictly
B-movie material, and the plotting relies too heavily on coincidences to
be believable.
Long's co-stars are a mixed bag.  At least they're all comfortable in
their respective roles. Forsythe has the scenery-chewing villain down
cold, down cold, and Scott Glenn is always enjoyable to watch, even when
he doesn't seem to be stretching his talents (as is definitely the case
here). Suzy Amis plays peril pretty well, but isn't given much more to
do.
Some of the nature and wildfire shots are interesting, but many are
rather bland.  You'd think that the director, Dean Semler, a former
cinematographer, would at least produce a film with interesting
visuals.  That's not the case. There's a lack of originality to nearly
all the sequences...we've seen this stuff before.
It's not the most auspicious start to 1998, but it could have been worse
(just think back to 1996's debut, Bio-Dome). However, after a month of
Oscar-caliber pictures, a movie like Firestorm at least gives you some
perspective on how good those movies really were.  In fact, there's a
good chance that some of them are still playing near you...
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 500 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Holy Man (1998)
Billed as an Eddie Murphy comedy, viewers should beware of Holy Man.
Though it does feature Eddie Murphy, there's precious little comedy
herein this tired romantic comedy set amid a television-age satire.
GBSN (The Good Buy Shopping Network) is in trouble.  It's routine
infomercials and pathetic products just aren't selling anything. This
causes headaches for Ricky (Jeff Goldblum), the program director at
GBSN, who is given an ultimatum by his boss (Robert Loggia): improve
GBSN or be fired.
Kate (Kelly Preston), an analyst for the station, has a few ideas of how
a distinctive image could help the network.  But Ricky is more
interested in getting a date with her than with following her advice.
Enter G (Eddie Murphy), a bald, pajama-wearing, ground kissing, new-age
mystic.  He literally wanders into Ricky's life, initially an extreme
annoyance.  But Ricky is hit with a brainstorm:  why not put G on the
network.  Viewers will be able to enrich their lives while emptying
their pockets.
Unfortunately, the whole concept is about as interesting as watching an
infomercial.  The film tries to pack in a few product gimmicks, but most
of the humor is either mundane or missing.
Eddie Murphy is rarely given a chance to cut loose here.  Instead, he
spends most of the film reciting New Agey platitudes.  There are a
couple of fun moments (if you've seen the trailer...you've seen all of
them) where he starts to steal the show.  But, most of the time he is
curiously restrained.
That leaves us with the romance between Goldblum and Preston, a pair who
have zero chemistry together.  Goldblum isn't remotely likeable as the
lead, and Preston, though more sympathetic, has no defined character at
all.
There are moments of Holy Man where the filmmakers seem to be striving
toward some sort of social message about the power of television.
However, Holy Man is no Network...it's barely to the standards of Eddie
Murphy's career-derailing flop The Golden Child.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Blade (1998)
Blade is the latest entry in Hollywood's continuing obsession with
vampires. Based upon a comic book, Blade feels more like Batman than
Dracula.  Packed to the gills (or should that be fangs) with
crowd-pleasing fight scenes and mindless action, Blade is a pleasant
enough popcorn movie that may not break any new ground, but has a fun
time right where it is.
Wesley Snipes is Blade, a half-human, half-vampire superhero.  He
inherited his unique bloodline when his pregnant mother was attacked by
an unknown vampire.  Due to his heritage, Blade possesses a vampire's
strength and reflexes, yet a human's tolerance for sunlight.
As an adult, Blade spends his nights waging war against vampires, who
have secretly infiltrated all aspects of our society.  Helped by his
aging mentor, Whistler (Kris Kristofferson), Blade single-handedly
destroys hundreds of the bloodsuckers every night.
But the vampires have larger plans in mind.  Particularly one young
upstart, Deacon Frost (Stephen Dorff), who sets about trying to fulfill
an ancient vampire prophecy.  Can Blade stop his nefarious plans in
time? Need you even ask?
A movie like Blade doesn't concern itself too much with reality, nor
should it. If it did, it would have to ponder such questions as what
vampires would eat after converting the last human (as is proposed at
one point in the film).  No, rather the film is pure escapism, and works
well on that level.
Blade has mastered the art of the one-strike kill, to the point that a
few of the fight scenes are overly repetitive.  At times, it seems like
the bad guys line up in a single file queue, and Blade sequentially
kills them one at a time.  Shouldn't vampires be a bit tougher to kill?
But, on the whole, the fights are enjoyable diversions.
Too bad the same can't be said of Snipes' acting.  He delivers each and
every line with the same clenched-jaw monotone.  He's proven that he can
successfully tackle a tough part, but here he is simply slumming.
The special effects in Blade are a mixed bag.   A few of the effects are
done very well, such as the disintegration of dead vampires.  However,
others are positively cartoonish, and don't blend well with the tone of
the rest of the film.
For the most part, Blade delivers on its promises.  It's got vampires,
violence, guns, swordfights, stunts and special effects galore.  If
those sound appealing, Blade fits the bill.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for eXistenZ (1999)
Virtual Reality is a hot film topic these days, and with his latest film
eXistenZ, writer-director David Cronenberg gives his take on the
subject.  While not a film for the squeamish (not many of his films
are), eXistenZ proves to be an  intriguing examination on the nature of
reality.
The film begins with a spelling lesson.  The title is "eXistenZ", not
"Existenz". This is explained to a marketing group which will be the
first to test the so-titled virtual reality game.  As an extra bonus,
the game's famous and reclusive designer, Allegra Geller (Jennifer Jason
Leigh), will lead the test herself.
Allegra is reclusive for a good reason.  A group of "realists", who
oppose the concepts of virtual reality, have marked her for death.  No
place is safe, and soon Allegra is on the run with her "protector", a
trainee named Ted Pikul (Jude Law).
And that is when things truly start to get strange.  Allegra and Ted
decide to play eXistenZ themselves, looking for damaged code.  But, as
they continue to play, the lines between reality and virtual reality
begin to blur.  What is real and what is just a game?
Not content with the wires and electronics that typically come to mind
when one thinks of virtual reality, Cronenberg envisions a future of
computing composed entirely of organic technology.  Instead of cabling,
machines use umbilical cords.  Instead of keyboards, unidentifiable
organs.  Even the guns of the future are made of bone and gristle.  It
ain't pretty, but its certainly innovative.
The film certainly has attracted an outstanding supporting cast. Ian
Holm, Willem Dafoe, Christopher Eccleston and Sarah Polley are a few of
those who drift in and out of Allegra and Ted's experiences. Even though
their characters never amount to much, the cast  give their all and make
their roles fun, if not deep.
eXistenZ is well thought out...to a point.  At the end of the film,
everything finally seems to click together and make a cohesive whole.
Yet, at the end things are vaguely unsatisfying. Many of the characters
throughout seem like flimsy constructs, but on the other hand, that's
what some of them are supposed to be.  Still, a movie that gives so much
effort shouldn't feel this substanceless.
Fetishistic and disgusting at times, complicated yet lightweight at
others, eXistenZ is an unusual film to be sure, but one that is mostly
worth the trip.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Big One, The (1997)
Michael Moore, best known for his anti-GM documentary Roger and Me, has
set himself up as the working man's hero.  He prides himself in sticking
it to corporations where it hurts, and never taking his focus off the
little guy.  The Big One is his latest documentary (a welcome change of
pace after his abysmal Canadian Bacon), and in it, he does what he does
best.
During 1996, Moore undertakes a multi-city book tour to promote his
book, Downsize This: Random Threats From An Unarmed American.  He brings
along a film crew, ostensibly to document the tour, but he has another
agenda in mind.
Big corporations have been reveling in Wall Street's billion dollar
profits, and yet layoffs and downsizing continue to be the norm.  Moore
uses his book tour as the basis of a quest to find someone who can tell
him why.
As he travels from city to city, the story randomly unfolds.  Sometimes
he is simply meeting with laid off employees at his book signing.  At
other times he talks with employees struggling to form a union.  And
then there are his classic corporate ambushes, where, with film crew in
hand, he tries to force his way in to meet with a CEO, to deliver such
awards as "Downsizer of the Year", or a check to pay the first hour of
the first Mexican worker in a company's new plant.
Moore's corporate humor, while obviously biased, is apt, and the
highlight of the film. He stumbles a bit when he ventures into political
humor however.  The 1996 campaign already seems like the distant past,
and is only going to seem more and more dated.
The film is never quite as biting as Roger and Me.  Some of this arises
from the impromptu feel of the film, but overall his antics seem much
more forced here. The "in-your-face" school of journalism is at full
force here.  A lot of the film is composed of cheap shots...but they're
funny cheap shots.
If you enjoyed Roger and Me, The Big One delivers more of the same (just
not in the same dose).  Moore's offbeat brand of humor should have
something to slightly amuse nearly anybody, even if you don't quite
agree with his politics.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Wedding Singer, The (1998)
Adam Sandler turns up the charm in his latest romantic comedy, The
Wedding Singer.  Unfortunately, that also has the effect of softening
his edge.  He's nowhere near his peak of Happy Gilmore, not that it was
much of one.  He's certainly not helped here by a rather frail plot.
The year is 1985, letting the whole film obsess with 80s nostalgia. Adam
Sandler is nice guy Robbie, the titular wedding singer, who entertains
at the local reception hall by belting out his interpretations of
classic 80s hits.
Robbie's life is thrown into turmoil when his fiancee, Linda (Angela
Featherstone), leaves him at the altar.  However, things are looking up
when he meets Julia (Drew Barrymore), a waitress at the hall.  She's the
perfect woman, but for one small flaw:  she's engaged to be married to a
slick junk bond king, Glenn (Matthew Glave).
So, most of the film deals with the slow realization by Robbie that he
and Julia are in love, and his attempts to stop the wedding. As far as
plots go, it's a pretty thin and tired one.
To fill the gaps, The Wedding Singer delivers heaping spoonfuls of 1980s
nostalgia.  From Boy George to Michael Jackson, from Miami Vice to
Dallas, from the first CDs to the last Rubik's Cubes, this film revels
in all the minutiae.  And then there's the music... Learning a lesson
from the successful soundtracks to Grosse Pointe Blank, and Romy and
Michele's High School Reunion, this film packs more 80s songs in the
film than the running time will allow.  As a result, most songs get
maybe a lyric or a half, but you can almost see the bright gleam in the
record executives' eyes: The Wedding Singer Vols. 2, 3, and 4!
While the nonstop 80s riffs get incredibly tiring, at least they
distract you from the plot.  At least last year's My Best Friend's
Wedding stirred up the standard "keep your true love from marrying
someone else" plot by making the rival a nice person.  Here, Glenn is
such a lowly rat of a man that you never see what Julia saw in him.
Barrymore, on the other hand, is simply charming as Julia.  Which leaves
us with Adam Sandler.  He's at his best in the film when his nice guy
persona fades a little (such as when he has a breakdown on stage during
a wedding reception).  When he's in full nice-guy mode, he's more
pathetic than endearing.
The film boasts several cameos (most notably by Steve Buscemi and Jon
Lovitz). But none of them work well at all.  Buscemi's role as a drunken
best man simply fails to be humorous.  Lovitz, on the other hand, as a
rival wedding singer, makes you long for his good old days on Saturday
Night Live, where he was actually funny. The only cameo which has some
appeal is a guest appearance by a classic 80s rocker during the film's
finale (surprisingly, one of the only plot-related scenes which actually
works.)
Adam Sandler still has some work to do before he can become a dependable
leading man. While he attempts to change his image in The Wedding
Singer, the end result is no net gain.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for 54 (1998)
The 70s are a hot era in Hollywood right now.  54 is the latest film to
jump on the retro train.  This time, the infamously exclusive disco,
Studio 54, is the backdrop for yet another drama detailing the
soullessness of the disco age.
The central character of 54 is Shane O'Shea (Ryan Phillippe), a young
man who sees the exotic world of Studio 54 as his escape from his
pathetic life in New Jersey. Catching the eye of the Studio 54 owner,
Steve Rubell (Mike Myers), Shane soon finds himself with a job as a
busboy.  Night after night, he is able to catch glimpses of the rich and
famous, including his dream girl, soap star Julie Black (Neve Campbell).
Shane quickly strikes up a friendship with some other club employees, a
married couple Anita and Greg (Salma Hayek and Breckin Meyer).  Anita is
only a hat check girl, but she dreams of being a disco diva, if only she
could get a break.  Greg is a busboy, with his eye on the best job at
Studio 54:  being a bartender, where you're a mini-celbrity and the
money, drugs and sex just keep rolling in.
Money, drugs and sex are the lifeblood of Studio 54 (the disco's most
prominent piece of decor is cocaine-related).  So much of flows
throughout the film that you just know there's going to be a big
denouement.  And when it comes, the moral message is awfully heavy
handed.  The entire climax of the film ends up being awkward and
unconvincing.
But at least the film delivers a message there, which is more than can
be said about the remainder of the film's half-dozen subplots.  They're
simply tossed into the film with no thought (or screen time) given to
any semblance of resolution. A few of the luckier subplots are tidied up
with a quick gloss-over narration, but in any case it's sloppy
filmmaking.
Ryan Phillippe is rather unremarkable as the film's centerpiece.  Of the
entire cast, only Mike Myers truly stands out.  And that is mostly due
to the fact that he displays a heretofore unknown range of talent with a
dramatic role.
For all its glitz, 54 paints the 70s as a rather boring era. Billed as
the party that never ends, in 54 it seems more like the party you just
can't wait to leave.  At least the soundtrack is interesting.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Gingerbread Man, The (1998)
Doing a John Grisham film seems to be the trendy way these days for an
artistic director to make a commercial film.  First Francis Ford Coppola
tackled The Rainmaker, which is still the finest adaptation of any of
Grisham's works.  Now Robert Altman gives his own unique stamp to
Grisham's first story written exclusively for the screen, The
Gingerbread Man.
All Grisham films have to have a lawyer, and The Gingerbread Man is no
exception.  This time around, the lawyer is Rick Magruder (Kenneth
Branagh), a somewhat unscrupulous criminal attorney in Savannah.  His
career is skyrocketing, but his life has fallen apart.  He has divorced
from his wife, Leeanne (Famke Janssen), and has a hard time keeping
track of his children when they're in his custody.
Trouble comes Rick's way when he meets Mallory Doss (Embeth Davidtz), a
waitress who is being stalked by a man she believes to be her crazy
father (Robert Duvall).  The old man drove a wedge between her and her
ex-husband (Tom Berenger), and now it seems he may be out to kill her.
Rick sets out to help her, but slowly gets drawn into the deadly game
himself.
Meanwhile as a tempest is brewing in Rick's life, a real storm is
brewing outside. Hurricane Geraldo is building force and heading
straight toward the Savannah coast.  Hmmm...I wonder when it will hit?
The Gingerbread Man starts well, with a nearly trademark Altman party
scene that informs us this won't be the typical Grisham adaptation.  The
overlapping dialogue weaves a rich texture of Savannah life, and is an
excellent backdrop for the film.  Unfortunately, as the storm brews
outside, chunks of the movie get torn away like debris in gale-force
winds.  While the film is thrilling over two-thirds of the way through,
the film's finale is a whimper of incredulity.
The cast is top notch, involving us even though the characters are never
quite endearing. Shining out among the talented cast are Duvall, who
gives the eerie coot a note of authenticity, Robert Downey Jr as a
booze-ridden private eye, and Daryl Hannah as Rick's legal assistant.
The film is neither the typical John Grisham tale, nor the typical
Robert Altman film. Although involving a lawyer, the film is more
personal and compelling than most of Grisham's work.  It's good to see
the protagonist as something either than a fresh idealist just out of
law school.  The film is much more linear than most of Altman's work.
While the opening carries his distinctive touch, as the film progresses
it gains a greater sense of anonymity.
Still, even with its flawed ending, The Gingerbread Man is an enjoyable
tale to watch. Solid directing and an excellent cast make for a
thrilling initial 90 minutes, and even when the good actors start doing
stupid things, at least you can enjoy the good acting.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Title
Review for Dead Man on Campus (1998)
Dead Man on Campus is a black comedy dealing with college life and a
rather gruesome, but fictitious, urban legend.  However, for a black
comedy, the humor here is well on the bland side, and definitely not
worth the price of tuition.
Josh (Tom Everett Scott) is a college freshman His roommate is Cooper
(Mark-Paul Gosselaar), a ne'er do well student who's more interested in
sex, drugs and alcohol than in books and classes.  When the two
roommates clash styles, Cooper prevails... at least until mid-semester.
Then the two students try to determine how to salvage their failing
grades and stay in school.
They pin their hopes on an old school legend.  If a student commits
suicide, his or her roommates will be given straight-As to compensate
for grief.  Since neither Josh nor Cooper want to be the sacrifice, they
decide to hunt out the most suicide-prone fellow student to be their
roommate.
Dead Man on Campus takes far too long to launch into this main plot
thread. To put it frankly, Josh and Cooper are rather boring.  It isn't
until their intended roommates/victims show up that things start to get
interesting.
One of those roommates in particular, a truly insane student named Cliff
(Lochlyn Munro), possesses an abundance of the energy which Dead Man on
Campus so desperately needs.  The film perks up when he's around, but
not enough for a complete redemption.
The biggest failing of Dead Man on Campus is the lack of a strong
central character.  Despite the "party" atmosphere, neither Tom Everett
Scott nor Mark-Paul Gosselaar seem to be people you'd like to hang out
around. Unfortunately, we're forced to for ninety minutes.  A more
personable actor, or a better written character, might have made that
stretch bearable.
In an unusual twist of fate (or perhaps a lack of ideas), there is
actually another movie dealing with the college roommate-suicide urban
legend coming out in a few months, Dead Man's Curve. It won't be hard to
have better success than Dead Man on Campus.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for One Tough Cop (1998)
If you couldn't tell by the title, One Tough Cop is about, well, one
tough cop.  It's a by-the-numbers cop drama filled to the gills with
generic characters, generic situations and generic dialogue.
Stephen Baldwin stars as NYPD detective Bo Dietl...supposedly a
legendary NY cop, but who apparently did nothing noteworthy enough to
include in a film (everything except Dietl's name has no basis in
fact).  If you've ever seen a cop movie, or watched a police drama on
TV, you know Dietl's type...the gruff but loyal cop who isn't ashamed to
bend the rules as long as justice gets done.
What's a cop without a doomed partner?  In this case, the walking stiff
is "Duke" (portrayed by Chris Penn).  At least, Duke isn't three days
away from retiring and sailing around the world on a yacht named
"Live-4-Ever"...One Tough Cop has standards, you know. Instead, Duke is
saddled with a hefty gambling debt and a pathetic John Wayne
impersonation.  If he didn't already have a huge red bullseye painted on
his chest, you'd probably be eager to paint one there.
Bo and Duke's alleged case is catching a pair of bad guys who raped and
mutilated a nun.  Besides providing a few lurid and distasteful shots,
the actual crime doesn't really matter here. Even Bo and Duke's "unique"
path to solving it is rather straightforward and uninteresting.
What does provide a little spice to the proceedings, however, is the
fact that Bo's best friend, Richie La Cassa (Mike McGlone), just happens
to be a mafia boss.  Bo doesn't see that as a conflict... neither with
his job, nor with sleeping with Richie's girlfriend, Joey (Gina
Gershon).
That love triangle is about as complex as the screenplay here ever gets.
Granted, that might be enough basis for an interesting movie...but not
here, not with this screenplay.  The dialogue seems cut and paste from a
thousand different sources.  You can almost mouth the words along with
the actors, they're so familiar.
Stephen Baldwin takes his stock character and goes nowhere with it.
Perhaps the crackle and pizzazz of a stronger actor might have been able
to get mileage out of this treadless role, but not Baldwin.  True, he
huffs and puffs right on cue, and spouts the necessary dialogue at the
familiar times, but nowhere does he try to take the role anywhere new.
The best praise I can lay on One Tough Cop is that, as far as
cookie-cutter cop dramas go, it doesn't really make any missteps.
However, it doesn't make much of a case for going to the movies, either.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Title
Review for Yatgo ho yan (1997)
Mr. Nice Guy is the latest Jackie Chan film, so you should know what to
expect.  A weak plot, terrible dialogue, very little acting ability, but
some jaw-dropping action sequences that nearly make the rest of it
worthwhile. However, Mr. Nice Guy lacks the sparkle of Jackie's best
efforts, and its weaknesses are more glaring than ever.
Jackie Chan plays, who else, Jackie.  This time out, he's a famous chef
who hosts an Australian cooking show.  Not that it ever makes a
difference in the plot.  There are only two scenes of him cooking.  For
the rest of the film, somehow he mutates into Jackie Chan, Supercop.  It
never does explain why his character has such superb martial arts
skills...perhaps he was in the same cooking class as Steven Seagal in
Under Siege?
A TV newswoman, Diana (Gabrielle Fitzpatrick), covertly tapes a drug
deal involving kingpin Giancarlo (Richard Norton) and a local gang of
toughs, The Demons. Although she only has one camcorder, somehow the
result is full of close-ups and multiple angles...hmmm, shades of
Broadcast News???  Anyway, the goons discover Diana, and will do
anything to recover the tape. Here lies another crucial flaw in the
story:  doesn't anyone realize you can copy a tape?  Oh well, no one
ever said Jackie Chan movies had to make sense.
As luck would have it, Diana runs across Jackie, and, wouldn't you know
it, Jackie accidentally ends up with the tape.  This leads to countless
chase and/or fight scenes which look like they could have been lifted
from Rumble in the Bronx or nearly any other Jackie Chan movie.
In a move apparently designed to woo American (and other
English-speaking) audiences, the film uses English as its primary
language.  However, that doesn't mean an end to the atrocious dubbing
that has afflicted Jackie's recent Americanized releases.  Strangely,
many of the characters speaking English are overdubbed with English, and
poorly too.  Whether this is just a very bad case of looping, an effort
to minimize accents, or a simple case of nostalgia, it does achieve the
same level of distraction present in all of Jackie's dubbed films.
The plot in Mr. Nice Guy is negligible, merely an excuse to have Jackie
on the run from various goons.  But even though plots have always been
second to the action in Jackie's films, it seems odd that the filmmakers
have stuck us with this tired retread. Look, if you have Jackie Chan
playing a chef, why not use that to your advantage?  Watching Jackie
doing his stuff in a kitchen, beating the bad guys with foodstuffs
sounds like the perfect setup for innumerable comic stunts.
The action is a mixed bag here.  There's really only one no holds barred
fight scenes that have become the trademark of Jackie's films.  It takes
place in the arbitrary location of a construction site, apparently for
the sole reason that there are lots of nifty things lying around that
can be useful ala Jackie Chan.  The action in the film is neither
Jackie's best nor worst, but you long for some more inspiration in the
scenes.
The film's gratuitous use of slow motion is distracting.  Once or twice,
it may be useful to highlight a spectacular stunt sequence.  But to
slo-mo Jackie running?  Either this is a nod to the Six-Million Dollar
Man, or a pathetic attempt to disguise the fact that Jackie may be
slowing down.
If you've seen all of Jackie's films and are in need of another fix, go
ahead and see Mr. Nice Guy.  However, if you're just in the mood for
some good action, you'd be better off hitting the video store for some
of his better work, such as Supercop.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases
